1548
Alexander_Emanuel_Agassiz
 children  L. AgassizAlexander Emmanuel Rodolphe Agassiz (December 17, 1835  March 27, 1910), son of Agassiz and stepson of Cabot Agassiz, was an American scientist and engineer.()BiographyAgassiz was born in Neuchtel, Switzerland and emigrated to the States with his father in 1849. He graduated from University in 1855, subsequently studying engineering and chemistry, and taking the degree of of science at the scientific school of the same institution in 1857; and in 1859 became an assistant in the States Coast Survey.Thenceforward he became a specialist in marine ichthyology, but devoted much time to the investigation, superintendence and exploitation of mines. J. Hulbert, a friend of Agassizs brother-in-law, Adams Shaw, had discovered a rich copper lode known as the conglomerate on the Peninsula Superior in Michigan. He persuaded them, along with a group of friends, to purchase a controlling interest in the mines, which later became known as the and Hecla Mining Company based in Michigan. He was elected a Fellow of the Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1862.() Up until the summer of 1866, Agassiz worked as an assistant in the museum of natural history that his father founded at Harvard. That summer, he took a trip to see the mines for himself and he afterwards became treasurer of the enterprise. Over the winter of 1866 and early 1867, mining operations began to falter due to the difficulty of extracting copper from the conglomerate. Hulbert had sold his interests in the mines and had moved on to other ventures. But Agassiz refused to give up hope for the mines, and he returned to the mines in March 1867 with his wife and young son. At that time, Calumet was a remote settlement, virtually inaccessible during the winter and very far removed from civilization even during the summer. With insufficient supplies at the mines, Agassiz struggled to maintain order, while back in Boston, Shaw was saddled with debt and the collapse of their interests. Shaw obtained financial assistance from John Simpkins, the selling agent for the enterprise to continue operations. Agassiz continued to live at Calumet, making gradual progress in stabilising the mining operations, such that he was able to leave the mines under the control of a general manager and return to Boston in 1868 before winter closed navigation.The mines continued to prosper and in May 1871, several mines were consolidated to form the and Hecla Mining Company with Shaw as its first president. In August, 1871, Shaw retired to the board of directors and Agassiz became president, a position he held until his death.Agassiz was a major factor in the mines continued success and visited the mines twice a year. He innovated by installing a giant engine, known as the Superior, which was able to lift 24 tons of rock from a depth of 1,200 metres (4,000 ft). He also built a railroad and dredged a channel to navigable waters. However, after a time the mines did not require his full-time year-round attention and he returned to his interests in natural history at Harvard.Out of his copper fortune, he gave some US$500,000 to Harvard for the museum of comparative zoology and other purposes.In 1875 he surveyed Titicaca, Peru, examined the copper mines of Peru and Chile, and made a collection of Peruvian antiquities for the of Comparative Zoology, of which he was curator from 1874 to 1885.  He assisted Wyville Thomson in the examination and classification of the collections of the 1872 Challenger Expedition, and wrote the Review of the Echini (2 vols., 18721874) in the reports.Between 1877 and 1880 he took part in the three dredging expeditions of the steamer Blake of the Coast Survey, and presented a full account of them in two volumes (1888). In 1896 Agassiz visited Fiji and Queensland and inspected the Barrier Reef, publishing a paper on the subject in 1898.Of Agassizs other writings on marine zoology, most are contained in the bulletins and memoirs of the museum of comparative zoology; but he published in 1865, with Cary Agassiz, his stepmother, Seaside Studies in Natural History, a work at once exact and stimulating, and in 1871 Marine Animals of Massachusetts Bay.Agassiz served as a president of the National Academy of Sciences, which since 1913 has awarded the Agassiz Medal in his memory. He died in 1910 on board the RMS Adriatic en route to New York from Southampton. Publications * * * * * * * * * * * See also*familyReferences* *External links* National Mining Hall of Fame:  Alexander Agassiz* AgassizAgassizAgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel Agassizja:AgassizEmanuel AgassizAgassiz
1841
Economy_of_Alberta
File:Alberta oil field.JPG|thumb|Aerial photo of oilfield roads and drill sites in the Oil Field, 2008. Albertas economy is one of the strongest in Canada, supported by the petroleum industry and, to a lesser extent, agriculture and technology. The per capita GDP in 2007 was by far the highest of any province in Canada at C$74,825 (approx. US$74,000). In 2006 Albertas per capita GDP was higher than all US states, and one the highest figures in the world . Albertas per capita GDP in 2007 was 61% higher than the Canadian average of C$46,441 and more than twice that of all the provinces. In 2006, the deviation from the national average was the largest for any province in Canadian history.()According to the Institute, Alberta has very high levels of freedom and rates Alberta as the most free economy in Canada,() and second most free economy amongst U.S. states and Canadian provinces.()Economic geographyAlberta has a small market and is relatively distant from major markets, despite good transportation links to the rest of Canada and to the United States to the south. Alberta is located in the northwestern quadrant of America, in a region of low density called the Plains (and referred to by one author as North Americas Empty Quarter). Alberta is landlocked, and separated by a series of mountain ranges from the nearest outlets to the Pacific Ocean, and by the Shield from ports on the Lakehead or Bay. From these ports to major populations centres and markets in Europe or Asia is several thousands of kilometers. The largest population clusters of North America (the Boston  Washington, San Francisco - San Diego, Chicago  Pittsburgh, and City  Windsor Corridors) are all thousands of kilometers away from Alberta. Partly for this reason, Alberta has never developed a large presence in the industries that have traditionally started industrialization in other places (notably the original Revolution in Great Britain) but which require large forces, and large internal markets or easy transportation to export markets, namely textiles, metallurgy, or transportation-related manufacturing (automotives, ships, or train cars).Agriculture has the been a key industry since the 1870s. The climate is dry, temperate, and continental, with extreme variations between seasons. Productive soils are found in most of the southern half of the province (excluding the mountains), and in certain parts of the north. Agriculture on a large scale is practiced further north in Alberta that anywhere else in North America, extending into the River country above the parallel north. Generally, however, Alberta (and areas along the Rockies) is forested land and logging is more important than agriculture there. Agriculture is divided into primarily crops in the east, livestock in the west, and a mixture in between and in the parkland belt in the near north.Conventional oil and gas fields are found throughout the province on an axis running from the northwest to the southeast. Oil sands are found in the northeast, especially around McMurray (the Oil Sands).Because of its (relatively) economically isolated location, Alberta relies heavily on transportation links with the rest of the world. Albertas historical development has been largely influenced by the development of new infrastructure, (see trends below). Alberta is now served by two major railways (CN and CP), by three major highway connections to the Pacific (the Trans-Canada via Horse Pass, the Yellowhead via Pass and the Crowsnest via Pass), and one to the United States (15), as well as two international airports (Calgary and Edmonton).Calgary-Edmonton CorridorThe Corridor is the most urbanized region in the province and one of the densest in Canada. Measured from north to south, the region covers a distance of roughly 400 kilometres. In 2001, the population of the Calgary-Edmonton Corridor was 2.15 million (72% of Albertas population).() It is also one of the fastest growing regions in the country. A 2003 study by Bank Financial Group  found the corridor is the only Canadian urban centre to amass a U.S. level of wealth while maintaining a Canadian-style quality of life, offering universal health care benefits. The study found GDP per capita in the corridor was 10% above average U.S. metropolitan areas and 40 above other Canadian cities at that time.CalgaryEdmonton rivalrySeeing Calgary and Edmonton are part of a single economic region as the TD study did in 2003 was novel. The more traditional view had been to see the two cities are economic rivals. For example, in the 1980 both cities claimed to be the Oil Capital of Canada. Calgary is home to most oil company head offices. Edmonton, and more so its surrounding region (Nisku, Leduc, Fort Saskatchewan), is the site of most oil-and-gas related industry including refining and manufacturing.TrendsFile:Leduc oil.jpg|thumb|left|The No. 1 well, which blew in 1947, marked the beginning of series of petroleum-related booms.Alberta has always been an economy. In line with Innis thesis, the economy has changed substantially as different export commodities have risen or fallen in importance. In sequence, the most important products have been: fur, wheat and beef, and oil and gas.The development of in Alberta has been crucial to its historical economic development. The American fur trade relied on canoes, boats, and River carts on trails to move furs out and Europe good in to the region. Immigration into the province was eased tremendously by the arrival of the Pacific Railways line in 1880s. Commercial farming became viable in the area once the trade had developed technologies to handle the bulk export of grain, especially cars and elevators. Oil and gas exports have been possible because of increasing pipeline technology.Prior to the 1950s, Alberta was a primarily agricultural economy, based on the export of wheat, beef, and a few other commodities. The health of economy was closely bound up with the of wheat.In 1947 a major field was discovered near Edmonton. It was not the first petroleum find in Alberta, but it was large enough to significantly alter the economy of the province (and coincided with growing American demand for energy). Since that time, Albertas economic fortunes have largely tracked the of oil, and increasingly gas prices. When oil prices spiked during the Oil Embargo, oil crisis, and energy crisis, Albertas economy boomed. However, during the oil glut Albertas economy suffered. Alberta boomed once again during the 2003-2008 oil price spike. In July 2008 the price of oil peaked and began to decline and Albertas economy soon followed suit, with unemployment doubling within a year.   with natural gas prices at a long-term low, Albertas economy is in poor health compared to before, although still relatively better than many other comparable jurisdictions.The spin-offs from petroleum have allowed Alberta to develop many other industries. Oilpatch-related manufacturing is an obvious example, but financial services and government services have also benefited from oil money.A comparison of the development of Albertas less oil and gas-endowed neighbours, Saskatchewan and Manitoba, reveals the role petroleum has played. Alberta was once the smallest of the three Provinces by population in the early 20th century, but by 2009, Albertas population was 3,632,483 or approximately three times as much as either Saskatchewan (1,023,810) or Manitoba (1,213,815).EmploymentAlbertas economy is a highly developed one in which most people work in services such as healthcare, government, or retail. Primary industries are also of great importance, however.Employment in extraction industriesAs of 2007:(http://www.energy.alberta.ca/About_Us/1527.asp)* Mining and Oil and Gas Extraction Sector   146,900* Oil and Gas Extraction industry  69,900* Support Activities for Mining & Oil & Gas Extraction (primarily oil and gas exploration and drilling)  71,700* Mining other than oil and gas (mainly coal and mineral mining & quarrying)  5,100Largest employersAccording to Venture magazines list of the 50 largest employers in the province, the largest employers are:SectorsIndustryAlberta is the largest producer of conventional crude oil, crude, gas and gas products in the country. Alberta is the worlds 2nd largest exporter of natural gas and the 4th largest producer.(State of Alaska - Trade Report on Alberta) Two of the largest producers of petrochemicals in North America are located in central and north central Alberta. In both Red Deer and Edmonton, world class polyethylene and vinyl manufacturers produce products shipped all over the world, and Edmontons oil refineries provide the raw materials for a large petrochemical industry to the east of Edmonton.The Oil Sands (sometimes known as the Athabasca sands) have estimated oil reserves approximately equal to the oil reserves of the rest of the world, estimated to be . With the development of new extraction methods such as assisted gravity drainage (SAGD), which was developed in Alberta, bitumen and synthetic crude oil can be produced at costs close to those of conventional crude. Many companies employ both conventional strip mining and non-conventional situ methods to extract the bitumen from the oil sands. With current technology and at current prices, about  of bitumen are recoverable. McMurray, one of Canadas fastest growing cities, has grown enormously in recent years because of the large corporations which have taken on the task of oil production. As of late 2006 there were over $100 billion in oil sands projects under construction or in the planning stages in northeastern Alberta.Another factor determining the viability of oil extraction from the Tar Sands is the price of oil. The price increases since 2003 have made it more than profitable to extract this oil, which in the past would give little profit or even a loss.With concerted effort and support from the provincial government, several high-tech industries have found their birth in Alberta, notably patents related to interactive crystal display systems.(Interactive display system - US Patent U.S. Patent No. 5,448,263; U.S. Patent for Touch Sensitive Technology - SMART Technologies) With a growing economy, Alberta has several financial institutions dealing with civil and private funds.EnergyOil and gasthumb|Drilling rig in Alberta.Since the early 1940s, Alberta had supplied oil and gas to the rest of Canada and the States. The River region produces oil for internal and external use. The Oil Sands contain the largest proven reserves of oil in the world outside Arabia. gas has been found at several points, and in 1999, the production of natural gas liquids (ethane, propane, and butanes) totalled , valued at $2.27 billion. Alberta also provides 13% of all the natural gas used in the United States.Notable gas reserves were discovered in the 1883 near Medicine Hat.(Alberta Energy: Energy Facts)  The town of Medicine Hat began using gas for lighting the town, and supplying light and fuel for the people, and a number of industries using the gas for manufacturing. In fact a large glassworks was established at Redcliff. When Kipling visited Medicine Hat he described it as the city with all hell for a basement.Basic statistics* In 2003, Alberta produced  of conventional light, medium, and heavy crude, plus an additional  of pentanes plus used for blending with heavy crude oil and bitumen to facilitate its transportation through pipelines.(Government of Alberta. Energy Overview)* Alberta exports over  of oil to US markets accounting for 10 per cent of US oil imports.* The conventional oil resource is estimated to have approximately  of remaining established reserves.*Conventional crude oil production (not including oil sands and plus) represented 38.6% of Alberta s total crude oil and equivalent production and 25.5% of Canadas total crude oil and equivalent production.*Albertas oil sands reserve is considered to be one of the largest in the world, containing  of bitumen initially in place. Of this total,  are considered to be remaining established reserves, recoverable using current technology under present and anticipated economic conditions. To date, about 2% of the initial established resource has been produced.* In 2003, total crude bitumen production in Alberta averaged .* Disposition of Alberta s total crude oil and equivalent production in 2003 was approximately::* 62% to the United States:* 24% within Alberta:* 14% to the rest of Canada* In 2003, Alberta produced  of marketable natural gas.* The average Albertan household uses  of natural gas a year.* Over 80 per cent of Canadas natural gas production is from Alberta.* In 2006, Alberta consumed  of natural gas. The rest was exported across Canada and to the United States.* Royalties to Alberta from natural gas and its byproducts are larger than royalties from crude oil and bitumen.* In 2006, there were 13,473 successful natural gas wells drilled in Alberta: 12,029 conventional gas wells and 1,444 methane wells* There may be up to  of coalbed methane in Alberta, although it is unknown how much of this gas might be recoverable.* Alberta has one of the most extensive natural gas systems in the world as part of its energy infrastructure, with  of energy related pipelines.CoalCoal has been mined in Alberta since the late 19th century. Over 1800 mines have operated in Alberta since then.(The coal industry was vital to the early development of several communities, especially those in the foothills and along deep river valleys where coal was close to the surface.Alberta is still a major coal producer, every two weeks Alberta produces enough coal to fill the Dome in Toronto.(Much of that coal is burned in Alberta for electricity generation. Alberta uses over 25 million tonnes of coal annually to generate electricity.(Alberta has vast coal resources and 70 per cent of Canadas coal reserves are located in Alberta. This amounts to 33.6 Gigatonnes.(Vast beds of coal are found extending for hundreds of miles, a short distance below the surface of the plains. The coal belongs to the Cretaceous beds, and while not so heavy as that of the Measures in England is of excellent quality. In the valley of the River, alongside the Pacific Railway, valuable beds of anthracite coal are still worked. The usual coal deposits of the area of bituminous or semi-bituminous coal. These are largely worked at Lethbridge in southern Alberta and Edmonton in the centre of the province. Many other parts of the province have pits for private use.Electricity, Albertas generating capacity was 11,919 MW, and Alberta has about  of transmission lines.Alberta has over 490 megawatts of power capacity.Alberta has added 4400 MW of new supply since 1998  that is equal to all the power generated in Saskatchewan.Winter peak for power use in one day was in November 2006  9,661 MW.Summer peak for power use in one day was set on July 18, 2007  9,192 MW.(Mineral miningBuilding stones mined in Alberta include stone, and sandstone.Diamonds were first found in Alberta in 1958, and many stones have been found since, although to date no large-scale mines have been developed.(ManufacturingThe Edmonton area, and in particular Nisku is a major centre for manufacturing oil and gas related equipment. As well Edmontons Refinery Row is home to a petrochemical industry.BiotechnologySeveral companies and services in the biotech sector are clustered around the University of Alberta, for example ColdFX.Food processingOwing to the strength of agriculture, food processing was one a major part of the economies of Edmonton and Calgary, but this sector has increasingly moved to smaller centres such as Brooks, the home of Packers.TransportationFile:WestJetHQ.jpg|thumb|400px|Headquarters of the airline WestJet, in Calgary.Edmonton is a major distribution centre for northern communities, hence the nickname Gateway to the North. Edmonton is one Rails most important hubs. Since 1996, Pacific Railway has its headquarters in downtown Calgary.WestJet, Canadas second largest air carrier, is headquartered in Calgary, by International Airport, which serves as the airlines primary hub.(Contact Us. WestJet. Retrieved on May 20, 2009.) Prior to its dissolution, Airlines was headquartered in Calgary by the airport.(Investor & Financial Information. Airlines. March 3, 2000. Retrieved on May 20, 2009.) Prior to its dissolution, Canada subsidiary Zip was headquartered in Calgary.(Pigg, Susan. Zip, WestJet in fare war that could hurt them both; Move follows competition bureau ruling Battle could intensify when Zip flies eastward. Star. January 22, 2003. Business C01. Retrieved on September 30, 2009.)Agriculture and forestryIn the past, cattle, horses, and sheep were reared in the southern prairie region on ranches or smaller holdings. Currently Alberta produces cattle valued at over $3.3 billion, as well as other livestock in lesser quantities. In this region irrigation is widely used.  Wheat, accounting for almost half of the $2 billion agricultural economy, is supplemented by canola, barley, rye, beets, and other mixed farming.Agriculture has a significant position in the provinces economy. Over three million cattle are residents of the province at one time or another,(Alberta Livestock Inspections - August 2006 - Alberta Government, Department of Agriculture) and Albertan beef has a healthy worldwide market. Nearly one half of all Canadian beef is produced in Alberta. Alberta is one of the prime producers of plains buffalo (bison) for the consumer market. Sheep for wool and lamb are also raised.Image:Grain Elevator 047.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Grain elevator in AlbertaWheat and canola are primary farm crops, with Alberta leading the provinces in spring wheat production, with other grains also prominent. Much of the farming is dryland farming, often with fallow seasons interspersed with cultivation. Continuous cropping (in which there is no fallow season) is gradually becoming a more common mode of production because of increased profits and a reduction of soil erosion. Across the province, the once common elevator is slowly being lost as rail lines are decreased and farmers now truck the grain to central points.Alberta is the leading beekeeping province of Canada, with some beekeepers wintering hives indoors in specially designed barns in southern Alberta, then migrating north during the summer into the Peace River valley where the season is short but the working days are long for honeybees to produce honey from clover and fireweed. Hybrid canola also requires bee pollination, and some beekeepers service this need.The vast northern forest reserves of softwood allow Alberta to produce large quantities of lumber, oriented strand board (OSB) and plywood, and several plants in northern Alberta supply North America and the Rim nations with bleached pulp and newsprint.In 1999, lumber products from Alberta were valued at $4.1 billion of which 72% were exported around the world. Since forests cover approximately 59% of the provinces land area, the government allows about  to be harvested annually from the forests on public lands.ServicesDespite the high profile of the extractive industries, Alberta has a mature economy and most people work in services.FinanceCalgary is head office for many major oil and gas related companies, and many financial service business have grown up around them.Edmonton is the headquarters of the only major Canadian banks west of Toronto: Western Bank, and Financial.GovernmentDespite Albertas reputation as a small government province, many health care and education professionals are lured to Alberta from other provinces by the higher wages the Alberta government is able to offer because of oil revenues.See also* of Lethbridge* Oil Patch, for the petroleum industry* of the petroleum industry in CanadaReferencesExternal links* CBC Digital Archives - Striking Oil in Alberta
1942
Airline
File:Fedex-md11-N525FE-051109-21-16.jpg|thumb|A Express Douglas MD-11. FedEx Express is the worlds largest airline in terms of freight tons flown.()File:Ryanair.b737-800.aftertakeoff.arp.jpg|thumb|Ryanair Boeing 737-800 shortly after take-off. Ryanair is the worlds largest airline in terms of number of international passengers carried.()An airline provides air transport services for traveling passengers and/or freight. Airlines lease or own their aircraft with which to supply these services and may form partnerships or alliances with other airlines for mutual benefit. Generally, airline companies are recognized with an air operating certificate or license issued by a governmental aviation body.Airlines vary from those with a single aircraft carrying mail or cargo, through full-service international airlines operating hundreds of aircraft. Airline services can be categorized as being intercontinental, intra-continental, domestic, regional, or international, and may be operated as scheduled services or charters.HistoryThe first airlinesAmerican aviation pioneers, such as Porter and Marriott, attempted to start airlines using airships in the mid-19th century, focusing on the New YorkCalifornia route. Those attempts floundered due to such mishaps as the airships catching fire and the aircraft being ripped apart by spectators. DELAG, Deutsche Luftschiffahrts-Aktiengesellschaft was the worlds first airline.() It was founded on November 16, 1909 with government assistance, and operated airships manufactured by The Zeppelin Corporation. Its headquarters were in Frankfurt.  The four oldest non-dirigible airlines that still exist are Netherlands KLM,  Colombias Avianca, Australias Qantas, and the Czech Republics Airlines. KLM first flew in May 1920, while Qantas (which stands for Queensland and Northern Territory Aerial Services Limited) was founded in Queensland, Australia, in late 1920.U.S. airline industryEarly developmentFile:TWA 1940.jpg|thumb|TWA DC-3 in 1940. The DC-3, often regarded as one of the most influential aircraft in the history of commercial aviation, revolutionized the aviation industry.()Jannus conducted the United States first scheduled commercial airline flight on 1 January 1914 for the St. Petersburg-Tampa Airboat Line.() The 23-minute flight traveled between Petersburg, Florida and Florida, passing some  above Tampa Bay in Jannus XIV biplane flying boat. International Airlines began service between Miami and Bimini in the Bahamas in February 1919. Based in Lauderdale, Chalks claimed to be the oldest continuously operating airline in the United States until its closure in 2008.()Following War I, the United States found itself swamped with aviators. Many decided to take their war-surplus aircraft on barnstorming campaigns, performing aerobatic maneuvers to woo crowds. In 1918, the States Postal Service won the financial backing of Congress to begin experimenting with mail service, initially using Jenny aircraft that had been procured by the States Army Air Service. Private operators were the first to fly the mail but due to numerous accidents the US Army was tasked with mail delivery. During the course of the Armys involvement they proved to be too unreliable and lost their air mail duties. By the mid-1920s, the Postal Service had developed its own air mail network, based on a transcontinental backbone between New York and San Francisco. To supplant this service, they offered twelve contracts for spur routes to independent bidders. Some of the carriers that won these routes would, through time and mergers, evolve into Am, Air Lines, Airways, Airlines, Airlines (originally a division of Boeing), World Airlines, Airlines, and Air Lines.Service during the early 1920s was sporadic: most airlines at the time were focused on carrying bags of mail. In 1925, however, the Motor Company bought out the Stout Aircraft Company and began construction of the all-metal Trimotor, which became the first successful American airliner. With a 12-passenger capacity, the Trimotor made passenger service potentially profitable. Air service was seen as a supplement to rail service in the American transportation network.At the same time, Trippe began a crusade to create an air network that would link America to the world, and he achieved this goal through his airline, American World Airways, with a fleet of flying boats that linked Los Angeles to Shanghai and Boston to London. Pan Am and Northwest Airways (which began flights to Canada in the 1920s) were the only U.S. airlines to go international before the 1940s.With the introduction of the 247 and DC-3 in the 1930s, the U.S. airline industry was generally profitable, even during the Depression. This trend continued until the beginning of War II.Development since 1945File:Boeing 377 Stratocruiser (B-29) American Overseas 1949-50.jpg|thumb|In October 1945, the Export Airlines became the first airline to offer regular commercial flights between North America and Europe.() Shown here is Am Ex 377 Stratocruiser in 1949.As governments met to set the standards and scope for an emergent civil air industry toward the end of the war, the U.S. took a position of maximum operating freedom; U.S. airline companies were not as hard-hit as European and the few Asian ones had been. This preference for open skies operating regimes continues, within limitations, to this day.World War II, like World War I, brought new life to the airline industry. Many airlines in the Allied countries were flush from lease contracts to the military, and foresaw a future explosive demand for civil air transport, for both passengers and cargo. They were eager to invest in the newly emerging flagships of air travel such as the Stratocruiser, Constellation, and DC-6. Most of these new aircraft were based on American bombers such as the B-29, which had spearheaded research into new technologies such as pressurization. Most offered increased efficiency from both added speed and greater payload.In the 1950s, the Havilland Comet, 707, DC-8, and Aviation Caravelle became the first flagships of the Jet Age in the West, while the Eastern bloc had Tu-104 and Tu-124 in the fleets of state-owned carriers such as Czechoslovak SA, Soviet Aeroflot and East-German Interflug. The Viscount and L-188 Electra inaugurated turboprop transport.The next big boost for the airlines would come in the 1970s, when the 747, Douglas DC-10, and L-1011 inaugurated widebody (jumbo jet) service, which is still the standard in international travel. The Tu-144 and its Western counterpart, Concorde, made supersonic travel a reality. Concorde first flew in 1969 and operated through 2003. In 1972, Airbus began producing Europes most commercially successful line of airliners to date. The added efficiencies for these aircraft were often not in speed, but in passenger capacity, payload, and range. Airbus also features modern electronic cockpits that were common across their aircraft to enable pilots to fly multiple models with minimal cross-training.Travel Concepts, Inc., founded by J. Tobin in 1971, developed the first travel kits to be distributed in Class and Class cabins, and also provided in-flight educational games for children. The travel kits and the educational game programs have been utilized by most major airlines for 25 years.()()()File:Pan Am Boeing 747 at Zurich Airport in May 1985.jpg|thumb|left|Am 747 Clipper Neptunes Car in 1985. The deregulation of the American airline industry increased the financial troubles of the iconic airline which ultimately filed for bankruptcy in December 1991.()1978s U.S. airline industry deregulation lowered barriers for new airlines just as a downturn occurred. New start-ups entered during the downturn, during which time they found aircraft and funding, contracted hangar and maintenance services, trained new employees, and recruited laid off staff from other airlines.As the business cycle returned to normalcy, major airlines dominated their routes through aggressive pricing and additional capacity offerings, often swamping new startups. Only West Airlines (which has since merged with US Airways) remained a significant survivor from this new entrant era, as dozens, even hundreds, have gone under.In many ways, the biggest winner in the deregulated environment was the air passenger. Indeed, the U.S. witnessed an explosive growth in demand for air travel, as many millions who had never or rarely flown before became regular fliers, even joining flyer loyalty programs and receiving free flights and other benefits from their flying. New services and higher frequencies meant that business fliers could fly to another city, do business, and return the same day, for almost any point in the country. Air travels advantages put intercity bus lines under pressure, and most have withered away.By the 1980s, almost half of the total flying in the world took place in the U.S., and today the domestic industry operates over 10,000 daily departures nationwide.Toward the end of the century, a new style of low cost airline emerged, offering a no-frills product at a lower price. Airlines, JetBlue, Airways, Airlines and other low-cost carriers began to represent a serious challenge to the so-called legacy airlines, as did their low-cost counterparts in many other countries. Their commercial viability represented a serious competitive threat to the legacy carriers. However, of these, ATA and Skybus have since ceased operations.Increasingly since 1978, US airlines have been reincorporated and spun off by newly created and interally led manangement companies, and thus becoming nothing more than operating units and subsidiaries with limited financially decisive control. Among some of these holding companies and parent companies that are the relatively well known, are the Corporation, along with the Corporation, among a long of airline holding companies sometime recognized world wide.  Less recognized are the equity firms which often seize managerial, financial, and of directors control of distressed airline companies by temporarily investing large sums of capital in air carriers, so as to rescheme an airlines assets into a profitable organization or liquidating an air carrier of their profitable and worthwhile routes and business operations.Thus the last 50 years of the airline industry have varied from reasonably profitable, to devastatingly depressed. As the first major market to deregulate the industry in 1978, U.S. airlines have experienced more turbulence than almost any other country or region. Today, American Airlines is the only U.S. carrier to survive bankruptcy-free.The Airline Industry BailoutCongress passed the Air Transportation Safety and System Stabilization Act (P.L. 107-42) in response to a severe liquidity crisis facing the already-troubled airline industry in the aftermath of the September 11th terrorist attacks. Congress sought to provide cash infusions to carriers for both the cost of the four-day federal shutdown of the airlines and the incremental losses incurred through December 31, 2001 as a result of the terrorist attacks. This resulted in the first government bailout of the 21st century.(http://ostpxweb.ost.dot.gov/aviation/Data/stabilizationact.pdf) Between 2000 and 2005 US airlines lost $30 billion with wage cuts of over $15 billion and 100,000 employees laid off.()In recognition of the essential national economic role of a healthy aviation system, Congress authorized partial compensation of up to $5 billion in cash subject to review by the of Transportation and up to $10 billion in loan guarantees subject to review by a newly created Transportation Stabilization Board (ATSB). The applications to DOT for reimbursements were subjected to rigorous multi-year reviews not only by DOT program personnel but also by the Accountability Office (http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d04725r.pdf) and the DOT Inspector General.()()Ultimately, the federal government provided $4.6 billion in one-time, subject-to-income-tax cash payments to 427 U.S. air carriers, with no provision for repayment, essentially a gift from the taxpayers. (Passenger carriers operating scheduled service received approximately $4 billion, subject to tax.) () In addition, the ATSB approved loan guarantees to six airlines totaling approximately $1.6 billion. Data from the Treasury Department show that the government recouped the $1.6 billion and a profit of $339 million from the fees, interest and purchase of discounted airline stock associated with loan guarantees.()European airline industryFile:National Audit Office - Victoria - London - 020504.jpg|thumb|The Imperial Airways Empire Terminal, Victoria, London. Trains ran from here to boats in Southampton, and to Airport.The first countries in Europe to embrace air transport were Austria, Belgium, Finland, France, Germany, the Netherlands and the Kingdom.Austria initiated the first regularly scheduled airmail service on March 31, 1918 in the midst of World War I. The route provided airmail service spanning Vienna to Krakw (now in Poland) to Lviv (now in Ukraine), as was often also extended to Kiev and Odessa.(Landmarks of airmail history: whos on first?)(http://books.google.co.uk/books?idfPLm9omt_YIC&pgPA37&lpgPA37&dqlemberg+vienna+post+1918&sourcebl&ots0NBTBZharm&sigpuyZDmv7oZOViiUstnvY6CwB-4s&hlen&eizW75TKeJEtWAhAfwkOWGCQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum2&ved0CCEQ6AEwATgK#vonepage&qlemberg%20vienna%20post%201918&ffalse )KLM, the oldest carrier still operating under its original name, was founded in 1919. The first flight (operated on behalf of KLM by Transport and Travel) transported two English passengers to Schiphol, Amsterdam from London in 1920. Like other major European airlines of the time (see France and the UK below), KLMs early growth depended heavily on the needs to service links with far-flung colonial possessions (Indies). It is only after the loss of the Empire that KLM found itself based at a small country with few potential passengers, depending heavily on transfer traffic, and was one of the first to introduce the hub-system to facilitate easy connections.France began an air mail service to Morocco in 1919 that was bought out in 1927, renamed Aropostale, and injected with capital to become a major international carrier. In 1933, Aropostale went bankrupt, was nationalized and merged with several other airlines into what became France.In Finland, the charter establishing Aero O/Y (now Finnair) was signed in the city of Helsinki on September 12, 1923. F.13 D-335 became the first aircraft of the company, when Aero took delivery of it on March 14, 1924. The first flight was between Helsinki and Tallinn, capital of Estonia, and it took place on March 20, 1924, one week later.Germanys Luft Hansa was created in 1926 by merger of two airlines, one of them Luftverkehr. Luft Hansa, due to the Junkers heritage and unlike most other airlines at the time, became a major investor in airlines outside of Europe, providing capital to Varig and Avianca. German airliners built by Junkers, Dornier, and Fokker were among the most advanced in the world at the time.  In 1931, the airship Graf Zeppelin began offering regular scheduled passenger service between Germany and South America, usually every two weeks, which continued until 1937.()  In 1936, the airship Hindenburg entered passenger service and successfully crossed the Atlantic 36 times before crashing at Lakehurst, New Jersey on May 6, 1937.()The British company Aircraft Transport and Travel commenced a London to Paris service on August 25, 1919, this was the worlds first regular international flight. The United Kingdoms carrier during this period was Airways, which became BOAC (British Overseas Airways Co.) in 1939. Imperial Airways used huge Handley-Page biplanes for routes between London, the East, and India: images of Imperial aircraft in the middle of the Khali, being maintained by Bedouins, are among the most famous pictures from the heyday of the Empire.In Union the Chief Administration of the Civil Air Fleet was established in 1921. One of its first acts was to help found Deutsch-Russische Luftverkehrs A.G. (Deruluft), a German-Russian joint venture to provide air transport from Russia to the West. Domestic air service began around the same time, when Dobrolyot started operations on 15 July 1923 between Moscow and Nizhni Novgorod. Since 1932 all operations had been carried under the name Aeroflot. By the end of the 1930s Aeroflot had become the worlds largest airline, employing more than 4,000 pilots and 60,000 other service personnel and operating around 3,000 aircraft (of which 75% were considered obsolete by its own standards). During the Soviet era Aeroflot was synonymous with Russian civil aviation, as it was the only air carrier. It became the first airline in the world to operate sustained regular jet services on 15 September 1956 with the Tu-104.DeregulationDeregulation of the Union airspace in the early 1990s has had substantial effect on structure of the industry there. The shift towards budget airlines on shorter routes has been significant. Airlines such as EasyJet and Ryanair have grown at the expense of the traditional national airlines.There has also been a trend for these national airlines themselves to be privatised such as has occurred for Lingus and Airways. Other national airlines, including Italys Alitalia, have suffered - particularly with the rapid increase of oil prices in early 2008.Asian airline industryAlthough Airlines (PAL) was officially founded on February 26, 1941, its license to operate as an airliner was derived from merged Philippine Aerial Taxi Company (PATCO) established by mining magnate Emmanuel N. Bachrach on December 3, 1930, making it Asias oldest scheduled carrier still in operation.() Commercial air service commenced three weeks later from Manila to Baguio, making it Asias first airline route. Bachrachs death in 1937 paved the way for its eventual merger with Philippine Airlines in March 1941 and made it Asias oldest airline. It is also the oldest airline in Asia still operating under its current name.(Jane,  Janes airlines & airliners By Jeremy Flack, First Edition, 2003, ISBN 978-0-00-715174-5) Bachrachs majority share in PATCO was bought by beer magnate Andres R. Soriano in 1939 upon the advice of General McArthur and later merged with newly formed Philippine Airlines with PAL as the surviving entity. Soriano has controlling interest in both airlines before the merger. PAL restarted service on March 15, 1941 with a single Model 18 NPC-54 aircraft, which started its daily services between Manila (from Field) and Baguio, later to expand with larger aircraft such as the DC-3 and Vickers Viscount.India was also one of the first countries to embrace civil aviation.() One of the first West Asian airline companies was India, which had its beginning as Airlines in 1932, a division of Tata Sons Ltd. (now Group). The airline was founded by Indias leading industrialist, Tata. On October 15, 1932, J. R. D. Tata himself flew a single engined Havilland Puss Moth carrying air mail (postal mail of Airways) from Karachi to Bombay via Ahmedabad. The aircraft continued to Madras via Bellary piloted by Air Force pilot Vintcent . Tata Airlines was also one of the worlds first major airlines which began its operations without any support from the Government.()With the outbreak of War II, the airline presence in Asia came to a relative halt, with many new flag carriers donating their aircraft for military aid and other uses. Following the end of the war in 1945, regular commercial service was restored in India and Tata Airlines became a public limited company on July 29, 1946 under the name Air India. After the of India, 49% of the airline was acquired by the of India. In return, the airline was granted status to operate international services from India as the designated flag carrier under the name India International.On July 31, 1946, a chartered Philippine Airlines (PAL) DC-4 ferried 40 American servicemen to Oakland, California from Nielson Airport in City with stops in Guam, Island, Atoll and Honolulu, Hawaii, making PAL the first Asian airline to cross the Ocean. A regular service between Manila and Francisco was started in December. It was during this year that the airline was designated as the flag carrier of Philippines.During the era of decolonization, newly-born Asian countries started to embrace air transport. Among the first Asian carriers during the era were Pacific of Kong (founded in September 1946), Airways (later International Airlines; founded in October 1946), Malayan Airlines (later Singapore and Airlines; founded in 1947), Al in Israel in 1948, Indonesia in 1949, Airlines in 1951,Airways International in 1960, and Air in 1962.Latin American airline industryFile:Tam.a330-200.pt-mvl.arp.jpg|thumb|Airlines is the largest airline in Latin America in terms of number of annual passengers flown.()Among the first countries to have regular airlines in Latin America were Bolivia with Areo Boliviano, Cuba with de Aviacin, Colombia with Avianca, Brazil with Varig, Chile with Chile (today Airlines), Republic with de Aviacin, Mexico with de Aviacin, and TACA as a brand of several airlines of Central American countries (Honduras, El Salvador, Costa Rica, Guatemala and Nicaragua). All the previous airlines started regular operations before World War II.The air travel market has evolved rapidly over recent years in America. Some industry estimations over 2000 new aircraft will begin service over the next five years in this region.These airlines serve domestic flights within their countries, as well as connections within Latin America and also overseas flights to North America, Europe, Australia, and Asia.Just three airlines: LAN (Latin American Networks), Oceanair and TAM Airlines have international subsidiaries with Chile as the central operation along with Peru, Ecuador, Argentina and some operations in the Republic and TAM with TAM Mercosur have a base in Asuncion, Paraguay. Avianca have the control of Oceanair, VIP Airlines and also have an estrategic alliance with TACA.Regulatory considerationsNationalFile:Garuda Indonesia Air Lines at Narita 200507.jpg|thumb|left|Indonesia 747-400 parked at International Airport. This Indonesian carrier is wholly owned by the Indonesian GovernmentMany countries have airlines that the government owns and operates. Fully private airlines are subject to a great deal of government regulation for economic, political, and safety concerns. For instance, governments often intervene to halt airline labor actions in order to protect the free flow of people, communications, and goods between different regions without compromising safety.The United States, Australia, and to a lesser extent Brazil, Mexico, India, the United Kingdom and Japan have deregulated their airlines. In the past, these governments dictated airfares, route networks, and other operational requirements for each airline. Since deregulation, airlines have been largely free to negotiate their own operating arrangements with different airports, enter and exit routes easily, and to levy airfares and supply flights according to market demand.File:Cyprus airways a330.jpg|thumb|Airways national airline of CyprusThe entry barriers for new airlines are lower in a deregulated market, and so the U.S. has seen hundreds of airlines start up (sometimes for only a brief operating period). This has produced far greater competition than before deregulation in most markets, and average fares tend to drop 20% or more. The added competition, together with pricing freedom, means that new entrants often take market share with highly reduced rates that, to a limited degree, full service airlines must match. This is a major constraint on profitability for established carriers, which tend to have a higher cost base.As a result, profitability in a deregulated market is uneven for most airlines. These forces have caused some major airlines to go out of business, in addition to most of the poorly established new entrants.InternationalFile:SIA Airbus A380, 9V-SKA, SIN 8.jpg|thumb|Airlines A380 lands at Changi Airport. Singapore Airlines was the first international airline to operate the A380, the worlds largest passenger airliner.(Singapore Airlines - News Releases)Groups such as the Civil Aviation Organization establish worldwide standards for safety and other vital concerns. Most international air traffic is regulated by bilateral agreements between countries, which designate specific carriers to operate on specific routes. The model of such an agreement was the Agreement between the US and UK following World War II, which designated airports to be used for transatlantic flights and gave each government the authority to nominate carriers to operate routes.Bilateral agreements are based on the of the air, a group of generalized traffic rights ranging from the freedom to overfly a country to the freedom to provide domestic flights within a country (a very rarely granted right known as cabotage). Most agreements permit airlines to fly from their home country to designated airports in the other country: some also extend the freedom to provide continuing service to a third country, or to another destination in the other country while carrying passengers from overseas.In the 1990s, skies agreements became more common. These agreements take many of these regulatory powers from state governments and open up international routes to further competition. Open skies agreements have met some criticism, particularly within the European Union, whose airlines would be at a comparative disadvantage with the United States because of cabotage restrictions.Economic considerationsFile:Tran12G7.jpg|thumb|Trippe, the founder of American World Airways, surveying his globe. The collapse of Pan Am, an airline often credited for shaping the international airline industry, in December 1991 highlighted the financial complexities faced by major airline companies.Historically, air travel has survived largely through state support, whether in the form of equity or subsidies. The airline industry as a whole has made a cumulative loss during its 100-year history, once the costs include subsidies for aircraft development and airport construction.(Wings of Desire, Guardian, Thursday February 23, 2006)(Airlines and the canine features of unprofitable industries, Financial Times, September 27, 2005)One argument is that externalities, such as higher growth due to global mobility, outweigh the microeconomic losses and justify continuing government intervention. A historically high level of government intervention in the airline industry can be seen as part of a wider political consensus on strategic forms of transport, such as highways and railways, both of which receive public funding in most parts of the world. Profitability is likely to improve in the future as privatization continues and more competitive low-cost carriers proliferate.Although many countries continue to operate state-owned or parastatal airlines, many large airlines today are privately owned and are therefore governed by microeconomic principles in order to maximize shareholder profit. Top Airline Groups by Revenue for 2010, source : Airline Business August 2011, Flightglobal Data ResearchTicket revenueAirlines assign prices to their services in an attempt to maximize profitability. The pricing of airline tickets has become increasingly complicated over the years and is now largely determined by computerized management systems.Because of the complications in scheduling flights and maintaining profitability, airlines have many loopholes that can be used by the knowledgeable traveler. Many of these airfare secrets are becoming more and more known to the general public, so airlines are forced to make constant adjustments.Most airlines use differentiated pricing, a form of discrimination, in order to sell air services at varying prices simultaneously to different segments. Factors influencing the price include the days remaining until departure, the booked load factor, the forecast of total demand by price point, competitive pricing in force, and variations by day of week of departure and by time of day. Carriers often accomplish this by dividing each cabin of the aircraft (first, business and economy) into a number of classes for pricing purposes.A complicating factor is that of origin-destination control (O&D control). Someone purchasing a ticket from Melbourne to Sydney (as an example) for AU$200 is competing with someone else who wants to fly Melbourne to Los Angeles through Sydney on the same flight, and who is willing to pay AU$1400. Should the airline prefer the $1400 passenger, or the $200 passenger plus a possible Sydney-Los Angeles passenger willing to pay $1300? Airlines have to make hundreds of thousands of similar pricing decisions daily.File:Flughafen Frankfurt am Main.JPG|thumb|Lufthansa Boeing 747-400.The advent of advanced computerized reservations systems in the late 1970s, most notably Sabre, allowed airlines to easily perform cost-benefit analyses on different pricing structures, leading to almost perfect price discrimination in some cases (that is, filling each seat on an aircraft at the highest price that can be charged without driving the consumer elsewhere).The intense nature of airfare pricing has led to the term war to describe efforts by airlines to undercut other airlines on competitive routes. Through computers, new airfares can be published quickly and efficiently to the airlines sales channels. For this purpose the airlines use the Tariff Publishing Company (ATPCO), who distribute latest fares for more than 500 airlines to Reservation Systems across the world.The extent of these pricing phenomena is strongest in legacy carriers. In contrast, low fare carriers usually offer preannounced and simplified price structure, and sometimes quote prices for each leg of a trip separately.Computers also allow airlines to predict, with some accuracy, how many passengers will actually fly after making a reservation to fly. This allows airlines to overbook their flights enough to fill the aircraft while accounting for no-shows, but not enough (in most cases) to force paying passengers off the aircraft for lack of seats. Since an average of  of all seats are flown empty, stimulative pricing for low demand flights coupled with overbooking on high demand flights can help reduce this figure. This is especially crucial during tough economic times as airlines undertake massive cuts to ticket prices in order to retain demand.()Operating costsFile:virgin atlantic a340-600 g-vyou arp.jpg|thumb|An A340-600 of Atlantic Airways. In October 2008, Virgin Atlantic offered to combine its operations with BMI in an effort to reduce operating costs.()Full-service airlines have a high level of fixed and operating costs in order to establish and maintain air services: labor, fuel, airplanes, engines, spares and parts, IT services and networks, airport equipment, airport handling services, sales distribution, catering, training, insurance and other costs. Thus all but a small percentage of the income from ticket sales is paid out to a wide variety of external providers or internal cost centers.Moreover, the industry is structured so that airlines often act as tax collectors. Airline fuel is untaxed because of a series of treaties existing between countries. Ticket prices include a number of fees, taxes and surcharges beyond the control of airlines. Airlines are also responsible for enforcing government regulations. If airlines carry passengers without proper documentation on an international flight, they are responsible for returning them back to the original country.Analysis of the 19921996 period shows that every player in the air transport chain is far more profitable than the airlines, who collect and pass through fees and revenues to them from ticket sales. While airlines as a whole earned 6% return on capital employed (2-3.5% less than the cost of capital), airports earned 10%, catering companies 10-13%, handling companies 11-14%, aircraft lessors 15%, aircraft manufacturers 16%, and global distribution companies more than 30%. (Source: Spinetta, 2000, quoted in Doganis, 2002)The widespread entrance of a new breed of low cost airlines beginning at the turn of the century has accelerated the demand that full service carriers control costs. Many of these low cost companies emulate Southwest Airlines in various respects, and like Southwest, they are able to eke out a consistent profit throughout all phases of the business cycle.As a result, a shakeout of airlines is occurring in the U.S. and elsewhere. Airlines, Airlines (twice), Airways (twice), Delta Air Lines, and Airlines have all declared 11 bankruptcy. Some argue that it would be far better for the industry as a whole if a wave of actual closures were to reduce the number of undead airlines competing with healthy airlines while being artificially protected from creditors via bankruptcy law. On the other hand, some have pointed out that the reduction in capacity would be short lived given that there would be large quantities of relatively new aircraft that bankruptcies would want to get rid of and would re-enter the market either as increased fleets for the survivors or the basis of cheap planes for new startups.Where an airline has established an engineering base at an airport then there may be considerable economic advantages in using that same airport as a preferred focus (or hub) for its scheduled flights.Assets and financingFile:Maslounge.jpg|thumb|The Golden Lounge of Airlines at Lumpur International Airport (KLIA). The airline has ownership of special slots at KLIA giving it a competitive edge over other airlines operating at the airport.Airline financing is quite complex, since airlines are highly leveraged operations. Not only must they purchase (or lease) new airliner bodies and engines regularly, they must make major long-term fleet decisions with the goal of meeting the demands of their markets while producing a fleet that is relatively economical to operate and maintain. Compare Southwest Airlines and their reliance on a single airplane type (the 737 and derivatives), with the now defunct Air Lines which operated 17 different aircraft types, each with varying pilot, engine, maintenance, and support needs.A second financial issue is that of hedging oil and fuel purchases, which are usually second only to labor in its relative cost to the company. However, with the current high fuel prices it has become the largest cost to an airline. Legacy airlines, compared with new entrants, have been hit harder by rising fuel prices partly due to the running of older, less fuel efficient aircraft.( While hedging instruments can be expensive, they can easily pay for themselves many times over in periods of increasing fuel costs, such as in the 20002005 period.In view of the congestion apparent at many international airports, the ownership of slots at certain airports (the right to take-off or land an aircraft at a particular time of day or night) has become a significant tradable asset for many airlines. Clearly take-off slots at popular times of the day can be critical in attracting the more profitable business traveler to a given airlines flight and in establishing a competitive advantage against a competing airline.If a particular city has two or more airports, market forces will tend to attract the less profitable routes, or those on which competition is weakest, to the less congested airport, where slots are likely to be more available and therefore cheaper. For example, National Airport attracts profitable routes due partly to its congestion, leaving less-profitable routes to International Airport and International Airport.Other factors, such as surface transport facilities and onward connections, will also affect the relative appeal of different airports and some long distance flights may need to operate from the one with the longest runway. For example, Airport is the preferred airport for most of Manhattan due to its proximity, while long-distance routes must use F. Kennedy International Airports longer runways. Liberty International Airport has the worst surface transport options to most of Manhattan, so most of its use is due to the connections offered by its dominant tenant carrier.Airline partnershipsFile:JA8941-oneworld-01.jpg|thumb|A Airlines Boeing 777-300 with special Oneworld livery. Oneworld is the third largest airline alliance after Alliance and SkyTeam.Codesharing is the most common type of airline partnership; it involves one airline selling tickets for another airlines flights under its own airline code. An early example of this was Japan Airlines (JAL) codesharing partnership with Aeroflot in the 1960s on TokyoMoscow flights; Aeroflot operated the flights using Aeroflot aircraft, but JAL sold tickets for the flights as if they were JAL flights. This practice allows airlines to expand their operations, at least on paper, into parts of the world where they cannot afford to establish bases or purchase aircraft. Another example was the Austrian Sabena partnership on the ViennaBrusselsNew York/JFK route during the late 60s, using a Sabena 707 with Austrian livery.Since airline reservation requests are often made by city-pair (such as show me flights from Chicago to Dsseldorf), an airline who is able to codeshare with another airline for a variety of routes might be able to be listed as indeed offering a ChicagoDsseldorf flight. The passenger is advised however, that airline no. 1 operates the flight from say Chicago to Amsterdam, and airline no. 2 operates the continuing flight (on a different airplane, sometimes from another terminal) to Dsseldorf. Thus the primary rationale for code sharing is to expand ones service offerings in city-pair terms so as to increase sales.A more recent development is the alliance, which became prevalent in late 1990s. These alliances can act as virtual mergers to get around government restrictions. Groups of airlines such as the Alliance, Oneworld and SkyTeam coordinate their passenger service programs (such as lounges and programs), offer special interline tickets, and often engage in extensive codesharing (sometimes systemwide). These are increasingly integrated business combinationssometimes including cross-equity arrangementsin which products, service standards, schedules, and airport facilities are standardized and combined for higher efficiency. One of the first airlines to start an alliance with another airline was KLM, who partnered with Airlines. Both airlines later entered the SkyTeam alliance after the fusion of KLM and Air France in 2004.Often the companies combine IT operations, or purchase fuel and aircraft as a bloc in order to achieve higher bargaining power. However, the alliances have been most successful at purchasing invisible supplies and services, such as fuel. Airlines usually prefer to purchase items visible to their passengers to differentiate themselves from local competitors. If an airlines main domestic competitor flies Boeing airliners, then the airline may prefer to use Airbus aircraft regardless of what the rest of the alliance chooses.Fuel hedgingSouthwest is credited with maintaining strong business profits between 1999 and the early 2000s due to its fuel hedging policy.  Looking at the annual reports many other airlines are replicating Southwests hedging policy to control their fuel costs.Environmental impactsFile:Contrails southeast lrg.gif|thumb|MODIS tracking of contrails generated by air traffic over the southeastern United States on January 29, 2004.Aircraft engines emit pollution, gases and particulate emissions, and contribute to warming()() and dimming.()Modern turbofan and turboprop engines are considerably more fuel-efficient and less polluting than earlier models. However, despite this, the rapid growth of travel in recent years contributes to an increase in total pollution attributable to aviation, offsetting some of the reductions achieved by automobiles. In the EU gas emissions from aviation increased by 87% between 1990 and 2006.()CO2 emissions from the jet fuel burned per passenger on an average  airline flight is about 353 kilograms (776 pounds).() Loss of natural habitat potential associated with the jet fuel burned per passenger on a  airline flight is estimated to be 250 square meters (2700 square feet).()In the context of purported climate change and oil, there is a debate about possible taxation of air travel and the inclusion of aviation in an trading scheme, with a view to ensuring that the total costs of aviation are taken into account.(Including Aviation into the EU ETS: Impact on EU allowance prices ICF Consulting for DEFRA February 2006)The airline industry is responsible for about 11 percent of gases emitted by the U.S. transportation sector. Boeing estimates that biofuels could reduce flight-related greenhouse-gas emissions by 60 to 80 percent. The solution would be blending algae fuels with existing jet fuel:()* Boeing and New Zealand are collaborating with leading Brazilian biofuels maker Tecbio and Bionomic of New Zealand and other jet biofuel developers around the world.* Atlantic and Green Fund are looking into the technology as part of a biofuels initiative.()* KLM has made the first commercial flight with bio-fuel in 2009.Call signsEach operator of a scheduled or charter flight uses an airline call sign when communicating with airports or air traffic control centres. Most of these call-signs are derived from the airlines trade name, but for reasons of history, marketing, or the need to reduce ambiguity in spoken English (so that pilots do not mistakenly make navigational decisions based on instructions issued to a different aircraft), some airlines and air forces use call-signs less obviously connected with their trading name. For example, British Airways uses a Speedbird call-sign, named after the logo of its predecessor, BOAC, while SkyEurope used Relax.Airline personnelFile:Elal.b777-200.4x-ecd.arp.jpg|thumb|An Al 777 landing at London Airport. (2005)The various types of airline personnel include:Flight operations personnel including flight safety personnel.* crew, responsible for the operation of the aircraft. Flight crew members include:** Pilots (Captain and First Officer: some older aircraft also required a Engineer and or a Navigator)** attendants, (led by a purser on larger aircraft)** in-flight security personnel on some airlines (most notably Al)* Groundcrew, responsible for operations at airports. Ground crew members include:** Aerospace and avionics engineers responsible for certifying the aircraft for flight and management of aircraft maintenance*** Aerospace engineers, responsible for airframe, powerplant and electrical systems maintenance*** Avionics engineers responsible for avionics and instruments maintenance** Airframe and powerplant technicians** Electric System technicians, responsible for maintenance of electrical systems** Avionics technicians, responsible for maintenance of avionics** dispatchers** handlers** Ramp Agents** agents** Ticket agents** Passenger service agents (such as lounge employees)** Reservation agents, usually (but not always) at facilities outside the airport.Airlines follow a corporate structure where each broad area of operations (such as maintenance, flight operations(including flight safety),and passenger service) is supervised by a vice president. Larger airlines often appoint vice presidents to oversee each of theairlines hubs as well. Airlines employ lawyers to deal with regulatory procedures and other administrative tasks.Industry trendsThe pattern of ownership has been privatized in the recent years, that is, the ownership has gradually changed from governments to private and individual sectors or organizations. This occurs as regulators permit greater freedom and non-government ownership, in steps that are usually decades apart. This pattern is not seen for all airlines in all regions. The overall trend of demand has been consistently increasing. In the 1950s and 1960s, annual growth rates of 15% or more were common. Annual growth of 5-6% persisted through the 1980s and 1990s. Growth rates are not consistent in all regions, but countries with a de-regulated airline industry have more competition and greater pricing freedom. This results in lower fares and sometimes dramatic spurts in traffic growth. The U.S., Australia, Canada, Japan, Brazil, Mexico, India and other markets exhibit this trend.  The industry has been observed to be cyclical in its financial performance. Four or five years of poor earnings precede five or six years of improvement. But profitability even in the good years is generally low, in the range of 2-3% net profit after interest and tax. In times of profit, airlines lease new generations of airplanes and upgrade services in response to higher demand. Since 1980, the industry has not earned back the cost of capital during the best of times. Conversely, in bad times losses can be dramatically worse.  Buffett once said that despite all the money that has been invested in all airlines, the net profit is less than zero. He believes it is one of the hardest businesses to manage.()As in many mature industries, consolidation is a trend. Airline groupings may consist of limited bilateral partnerships, long-term, multi-faceted alliances between carriers, equity arrangements, mergers, or takeovers. Since governments often restrict ownership and merger between companies in different countries, most consolidation takes place within a country. In the U.S., over 200 airlines have merged, been taken over, or gone out of business since deregulation in 1978. Many international airline managers are lobbying their governments to permit greater consolidation to achieve higher economy and efficiency.See also* ferry* safety* complaints* timetable* Airliners.net* of North America (book)* security* rights* airline* airline* impact of aviation* Aviation Administration* planning* FlightAware* contract flight* Hyper-mobile travel* IATA  industry standards organization* carrier* flight* airline* Security AdministrationAirline related lists* codes* liveries and logos* of airlines* of accidents and incidents on commercial airliners* of airline holding companies* of airline mergers and acquisitions* of defunct airlines* of hub airports* of largest airlines* of low-cost airlines* List of national airlines* of regional airlines* of airline bankruptcies* Service Request (SSR) CodesNotesReferences# A history of the worlds airlines, R.E.G. Davies, Oxford U.P, 1964# The airline encyclopedia, 19092000. Myron J. Smith, Scarecrow Press, 2002# Flying Off Course: The Economics of International Airlines, 3rd edition. Rigas Doganis, Routledge, New York, 2002.# The Airline Business in the 21st Century. Rigas Doganis, Routledge, New York, 2001.External links* Chasing the Sun - History of commercial aviation, from PBS* Global Aviation Markets Whitepaper on global markets for airlines* Full list of Airlines of the worldaf:Lugrederybg:ca:Aerolniaspolenostda:Flyselskaberde:Fluggesellschaftes:Aerolneaeo:Flugkompanioariennegl:AeroliaKng-sko:penerbanganis:Flugflagaerealinij bendrovhu:Lgitrsasgpenerbangannl:Luchtvaartmaatschappijja:no:Flyselskapnn:Flyselskaplotniczeareaksh:Vluchjesellschaffru:simple:Airlinesr:-penerbanganfi:Lentoyhtisv:Flygfretagth:tr:Havayoluuk:ur:hng khngyi:zh:
1990
August_5
 Events* 642 &ndash; of Maserfield &ndash; of Mercia defeats and kills of Northumbria.* 910 &ndash; The last major Danish army to raid England is defeated at the of Tettenhall by the allied forces of Mercia and Wessex, led by King the Elder and Aethelred of Mercia.*1071 &ndash; wars: Italo-Normans begin a nearly-three-year siege of Bari.*1100 &ndash; Henry I is crowned King of England in Abbey.*1305 &ndash; Wallace, who led the Scottish resistance against England, is captured by the English near Glasgow and transported to London where he is put on trial and executed.*1388 &ndash; The of Otterburn, a border skirmish between the Scottish and the English in Northern England, is fought near Otterburn.*1583 &ndash; Sir Gilbert establishes the first English colony in America, at what is now Johns, Newfoundland.*1600 &ndash; The Gowrie Conspiracy against King James VI of Scotland (later to become King I of England) takes place.*1620 &ndash; The Mayflower departs from England on its first attempt to reach America.*1689 &ndash; 1,500 Iroquois attack the village of Lachine in France.*1716 &ndash; The of Petrovaradin takes place.*1735 &ndash; of the press: New York Weekly Journal writer Peter Zenger is acquitted of libel against the royal governor of New York, on the basis that what he had published was true.*1763 &ndash; War: of Bushy Run &ndash; British forces led by Bouquet defeat Pontiacs Indians at Run.*1772 &ndash; The Partition of Poland begins.*1781 &ndash; The Battle of Dogger Bank takes place.*1824 &ndash; War of Independence: Kanaris leads a Greek fleet to victory against Ottoman and Egyptian ships in the Battle of Samos.*1858 &ndash; West Field and others complete the first telegraph cable after several unsuccessful attempts. It will operate for less than a month.*1860 &ndash; XV of Sweden of Sweden-Norway is crowned king of Norway in Trondheim.*1861 &ndash; Civil War: in order to help pay for the war effort, the States government levies the first tax as part of the Act of 1861 (3% of all incomes over US $800; rescinded in 1872).*  1861   &ndash; The States Army abolishes flogging.*1862 &ndash; American Civil War: Battle of Baton Rouge &ndash; along the River near Rouge, Louisiana, Confederate troops drive Union forces back into the city.*1864 &ndash; American Civil War: the of Mobile Bay begins &ndash; at Bay near Alabama, Admiral Farragut leads a Union flotilla through Confederate defenses and seals one of the last major Southern ports.*1870 &ndash; War: the of Spicheren is fought, resulting in a Prussian victory.*1874 &ndash; Japan launches its savings system, modeled after a similar system in the Kingdom.*1882 &ndash; The Oil of New Jersey is established.*1884 &ndash; The cornerstone for the of Liberty is laid on Bedloes Island (now Liberty Island) in York Harbor.*1888 &ndash; Benz drives from Mannheim to Pforzheim and back in the first long distance automobile trip, commemorated as the Benz Memorial Route since 2008.*1901 &ndash; OConnor sets the first IAAF recognised jump world record of  The record will stand for 20 years.*1906 &ndash; Constitutional Revolution: ad-Din Shah Qajar, King of Iran, agrees to convert the government to a monarchy.*1914 &ndash; War I: the German minelayer Knigin Luise lays a minefield about  of the Estuary (Lowestoft). She is intercepted and sunk by the British light-cruiser HMS Amphion.*  1914   &ndash; In Ohio, the first electric light is installed.*1916 &ndash; World War I: of Romani &ndash; Allied forces, under the command of Murray, defeat an attacking Ottoman army under the command of Freiherr Kress von Kressenstein, securing the Canal and beginning the Ottoman retreat from the Peninsula.*1925 &ndash; Cymru is formed with the aim of disseminating knowledge of the language that is at the time in danger of dying out.*1940 &ndash; War II: the Union formally annexes Latvia.*1944 &ndash; World War II: possibly the biggest prison breakout in history occurs as 545 Japanese POWs attempt to escape outside the town of Cowra, South Wales, Australia.*  1944   &ndash; World War II: Polish insurgents liberate a German camp in Warsaw, freeing 348 Jewish prisoners.*  1944   &ndash; World War II: The Nazis begin a three-day massacre of anywhere between 40,000 and 100,000 civilians and prisoners of war in Wola, Poland.*1949 &ndash; In Ecuador, an earthquake destroys 50 towns and kills more than 6,000.*  1949   &ndash; The Gulch fire kills 13 firefighters in Montana.*1957 &ndash; Bandstand, a show dedicated to the teenage baby-boomers by playing the songs and showing popular dances of the time, debuts on the ABC television network.*1960 &ndash; Faso, then known as Upper Volta, becomes independent from France.*1962 &ndash; Mandela is jailed. He would not be released until 1990.*1963 &ndash; The States, the Kingdom, and the Union sign a nuclear test ban treaty.*1964 &ndash; War: Pierce Arrow &ndash; American aircraft from carriers  and  bomb Vietnam in retaliation for strikes against U.S. destroyers in the of Tonkin.*1965 &ndash; The War of 1965 begins as Pakistani soldiers cross the of Control dressed as locals.*1969 &ndash; program: 7 makes its closest fly-by of Mars (3,524 kilometers).*1971 &ndash; The first Islands Forum (then known as the South Pacific Forum) is held in Wellington, Zealand, with the aim of enhancing cooperation between the independent countries of the Pacific Ocean.*1974 &ndash; War: the U.S. Congress places a $1 billion dollar limit on military aid to Vietnam.*1979 &ndash; In Afghanistan, Maoists undertake an attempted military uprising.*1981 &ndash; Reagan fires 11,359 striking air-traffic controllers who ignored his order for them to return to work.*1989 &ndash; General elections are held in Nicaragua with the Front winning a majority.*1995 &ndash; The city of Knin, a significant Serb stronghold, is captured by Croatian forces during Storm. The date is celebrated in Croatia as Victory Day.*2003 &ndash; A car bomb explodes in the Indonesian capital of Jakarta outside the Hotel killing 12 and injuring 150.*2010 &ndash; Copiap mining accident occurs, trapping 33 Chilean miners approximately  below the ground.Births*1301 &ndash; of Woodstock, 1st Earl of Kent, English politician (d. 1330)*1397 &ndash; Dufay, Franco-Flemish composer and theorist (d. 1474)*1461 &ndash; King Jagiellon of Poland (d. 1506)*1540 &ndash; Justus Scaliger, French philologist and historian (d. 1609) *1623 &ndash; Cesti, Italian composer (d. 1669)*1641 &ndash; Hathorne, American magistrate (d. 1717)*1662 &ndash; James Anderson, Scottish historian (d. 1728)*1694 &ndash; Leo, Italian composer (d. 1744)*1749 &ndash; Lynch, Jr., American congressman (d. 1779)*1797 &ndash; August Kummer, German composer (d. 1879)*1802 &ndash; Henrik Abel, Norwegian mathematician (d. 1829)*1811 &ndash; Thomas, French opera composer (d. 1896)*1813 &ndash; Aasen, Norwegian poet and linguist (d. 1896)*1815 &ndash; John Eyre, English explorer (d. 1901)*1827 &ndash; da Fonseca, Brazilian statesman (d. 1892)*1828 &ndash; Queen of the Netherlands, Dutch consort of XV of Sweden (d. 1871)*1833 &ndash; Queen of Vasa, Austrian consort of of Saxony (d. 1907)*1843 &ndash; Scott Skinner, Scottish composer (d. 1927)*1844 &ndash; Yefimovich Repin, Russian painter and sculptor (d. 1930)*1850 &ndash; de Maupassant, French writer (d. 1893)*1862 &ndash; Merrick, English sideshow performer (d. 1890)*1866 &ndash; Harries, German chemist (d. 1923)*  1866   &ndash; Trott, Australian cricketer (d. 1917)*1868 &ndash; Merikanto, Finnish composer (d. 1924)*1872 &ndash; Cruz, Brazilian physician (d. 1917)*1874 &ndash; Clair Mitchell, American economist (d. 1948)*1876 &ndash; Ritter Beard, American historian (d. 1958)*1877 &ndash; Thomson, Canadian painter (d. 1917)*1880 &ndash; Rush, African-American lawyer (d. 1962)*1887 &ndash; Owen, English actor (d. 1972)*1888 &ndash; Francen, Belgian-born French actor (d. 1977)*1889 &ndash; Aiken, American writer (d. 1973)*1890 &ndash; Kleiber, Austrian conductor (d. 1956)*  1890   &ndash; Gabo, Russian sculptor (d. 1977)*1897 &ndash; Larsen, Danish politician (d. 1972)*1901 &ndash; Autant-Lara, French film director (d. 2000)*1904 &ndash; Vivian Thimann, English-born American botanist and microbiologist (d. 1997)*1906 &ndash; Huston, American director (d. 1987)*  1906   &ndash; Leontief, Russian economist, Nobel laureate (d. 1999)*  1906   &ndash; Hickson, English actress (d. 1998)*1908 &ndash; Holt, 17th Minister of Australia (d. 1967)*1910 &ndash; Coquatrix, French songwriter and music impresario (d. 1979)*1911 &ndash; Robert Taylor, American actor (d. 1969)*1912 &ndash; Pierre, French Catholic priest (d. 2007)*1914 &ndash; Baer, American actor d, 2002*  1914   &ndash; Brian, American actor (d. 1993)*  1914   &ndash; ulek, Croatian composer and conductor(d. 1986)*1918 &ndash; Drake, American actor (d. 1982)*  1918   &ndash; Oliphant, Canadian ballerina (d. 2004)*1920 &ndash; Diamond, Canadian-born American actress (d. 1985)*1922 &ndash; Tom Perry, American religious figure*1923 &ndash; Nair, Singaporean statesman (d. 2005)*1926 &ndash; Jolas, French composer*1927 &ndash; Bucht, Swedish composer and musicologist*1929 &ndash; Boros, Hungarian water polo player (d. 1988)*1930 &ndash; Armstrong, American astronaut*  1930   &ndash; Kov, Slovakian politician*  1932   &ndash; de Marez Oyens, Dutch composer (d. 1996)*1934 &ndash; Berry, American poet, writer and farmer*1934 &ndash; Gosdin, American country music singer (d. 2009)*  1934   &ndash; Johan strm, Control engineer and theorist*  1934   &ndash; Byrne, Irish broadcaster*1935 &ndash; John Saxon, American actor*1937 &ndash; Brooks, American ice hockey coach (d. 2003)*  1937   &ndash; G. Marsden, British astronomer (d. 2010)*1939 &ndash; Irene of the Netherlands*1940 &ndash; Gabriel, American football player*1941 &ndash; Clark, American film director (d. 2007)*  1941   &ndash; Moreira, Brazilian percussionist*  1941   &ndash; Kizim, Soviet cosmonaut (d. 2010)*1943 &ndash; Briles, American baseball player (d. 2005)*  1943   &ndash; Smith, American country singer and songwriter (d. 2005)*1945 &ndash; Giczy, Hungarian sprint canoer *1946 &ndash; Anderson, American actress*  1946   &ndash; Coslet, American football player and coach*  1946   &ndash; Silliman, American poet*  1946   &ndash; Slezak, American actress*  1946   &ndash; van der Linden, Dutch composer and keyboardist*1947 &ndash; Anderson, Australian entertainer (Tattoo)*  1947   &ndash; Carbo, American baseball player*  1947   &ndash; Derringer, American guitarist and vocalist*1948 &ndash; Laure, French-Canadian actress*  1948   &ndash; Clemence, English footballer*1951 &ndash; Jarratt, Australian actor*1952 &ndash; Walsh, Irish music manager*  1952   &ndash; Farag, Hungarian water polo player*1953 &ndash; Mahler, American baseball player (d. 2005)*  1953   &ndash; Sang, Australian singer*1955 &ndash; Ojeda, guitarist for Sister*1956 &ndash; Ciccoritti, Canadian film director*  1956   &ndash; McCormick, American actress*1957 &ndash; Prince, American actress*  1957   &ndash; Rohner, American actor*  1957   &ndash; David Gill, chief executive of United*1959 &ndash; Burns, English singer (Dead or Alive)*  1959   &ndash; Smear, American guitarist (Nirvana, Fighters)*1960 &ndash; Swirsky, American songwriter*1961 &ndash; Kitaen, American actress*  1961   &ndash; OConnor, American violinist*  1961   &ndash; Samarasekera, Sri Lankan cricketer*1962 &ndash; Ewing, Jamacian-born American basketball player*  1962   &ndash; de Groen, New Zealand cricketer*  1962   &ndash; Thorpe, American basketball player*1964 &ndash; Adam Yauch, American rapper (Boys)*1965 &ndash; Sakuraba, Japanese composer*1965 &ndash; Coffin, American jazz and alternative rock musician*  1965   &ndash; William Winters, American actor*1966 &ndash; Finch, American photographer and musician*1966 &ndash; Silverman, American actor*1967 &ndash; Caws, American singer (Surf)*  1967   &ndash; Lang, Austrian drummer*1968 &ndash; Clark, Canadian country singer*  1968   &ndash; Flex, American hip hop DJ*  1968   &ndash; Ishizawa, Japanese professional wrestler*  1968   &ndash; Le Pen, French politician*  1968   &ndash; Luzhny, Ukrainian footballer*  1968   &ndash; McRae, Scottish rally driver (d. 2007)*  1968   &ndash; Olerud, American baseball player*1969 &ndash; Drakes, Barbadian cricketer*  1969   &ndash; Prasad, Indian cricketer*  1969   &ndash; Volpato, Chilean actress*  1969   &ndash; Robert Scott, Australian rower*1970 &ndash; James Gunn, American filmmaker*1971 &ndash; Evil Hasselhoff, American bassist (Bloodhound Gang)*1972 &ndash; Olde Wolbers, Belgian guitarist and bassist (Factory)*  1972   &ndash; Javed, Pakistani cricketer*  1972   &ndash; Hidaka, Japanese professional wrestler*  1972   &ndash; Whitmore, Jamaican footballer*1973 &ndash; Sherk, American mixed martial artist*  1973   &ndash; Hossain, Bangladeshi cricketer*1974 &ndash; Ceccoli, Australian soccer player*  1974   &ndash; Kullinger, Swedish footballer*  1974   &ndash; Sibierski, French footballer*1975 &ndash; Cotton, English actor*  1975   &ndash; Foster, American actress*  1975   &ndash; Goldenberg, Israeli/Canadian mentalist (GoldMind)*  1975   &ndash; Goldberg, Israeli/British actor*  1975   &ndash; Mukherjee, Indian actress*  1975   &ndash; Toppinen, Finnish cellist (Apocalyptica)*  1975   &ndash; Hipgrave, British musician, freelance journalist, and businessman*1976 &ndash; Friesen, Canadian ice hockey player*  1976   &ndash; Sang-woo, South Korean actor*  1976   &ndash; Pahars, Latvian footballer*1977 &ndash; Hinske, American baseball player*  1977   &ndash; Michael Walsh, English footballer*  1977   &ndash; Mulder, American baseball player*1978 &ndash; Gevaert, Belgian sprinter*  1978   &ndash; Karantzi, Greek singer*  1978   &ndash; Faltoyano, Hungarian pornographic actress*1979 &ndash; David Healy, Northern Irish footballer*1980 &ndash; Bridge, English footballer*  1980   &ndash; Cabaas, Paraguayan footballer*  1980   &ndash; ulina, Australian footballer*  1980   &ndash; Lei, Singaporean/American pornographic actress*  1980   &ndash; Seth, Indian actor*  1980   &ndash; Umar, Maldivian footballer*  1980   &ndash; Winkleman, English actress*1981 &ndash; David Clarke, British ice hockey player*  1981   &ndash; Crawford, American baseball player*  1981   &ndash; Guay, Canadian alpine skier*  1981   &ndash; Maregwede, Zimbabwean cricketer*  1981   &ndash; Scott, American murder victim (d. 1999)*  1981   &ndash; K Shibasaki, Japanese singer*  1981   &ndash; Zion, Puerto Rican singer*  1981   &ndash; Williams, American internet celebrity*1982 &ndash; Houston, English/German rugby player*  1982   &ndash; Jones, American track and field athlete*  1982   &ndash; Pazienza, Italian footballer*  1982   &ndash; Regner, German singer*  1982   &ndash; Sell, American mixed martial artist*  1982   &ndash; Seung Min, Korean table tennis player*1983 &ndash; Hall, American football player*  1983   &ndash; Dawn Richard, American singer (Kane, Dirty Money)*1985 &ndash; Ciman, Belgian footballer*  1985   &ndash; Joy Corkrey, American singer*  1985   &ndash; Kalou, Ivorian footballer*1986 &ndash; Creamer, American golfer*  1986   &ndash; Davis, Australian singer*1987 &ndash; Belle, American pornographic actress*  1987   &ndash; DSouza, Indian actress*  1987   &ndash; Tchoumitcheva, Swiss model *1988 &ndash; Pellegrini, Italian swimmer*  1988   &ndash; McKenzie, American wrestler*1989 &ndash; Manset, French footballer*1993 &ndash; Ohgo, Japanese actress*2000 &ndash; Bond, Japanese/American singer-songwriter and drummerDeaths* 882 &ndash; King III of France (b. 863)*1063 &ndash; ap Llywelyn, of Gwynedd (b. 1007)*1364 &ndash; Kgon of Japan (b. 1313)*1572 &ndash; Luria, Palestinian Kabbalist (b. 1534)*1579 &ndash; Hosius, Polish Catholic cardinal (b. 1504)*1610 &ndash; Garca de Ramn, Spanish soldier and twice Governor of Chile (b. 1552)*1633 &ndash; George Abbot, of Canterbury (b. 1562)*1678 &ndash; Garca de Zspedes, Mexican viol player, tenor and composer (b. 1619)*1729 &ndash; Newcomen, English engineer (b. 1664)*1743 &ndash; Hervey, 2nd Baron Hervey, English statesman and writer (b. 1696)*1778 &ndash; Clmencet, French historian (b. 1703)*1792 &ndash; North, Lord North, Minister of the United Kingdom (b. 1732)*1799 &ndash; Howe, 1st Earl Howe, Navy admiral of the fleet (b. 1726)*1868 &ndash; Boucher de Crvecur de Perthes, French archaeologist (b. 1788)*1877 &ndash; Crown Prince of Sweden (b. 1799)*1880 &ndash; Ritter von Hebra, Austrian physician (b. 1816)*1895 &ndash; Engels, German philosopher (b. 1820)*1901 &ndash; Princess Royal of Great Britain and German Empress (b. 1840)*1911 &ndash; Caruthers, American baseball player (b. 1864)*1921 &ndash; Rallis, Greek politician, five times Prime Minister of Greece (b. 1844)*1923 &ndash; Jagi, Croatian Slavist (b. 1835)*1925 &ndash; Jennie Lee, American actress (b. 1848)*1929 &ndash; Fawcett, British suffragist (b. 1847)*1939 &ndash; Jankovich, Hungarian politician (b. 1865)*1944 &ndash; Turnbull, English cricketer (b. 1906)*1946 &ndash; Marx, Chancellor of Germany (b. 1863)*1952 &ndash; Moussa, Egyptian nuclear scientist (b. 1917)*1955 &ndash; Miranda, Portuguese actress and singer (b. 1909)*1957 &ndash; Otto Wieland, German chemist, Nobel Laureate (b. 1877)*1959 &ndash; Guest, English poet (b. 1881)*1960 &ndash; Meighen, 9th Minister of Canada (b. 1874)*1962 &ndash; Monroe, American actress (b. 1926)*1963 &ndash; Bacarisse, Spanish composer (b. 1898)*1964 &ndash; Ross, Canadian hockey player and executive (b. 1886)*1967 &ndash; Brdy, Hungarian water polo player (b. 1908)*1968 &ndash; Perkins American guitarist (b. 1928)*1972 &ndash; Hylton-Foster, of the British House of Commons (b. 1905)*1978 &ndash; Haines, American baseball player (b. 1893)*1980 &ndash; L. Runnels, American politician (b. 1924)*1983 &ndash; Canova, American actress (b. 1913)*  1983   &ndash; Violet Robinson, English economist (b. 1903)*1984 &ndash; Burton, Welsh actor (b. 1925)*1987 &ndash; Gamann, German politician (b. 1910)*1991 &ndash; Brown, American football coach (b. 1908)*  1991   &ndash; Honda, Japanese automotive executive (b. 1906)*1992 &ndash; Porcaro, American drummer (Toto) (b. 1954)*1994 &ndash; Avidom, Israeli composer (b. 1908)*  1994   &ndash; de Changy, Belgian racing driver (b. 1922)*1998 &ndash; Kretschmer, German U-boat commander (b. 1912)*  1998   &ndash; Zhivkov, Bulgarian dictator (b. 1911)*2000 &ndash; Buchsbaum, Austrian-born Brazilian writer and ecological activist (b. 1920)*  2000   &ndash; Crali, Italian artist associated with Futurism (b. 1910)*  2000   &ndash; Guinness, British actor (b. 1914)*2001 &ndash; Allimadi, Prime Minister of Uganda (b. 1929)*  2001   &ndash; Skase, Australian fugitive businessman (b. 1948)*2002 &ndash; Ryan Evans, American actor (b. 1982)*  2002   &ndash; Hearn, American basketball announcer (b. 1916)*  2002   &ndash; Lucentini, Italian writer (b. 1920)*  2002   &ndash; Matt Robinson, American actor (b. 1937)*2005 &ndash; Astakhova, Russian gymnast (b. 1936)*  2005   &ndash; OHora, American football coach (b. 1915)*  2005   &ndash; Roco, Philippine senator (b. 1941)*2006 &ndash; Butcher, American sled dog champion (b. 1954)*2007 &ndash; Lustiger, French Catholic Cardinal (b. 1926)*  2007   &ndash; Pitti, Romanian actor, singer and producer (b. 1943)*2008 &ndash; Neil Bartlett, English chemist, produced hexafluoroplatinate (b. 1932)*  2008   &ndash; Lindsay, Australian country and western singer-songwriter (b. 1929)*2009 &ndash; Schulberg, American screenwriter and novelist (b. 1914)*2011 &ndash; Lepper, former Polish Deputy Prime Minister (b. 1954)*  2011   &ndash; Shavershian, Australian body-builder (b. 1989) Holidays and observances* Barsi Bhagat Puran Singh (Sikhism)* Christian Day:** of Reims** Addai** Afra** of Autun** of Saint Mary Major (Catholic Church)** Emygdius** Memnius** of Northumbria** 5 (Eastern Orthodox liturgics)* Day, celebrates the independence of Faso from France in 1960.* Beer Day * The beginning of Carnival (Bogot)* Victory and Homeland Thanksgiving Day and the Day of Croatian defenders (Croatia)External links* BBC: On This Day* * On This Day in Canada----AugustusdagostoAvgustuotdagostuavqustgoeh 5 jit5augustEostdagost55srpendaostuAwstaugustAugust5august5 de agostode agusto5Augustaugustaotaugustusdi AvostLnasaLuanistynan Lnasdalde agostogan:85 555kolovozadi agosto5Agustusde augustoaugustgstagostoAgustus55zlnika5AgostioutgelawjAugustiaugustsAugust5augustus085.5Ogos 55augustusaugustusja:85e astoaugustaugustAotde augustedagostuz:5-avgust5Augustsierpniade agostoAujuaugustiqin chakra yapuy killapi 55.AugustGushtdi austu5augustavgust8.Agustuselokuutaaugusti55uct5AustosawgustAgustusde agostothng 85pimukuu pivd awousseogustus5Augustzh-yue:85Tebaxe5zh:85
2142
List_of_artificial_intelligence_projects
The following is a list of current and past notable intelligence projects.Specialized projectsBrain simulation* Brain Project, an attempt to create a synthetic brain by reverse-engineering the mammalian brain down to the molecular level.* HNeT (Holographic Neural Technology), a technology by AND Corporation (Artificial Neural Devices) based on non linear phase coherence/decoherence principles.* Temporal Memory, a technology by Numenta to capture and replicate the properties of the neocortex.Cognitive architectures* CALO, a DARPA-funded, 25-institution effort to integrate numerous intelligence approaches (language processing, recognition, vision, logic, planning, reasoning, numerous forms of learning) into an AI assistant that learns to help manage your office environment.* SHIAI (Semi Human Instinctive Artificial Intelligence), an AI methodology based on the use of semi-human instincts, developed at Azad University in 2004.* Woman, the oldest continuous form of virtual life  a chatterbot, virtual reality, artificial intelligence, video game, and virtual human.* OpenCog, an open-source framework for General Intelligence designed primarily to support a particular Cognitive Architecture known as CogPrime.* LIDA, a Java framework for General Intelligence developed at the University of Memphis, implementing a cognitive architecture based on Workspace Theory.Games* Chinook, a computer program that plays draughts; the first to win the world champion title in the competition against humans.* Deep Blue, a chess-playing computer developed by IBM which beat Kasparov in 1997.* FreeHAL, a self-learning conversation simulator (Chatterbot) which uses semantic nets to organize its knowledge in order to imitate a very close human behavior within conversations.* Poki, research into computer poker by the of Alberta.* TD-Gammon, a program that learned to play world-class backgammon partly by playing against itself (difference learning with networks).Knowledge and reasoning* Cyc, an attempt to assemble an ontology and database of everyday knowledge, enabling human-like reasoning.* Eurisko, a language by Lenat for solving problems which consists of heuristics, including heuristics for how to use and change its heuristics.* Mycin, an early medical expert system.* Mind Common Sense, a project based at the Media Lab to build a large common sense base from online contributions.* Questsin, uses by Example and features a dictionary, knowledge base, repository, reference, and thesaurus.* SNePS, a simultaneously a logic-based, frame-based, and network-based knowledge representation, reasoning, and acting system.* Watson, a answering system being developed by IBM capable of playing the Jeopardy! gameshow.* P.A.N., the first publicly available text analyzer, with comprehensive intelligence currently being developed.Motion and manipulation* Cog, a robot developed by MIT to study theories of science and artificial intelligence, now discontinued.* Grand Challenge 5  Architecture of Brain and Mind, a UK attempt to understand and model natural intelligence at various levels of abstraction, demonstrating results in a succession of increasingly sophisticated working robots.Natural language processing* AIML, an XML dialect for creating language software agents.* A.L.I.C.E., an award-winning language processing chatterbot.* ELIZA, a famous 1966 computer program by Weizenbaum, which parodied therapy.* InfoTame, a text analysis search engine originally developed by the KGB for sorting  communications intercepts.* Jabberwacky, a chatterbot by Carpenter, aiming to simulate a natural human chat.* KAR-Talk, a chatterbot by I.-A.Industrie.* Intelligent Computer, an artificial intelligence software included in the CEPC 230 KARs computer from Continental Edison.* PARRY, another early famous chatterbot, written in 1972 by Kenneth Colby, attempting to simulate a paranoid schizophrenic.* Proverb, a system that can solve crossword puzzles better than most humans.(Proverb: The probabilistic cruciverbalist (AAAI99 Outstanding Paper Award). By Greg A. Keim, Noam Shazeer, Michael L. Littman, Sushant Agarwal, Catherine M. Cheves, Joseph Fitzgerald, Jason Grosland, Fan Jiang, Shannon Pollard, and Karl Weinmeister. 1999. In Proceedings of the Sixteenth National Conference on Artificial Intelligence, 710-717. Menlo Park, Calif.: AAAI Press.)* SHRDLU, an early natural language processing computer program developed by Winograd at MIT from 1968 to 1970.* START, the worlds first web-based question answering system, developed at the MIT CSAIL.* SYSTRAN, a translation technology by a company of the same name, used by Yahoo!, AltaVista and Google, among others.* Texai, an open source project to create artificial intelligence, starting with a bootstrap English dialog system that intelligently acquires knowledge and behaviors.Planning* O-Plan, a project to provide a modular and flexible planning and control system using AI, at AIAI, of Edinburgh.Other* Kreator, an optimization problem solving software by Intelligentics that uses A.I. techniques.* OpenAIR, a routing and communication protocol based on a publish-subscribe architecture, built especially for A.I. research.*SEAS (Environment for Analysis and Simulations), a model of the real world used by security and the US Defense Department that uses simulation and AI to predict and evaluate future events and courses of action.(The Register article Sentient world: war games on the grandest scale published 23 June 2007)Multipurpose projectsSoftware libraries* dANN,(dANN Homepage) a freely available AI library implemented in Java, implementing graph theory, ANN, GA, Chains, graphical models (networks, HMM), etc.* ELKI,(ELKI Homepage) a research project and software framework with numerous mining algorithms (in particular analysis and outlier detection) and index structures by the Maximilian University of Munich.* FRDCSA,(FRDCSA Homepage) an attempt to package and integrate all FOSS AI systems for GNU+Linux-based systems.* I-X, a systems integration architecture project for the creation of intelligent systems at AIAI, of Edinburgh.* RapidMiner, an environment for learning and mining, developed by the University of Technology.* Weka, a free implementation of numerous machine learning algorithms in Java.* Pogamut,(Pogamut Homepage) a free platform for Java AI development in games, developed by the University in PragueCloud services* Applied, a web based mining environment.See also* of cognitive architectures* in artificial intelligenceExternal links* SourceForge AI projectsReferences(
2147
Armour
Image:3ACRPatrol(OIF3).jpg|thumb|right|300px|U.S. Army soldiers wearing vests, accompanied by an armoured Bradley.Armour or armor (see spelling differences) is protective covering used to prevent damage from being inflicted to an object, individual or a vehicle through use of direct contact weapons or projectiles, usually during combat, or from damage caused by a potentially dangerous environment or action (e.g., cycling, sites of construction works). armour is used to protect soldiers, and animals such as horses (the application for the latter called barding). armour is used on warships and fighting vehicles.EtymologyThe word armour came into use in the Middle Ages as a borrowing from the French. It is dated from 1297, as a mail, defensive covering worn in combat from Old French armeure, itself derived from the Latin armatura arms and/or equipment with the root arma arms or gear.PersonalArmour has been used throughout history. It has been made from a variety of materials; from rudimentary leather protection, personal armour evolved to Mail and full plated suits of armour. For much of history the manufacture of metal armour in Europe has dominated the technology and employment of armour. Armour drove the development of many important technologies of the Ancient World, including wood lamination, mining, metal refining, vehicle manufacture, leather processing, and later decorative metal working. Its production was influential in the revolution, and influenced commercial development of metallurgy and engineering.  Armour was the single most influential factor in the development of firearms that revolutionised warfare.HistoryImage:Mycenaean armour 1400BC.jpg|thumb|The panoply, Mycenaean Greek armour, 1400 BCSignificant factors in the development of armour include the economic and technological necessities of armour production. For instance, plate armour first appeared in Medieval Europe when water-powered trip hammers made the formation of plates faster and cheaper. Also, modern militaries usually do not equip their forces with the best armour available, since it would be prohibitively expensive. At times the development of armour has run parallel to the development of increasingly effective weaponry on the battlefield, with armourers seeking to create better protection without sacrificing mobility.Well known armour types in history include the hamata, squamata, and the segmentata of the legions, the mail hauberk of the early medieval age, and the full steel plate harness worn by later Medieval and Renaissance knights, and breast and back plates worn by heavy cavalry in several European countries until the first year of World War I (191415). The samurai warriors of feudal Japan utilized many types of armour for hundreds of years up to the 19th century.EarlyCuirasses and helmets were manufactured in Japan as early as the 4th century.(Farris 1998, p. 75)Tank, worn by foot soldiers and keik, worn by horsemen were both pre-samurai types of early armour constructed from iron plates connected together by leather thongs. Japanese lamellar armour (keiko) passed through Korea and reached Japan around the 5th century.(Robinson 2002, p. 10) These early Japanese lamellar armours took the form of a sleeveless jacket and a helmet.(Robinson 2002, pp. 169170)Armour did not always cover all of the body; sometimes no more than a helmet and leg plates where worn. The rest of the body was generally protected by means of a large shield. Examples of armies equipping their troops in this fashion were the Aztecs (16th century DC), and the hoplites in Ancient Greece.(Fagan 2004, )In East Asia many types of armour were commonly used at different times by various cultures including, scale armour, lamellar armour, armour, mail, mail, armour and brigandine. Around the dynastic Tang, Song, and early Ming Period, cuirasses and plates (mingguangjia) were also used, with more elaborate versions for officers in war. The Chinese, during that time used partial plates for important body parts instead of covering their whole body since too much plate armour hinders their martial arts movement. The Other body parts were covered in cloth, leather, lamellar, and/or Mountain pattern. In pre-Qin dynasty times, leather armour was made out of various animals, with more exotic ones such as the rhinoceros.Mail, sometimes called chainmail, made of interlocking iron rings is believed to have first appeared some time after 300 BC. Its invention is credited to the Celts, the Romans were thought to have adopted their design.(Gabriel 2007, p. 79)Gradually, small additional plates or discs of iron were added to the mail to protect vulnerable areas. Hardened leather and splinted construction were used for arm and leg pieces. The of plates was developed, an armour made of large plates sewn inside a textile or leather coat.Early plate in Italy, and elsewhere in the 13th15th century were made of iron. Iron armour could be carburised or case hardened to give a surface of harder steel.(Williams 2003, pp. 740741.) Plate armour became cheaper than mail by the 15th century as it required much less labour and labour had become much more expensive after the Death, though it did require larger furnaces to produce larger blooms. Mail continued to be used to protect those joints which could not be adequately protected by plate, such as the armpit, crook of the elbow and groin. Another advantage of plate was that a lance rest could be fitted to the breast plate.(Williams 2003, p. 55)The small skull cap evolved into a bigger true helmet, the bascinet, as it was lengthened downward to protect the back of the neck and the sides of the head. Additionally, several new forms of fully enclosed helmets were introduced in the late 14th century.Probably the most recognised style of armour in the World became the armour associated with the knights of the European Middle Ages, but continuing to the early 17th century of Enlightenment in all European countries.By about 1400 the full harness of plate armour had been developed in armouries of Lombardy(Williams 2003, p. 53) Heavy cavalry dominated the battlefield for centuries in part because of their armour.In the early 15th century, advances in weaponry allowed infantry to defeat armoured knights on the battlefield. The quality of the metal used in armour deteriorated as armies became bigger and armour was made thicker, necessitating breeding of larger cavalry horses. If during the 1415th centuries armour seldom weighed more than 15 kg, then by the late 16th century it weighed 25 kg.(Williams 2003, p. 916) The increasing weight and thickness of late 16th century armour therefore gave substantial resistance.In the early years of low velocity firearms, full suits of armour, or breast plates actually stopped bullets fired from a modest distance. Crossbow bolts, if still used, would seldom penetrate good plate, nor would any bullet unless fired from close range. In effect, rather than making plate armour obsolete, the use of firearms stimulated the development of plate armour into its later stages. For most of that period, it allowed horsemen to fight while being the targets of defending arquebuseers without being easily killed. Full suits of armour were actually worn by generals and princely commanders right up to the second decade of the 18th century. It was the only way they could be mounted and survey the overall battlefield with safety from distant musket fire.The horse was afforded protection from lances and infantry weapons by steel plate barding. This gave the horse protection and enhanced the visual impression of a mounted knight. Late in the era, elaborate barding was used in parade armour.LaterGradually starting in the mid-16th century, one plate element after another was discarded to save weight for foot soldiers.Back and breast plates continued to be used throughout the entire period of the 18th century and through Napoleonic times, in many European (heavy) cavalry units, until the early 20th century. From their introduction, muskets could pierce plate armour, so cavalry had to be far more mindful of the fire. In Japan armour continued to be used until the end of the samurai era, with the last major fighting in which armour was used happening in 1868.(Robinson 1951, )Samurai armour had one last short lived use in 1877 during the Rebellion(Robinson 2002, p. 208)Though the age of the knight was over, armour continued to be used in many capacities. Soldiers in the American Civil War bought iron and steel vests from peddlers (both sides had considered but rejected body armour for standard issue). The effectiveness of the vests varied widely- some successfully deflected bullets and saved lives, but others were poorly made and resulted in tragedy for the soldiers. In any case the vests were abandoned by many soldiers due to their weight on long marches as well as the stigma they got for being cowards from their fellow troops.(Stewart, pp.745)At the start of World War I, thousands of the French Cuirassiers rode out to engage the German Cavalry who likewise used helmets and armour. By that period, the shiny armour plate was covered in dark paint and a canvas wrap covered their elaborate Napoleonic style helmets. Their armour was meant to protect only against sabres and light lances. The cavalry had to beware of high velocity rifles and guns like the foot soldiers, who at least had a trench to protect them.PresentToday, vests, euphemistically known as a jacket, made of ballistic cloth (e.g. kevlar, dyneema, twaron, spectra etc.) and ceramic or metal plates are common among police forces, security staff, corrections officers and some branches of the military.The US Army has adopted body armour, which uses Enhanced Small Arms Protective Inserts (E-S.A.P.I) in the chest, sides and back of the armour. Each plate is rated to stop a range of ammunition including 3 hits from a NATO AP round at a range of , though accounts in Iraq and Afghanistan tell of soldiers shot as many as seven times in the chest without penetration. Skin body armour is another ballistic vest which is currently in testing with mixed results.Despite advances in the protection offered by ballistic armour against projectiles, as the name implies, modern ballistic body armour is much less impervious to stabbing weapons unless they are augmented with anti-knife/anti-stab armour (usually a form of mail). Other types The first ships protected by iron armour were Kobuksons built in the early 15th century.The first modern production technology for armour plating was used by navies in the construction of the warship, reaching its pinnacle of development with the battleship. It was also naval engineers that constructed the first tanks during World War I, giving rise to fighting vehicles. Aerial armour has been used to protect pilots and aircraft systems since the Second World War.In modern ground forces usage, the meaning of armour has expanded to include the role of troops in combat. After the evolution of warfare, infantry were mounted in armoured fighting vehicles and replaced infantry in many situations. In modern armoured warfare, armoured units equipped with tanks and fighting vehicles serve the historic role of both the battle cavalry, cavalry and dragoons, and belong to the armoured branch. History  Ships Image:Turtle_boat.jpg|thumb|upright|Kobukson, iron armoured shipleft|thumb|Warrior during her third commission between 1867 and 1871.The first ships protected by iron armour were Kobuksons built in the early 15th century.The first ironclad battleship, with iron armour over a wooden hull, La Gloire, was launched by the Navy in 1859;(Sondhaus, pp.734) she prompted the British Navy to build a counter. The following year they launched Warrior, which was twice the size and had iron armour over an iron hull. After the first battle between two ironclads took place in 1862 during the Civil War, it became clear that the ironclad had replaced the unarmoured line-of-battle ship as the most powerful warship afloat.(Sondhaus, p. 86)Ironclads were designed for several roles, including as high seas battleships, coastal defence ships, and long-range cruisers. The rapid evolution of warship design in the late 19th century transformed the ironclad from a wooden-hulled vessel which carried sails to supplement its steam engines into the steel-built, turreted battleships and cruisers familiar in the 20th century. This change was pushed forward by the development of heavier naval guns (the ironclads of the 1880s carried some of the heaviest guns ever mounted at sea), more sophisticated steam engines, and advances in metallurgy which made steel shipbuilding possible.The rapid pace of change in the ironclad period meant that many ships were obsolete as soon as they were complete, and that naval tactics were in a state of flux. Many ironclads were built to make use of the ram or the torpedo, which a number of naval designers considered the crucial weapons of naval combat. There is no clear end to the ironclad period, but towards the end of the 1890s the term ironclad dropped out of use. New ships were increasingly constructed to a standard pattern and designated battleships or cruisers. Trains thumb|upright|An armoured train from 1915trains saw use during the 19th century in the Civil War (18611865), the War (18701871), the First and Second Boer Wars (188081 and 18991902), the First (19141918) and Second World Wars (19391945) and the Indochina War (19461954). The most intensive use of armoured trains was during the Civil War (19181920).During the Boer War on 15 November 1899, Churchill, then a war-correspondent, was travelling on board an armoured train when it was ambushed by Boer commandos. Churchill and many of the trains garrison were captured, though many others escaped, including wounded placed on the trains engine. Armoured fighting vehicles Towards the end of World War I, armies on both sides were experimenting with plate armour as protection against shrapnel and ricocheting projectiles. The first proposal for a tank was by the Austrian Oberleutenant Burstyn who, in 1911, proposed a design for motor artillery (Motorengeschtz) with a turret, but his design never progressed beyond a German patent in 1912.(DiNardo 1986, )Amoured cars were put into use by the British on the Western Front. Initially an innovation to aid the recovery of downed pilots, they were sidelined when the front became static. They continued to be used in the more open Middle East battlefields.Tank or landship development, originally conducted by the British Navy under the auspices of the Committee was sponsored by the Lord of the Admiralty, Churchill and proceeded through a number of prototypes culminating in the I tank prototype, named Mother.(Willmott 2003, ) The first tank to engage in battle was designated D1, a British Mark I, during the of Flers-Courcelette (part of the Somme Offensive) on 15 September 1916.(Regan 1993, p.12)In contrast to World War II, Germany fielded very few tanks during WWI, with only 15 of the A7V type being produced in Germany during the war.(Willmott 2003, p. 222) Most German tanks were captured British ones. The first tank versus tank action took place on 24 April 1918 at Battle of Villers-Bretonneux, when three British Mark IVs met an advance of three German A7Vs, supported by infantry. Tanks were knocked out on both sides, but the German attack failed and they retreated.Mechanical problems, poor mobility and piecemeal tactical deployment limited the military significance of the tank in World War I and the tank did not fulfil its promise of rendering trench warfare obsolete. Nonetheless, it was clear to military thinkers on both sides that tanks would play a significant role in future conflicts.( Aircraft The development of effective artillery before the Second World War meant that the pilots, once the knights of the air during the First World War were left far more vulnerable to ground fire. This not only created the requirement for the introduction of the cockpit armour plating that eventually came to be known variously as the bucket or the bathtub, but also the design of such aircraft as the Il-2 which also were heavily armoured to protect the fuel and engine, allowing much greater survivability during ground assaults. Present File:Abrams-transparent.png|thumb|right|The U.S. Militarys Abrams MBT uses composite, reactive, and armourTank armour has progressed from the Second World War armour forms, now incorporating not only harder composites, but also armour designed to defeat charges. As a result of this, the battle tank (MBT) conceived in the War era can survive multiple RPG strikes with minimal effect on the crew or the operation of the vehicle. The tanks that were the last descendants of the cavalry during the Second World War have almost completely disappeared from the worlds militaries due to increased lethality of the weapons available to the vehicle-mounted infantry.The personnel carrier (APC) is a relatively recent development, stemming from trials and experiences during the Second World War. The APC allows the safe and rapid movement of infantry in a combat zone, minimising casualties and maximising mobility. APCs are fundamentally different from the previously used armoured half-tracks in that they offer a higher level of protection from artillery burst fragments, and greater mobility in more terrain types. The basic APC design was substantially expanded to an fighting vehicle (IFV) when properties of an armoured personnel carrier and a tank were combined in one vehicle.Naval armour has fundamentally changed from the Second World War doctrine of thicker plating to defend against shells, bombs and torpedos. Passive defence naval armour for use against shells and other projectile weapons has almost completely disappeared on modern warships. It has been replaced by systems designed to detect and evade, or in the case of the missiles, to destroy threats, including extensive use of radar, sonar and warfare.Although the role of the ground attack aircraft significantly diminished after the War, it re-emerged during the War, and in the recognition of this, the US Air Force authorised the design and production of what was later to become the A-10 dedicated anti-armour and aircraft of the War.See also* vest* Battledress* Bombsuit* Cuirass* Linothorax* exoskeleton* homogeneous armour* armourNotesReferences* * * * * * * * * * * * ar:be:bg:ca:Armaduracs:Zbrojda:Rustningde:Rstung(sjandus)(combate)eo:Kirasofa:(quipement)gd:Armachdgl:Armaduraxal:ko:hr:Oklopzirahis:Herkliit:Corazzahe:lt:arvaihu:Pnclmr:nl:Harnasja:no:Rustningoc:Armadurapl:Zbrojapt:Armaduraro:Armurru:sq:Armaturasimple:Armoursl:Oklepfi:Haarniskasv:Pansartr:Zrhuk:zh:
2315
August_10
 The term the 10th of August is widely used by historians as a shorthand for the Storming of the Tuileries Palace on the 10th of August, 1792, the effective end of the French monarchy until it is restored in 1814.Events* 955 &ndash; of Lechfeld: I, Holy Roman Emperor defeats the Magyars, ending 50 years of Magyar invasion of the West. * 991 &ndash; of Maldon: the English, led by Byrhtnoth, Ealdorman of Essex, are defeated by a band of inland-raiding Vikings near Maldon in Essex.*1270 &ndash; Yekuno Amlak takes the imperial throne of Ethiopia, restoring the dynasty to power after a 100-year  Zagwe interregnum.*1316 &ndash; The Battle of Athenry takes place near Athenry during the campaign in Ireland.*1519 &ndash; Magellans five ships set sail from Seville to circumnavigate the globe. The Basque second in command Elcano will complete the expedition after Magellans death in the Philippines.*1557 &ndash; Battle of St. Quentin: Spanish victory over the French in the Habsburg-Valois Wars.*1628 &ndash; The Swedish warship  sinks in the Stockholm harbour after only about 20 minutes of her maiden voyage.*1675 &ndash; The foundation stone of the Royal Greenwich Observatory in London is laid.*1680 &ndash; The Revolt begins in Mexico.*1755 &ndash; Under the orders of Charles Lawrence, the British Army begins to forcibly deport the Acadians from Scotia to the Colonies.*1776 &ndash; Revolutionary War: word of the States Declaration of Independence reaches London.*1792 &ndash; Revolution: Storming of the Tuileries Palace &ndash; XVI of France is arrested and taken into custody as his Guards are massacred by the Parisian mob.*1793 &ndash; The du Louvre is officially opened in Paris, France.*1809 &ndash; Quito, now the capital of Ecuador, declares independence from Spain. This rebellion will be crushed on 2, 1810.*1813 &ndash; Nacional, is founded by the Chilean patriot Miguel Carrera. It is Chiles oldest and most prestigious school. Its motto is Labor Omnia Vincit, which means Work conquers all things.*1821 &ndash; Missouri is admitted as the 24th state.*1846 &ndash; The Institution is chartered by the States Congress after Smithson donates $500,000.  *1861 &ndash; Civil War: of Wilsons Creek &ndash; the war enters Missouri when a band of raw Confederate troops defeat Union forces in the southwestern part of the state. *1901 &ndash; The U.S. Steel Recognition Strike by the Association of Iron and Steel Workers begins.*1904 &ndash; War: the of the Yellow Sea between the Russian and Japanese battleship fleets takes place.*1905 &ndash; Russo-Japanese War: peace negotiations begin in New Hampshire.*1913 &ndash; Balkan War: delegates from Bulgaria, Romania, Serbia, Montenegro, and Greece sign the Treaty of Bucharest, ending the war.  *1920 &ndash; War I: Ottoman sultan VIs representatives sign the of Svres that divides up the Empire between the Allies.*1932 &ndash; A  chondrite-type meteorite breaks into at least seven pieces and lands near the town of Archie in County, Missouri. *1944 &ndash; War II: American forces defeat the last Japanese troops on Guam.  *1948 &ndash; Camera makes its television debut after being on radio for a year as Candid Microphone.  *1949 &ndash; U.S. President S. Truman signs the National Security Act Amendment, streamlining the defense agencies of the United States government, and replacing the Department of War with the States Department of Defense. *1954 &ndash; At Massena, New York, the groundbreaking ceremony for the Lawrence Seaway is held. *1961 &ndash; First use in War of the Orange by the U.S. Army.*1969 &ndash; A day after murdering Tate and four others, members of Mansons cult kill and Rosemary LaBianca.*1971  &ndash; The for American Baseball Research is founded in New York.*1977 &ndash; In New York, 24-year-old postal employee Berkowitz (Son of Sam) is arrested for a series of killings in the York City area over the period of one year. *1978 &ndash; Three members of the Ulrich family are killed in an accident. This leads to the Pinto litigation.*1981 &ndash; of Adam Walsh:  the head of Walshs son is found. This inspires the creation of the television series Most Wanted.*1988 &ndash; American internment: U.S. President Reagan signs the Liberties Act of 1988, providing $20,000 payments to Americans who were either interned in or relocated by the States during War II.*1990 &ndash; The Magellan space probe reaches Venus. *  1990   &ndash; More than 127 Muslims are killed in North East Lanka by paramilitary troops. *1993 &ndash; An earthquake measuring 7.0 on the Richter Scale hits the Island of Zealand.*1995 &ndash; City bombing: McVeigh and Nichols are indicted for the bombing. Michael Fortier pleads guilty in a plea-bargain for his testimony.*1998 &ndash; HRH Prince Billah is proclaimed the prince of Brunei with a Royal Proclamation.*2003 &ndash; The highest temperature ever recorded in the Kingdom &ndash;  in Kent. It is the first time the United Kingdom has recorded a temperature over .*  2003   &ndash; Malenchenko becomes the first person to marry in space.*2006 &ndash; Scotland Yard disrupts a major terrorist plot to destroy aircraft traveling from the Kingdom to the States.*2009 &ndash; Twenty people are killed in Handlov, Region, in the deadliest mining disaster in Slovakias history.Births*1267 &ndash; King II of Aragon (d. 1327)*1296 &ndash; King of Bohemia (d. 1346)*1360 &ndash; Zabarella, Italian jurist (d. 1417)*1397 &ndash; II of Germany, Holy Roman Emperor (d. 1439)*1489 &ndash; Sturm von Sturmeck, German statesman and reformer (d. 1553)*1520 &ndash; of Valois, French-born Queen consort of the Scots, wife of V of Scotland (d. 1537)*1560 &ndash; Praetorius, German composer (d. 1629)*1602 &ndash; de Roberval, French mathematician (d. 1675)*1645 &ndash; Kino, Italian Catholic missionary (d. 1711)*1737 &ndash; Losenko, Russian painter (d. 1773)*1744 &ndash; Le Normant dtiolles, French daughter of de Pompadour (d. 1754)*1805 &ndash; Toldy, German-Hungarian literary critic (d. 1875)*1809 &ndash; Kirk Townsend, American naturalist (d. 1851)*1810 &ndash; Count Camillo Benso di Cavour, Italian diplomat and politician (d. 1861)*1814 &ndash; Nestl, Swiss industrialist (d. 1890)*1821 &ndash; Cooke, American financier (d. 1905)*1823 &ndash; Stowell Brown, Manx preacher (d. 1886)*1827 &ndash; Toman, Slovenian politician (d. 1870)*1839 &ndash; Stoletov, Russian physicist (d. 1896)*1845 &ndash; Qunanbaiuli, Kazakh poet (d. 1904)*1856 &ndash; Willett, English saving time advocate (d. 1915)*1860 &ndash; Narayan Bhatkhande, Indian musicologist (d. 1936)*1865 &ndash; Glazunov, Russian composer  (d. 1936)*1869 &ndash; Binyon, British poet (d. 1943)*1872 &ndash; Bill Johnson, American double-bassist (d. 1972)*1874 &ndash; Hoover, 31st of the United States (d. 1964)*1877 &ndash; Frank Marshall, American chess player (d. 1944)*1878 &ndash; Dblin, German writer (d. 1957)*1880 &ndash; L. Thornton, American businessman, philanthropist, and politician (d. 1964)*1884 &ndash; Istrati, Romanian writer (d. 1935)*1889 &ndash; Darrow, American board game creator (Monopoly) (d. 1967)*1891 &ndash; ONeill, American actor  (d. 1961)*1890 &ndash; Lewis Macdonald, Canadian politician (d. 1954)*1894 &ndash; V. Giri, Indian politician (d. 1980) *1895 &ndash; Love, Australian cricketer (d. 1969) *1897 &ndash; W. Galbreath, American businessman (d. 1988)*1898 &ndash; Haley, American actor (d. 1979)*1900 &ndash; Porritt, Baron Porritt, New Zealand politician and sprinter (d. 1994) *1902 &ndash; Shearer, Canadian actress (d. 1983)*  1902   &ndash; Siodmak, German-born English novelist and screenwriter (d. 2000)*  1902   &ndash; Tiselius, Swedish chemist, Nobel laureate (d. 1971)*1903 &ndash; Moore, American novelist (d. 1978)*1905 &ndash; Bell Thompson, American journalist (d. 1986)*1907 &ndash; Yu, Chinese Communist military leader (d. 1984)*1908 &ndash; Gonsalves, American soccer player (d. 1977)*  1908   &ndash; Erickson, Australian naturalist and botanic (d. 2009)*1909 &ndash; Fender, American luthier (d. 1991)*1911 &ndash; N. Sherwin-White, English historian (d. 1993)*1912 &ndash; Amado, Brazilian novelist (d. 2001)*1913 &ndash; Paul, German physicist, Nobel laureate (d. 1993)*  1913   &ndash; Beery, Jr., American actor (d. 1994)*1914 &ndash; Corey, American actor (d. 2002)*  1914   &ndash; Menditeguy, Argentine racing driver (d. 1973)*1919 &ndash; Vierny, French cinematographer (d. 2001)*1920 &ndash; Holzman, American basketball coach (d. 1998)*1923 &ndash; Fleming, American actress*  1923   &ndash; Ridgway, English cricketer*1924 &ndash; Hyer, American actress*  1924   &ndash; Buckingham, British romance novelist*1927 &ndash; Washington, American actor (d. 1988)*1928 &ndash; Dean, American singer and businessman (d. 2010)*  1928   &ndash; Mercurio, American-born Australian actor (d. 2010)*  1928   &ndash; Eddie Fisher, American singer (d. 2010)*1932 &ndash; Rosales, Filipino cardinal and Archbishop of Manila*1933 &ndash; Brunson, American poker player*  1933   &ndash; Colavito,  American baseball player*  1933   &ndash; Duckworth, English mechanical engineer (Cosworth) (d. 2005)*1937 &ndash; Sobchak, Russian politician*1939 &ndash; OMara, British actress*1940 &ndash; Hatfield, American singer (Righteous Brothers) (d. 2003)*  1940   &ndash; Waddell, English darts commentator*1942 &ndash; Johnson, American fashion designer*1943 &ndash; Spector, American singer (Ronettes)*  1943   &ndash; Forestier, French-Canadian singer, songwriter and actress*  1943   &ndash; Griffin, American guitarist (Bread) (d. 2005)*  1943   &ndash; Mantler, American trumpeter and composer*  1943   &ndash; Rana, Pakistani cricketer  *1945 &ndash; Miers, American lawyer and House Counsel*  1945   &ndash; Spurr, American Indian tribal chair (d. 2010)*1947 &ndash; Ian Anderson, Scottish singer and flutist (Jethro Tull)*  1947   &ndash; Ibrahim, Malaysian politician, Prime Minister of Malaysia*  1947   &ndash; Ward, English cricketer*1948 &ndash; Austin, American singer*1950 &ndash; Girard, Canadian actor*1952 &ndash; Hugh Kelly, American actor*  1952   &ndash; Venora, American actress*1953 &ndash; Doty, American poet and prose writer*1954 &ndash; Endrulat, German footballer*1955 &ndash; Tiangco, Filipina television personality and broadcast journalist*1956 &ndash; Ottman, American wrestler*  1956   &ndash; Peacock, American record producer, singer-songwriter*  1956   &ndash; Peter Robbins, American actor*1958 &ndash; Richards, English cricketer*1959 &ndash; Arquette, American actress*  1959   &ndash; Mark Price, drummer/percussionist*  1959   &ndash; Vollant, Innu-Canadian singer-songwriter (Kashtin)*1960 &ndash; Banderas, Spanish actor*  1960   &ndash; Braschi, Italian actress*  1960   &ndash; Perry, American golfer*1961 &ndash; Farriss, Australian drummer (INXS)*1962 &ndash; Fordham, singer/songwriter*1963 &ndash; Sullivan, English-born American journalist *  1963   &ndash; Devi, Indian bandit (d. 2001)*1964 &ndash; Aaron Hall, American songwriter*1965 &ndash; Christian, American actress*  1965   &ndash; E. Smith, American jockey*  1965   &ndash; John Starks, American basketball player*1966 &ndash; Krsch, German singer*1967 &ndash; Albert, Belgian footballer*  1967   &ndash; Bowe, American boxer*  1967   &ndash; Gus Johnson, American sportscaster*  1967   &ndash; Sander, Estonian singer and actor*  1967   &ndash; Scholte, Dutch cricketer*  1967   &ndash; Pearson, British singer (Star)*1968 &ndash; Bivins, American singer (Edition, Biv DeVoe)*  1968   &ndash; Hawgood, Canadian ice hockey player*  1968   &ndash; Docter, American film director*1969 &ndash; Symons, Australian actress*1970 &ndash; Hedican, American ice hockey player*  1970   &ndash; Mautone, Australian footballer*  1970   &ndash; Julian, Australian cricketer*1971 &ndash; Keane, Irish footballer*  1971   &ndash; Kindeln, Cuban boxer*  1971   &ndash; Theroux, American actor*  1971   &ndash; Fasano, American baseball player*  1971   &ndash; Randleman, American mixed martial artist*  1971   &ndash; Groth, Danish-born Norwegian vocalist (Berzerk)*1972 &ndash; Dallaglio, English rugby union footballer*  1972   &ndash; Harmon, American model and actress*  1972   &ndash; Johnsson, Swedish guitarist and vocalist (Therion)*1973 &ndash; Raymond, American tennis player*  1973   &ndash; Zanetti, Argentinian footballer*1974 &ndash; Sommeil, French footballer*  1974   &ndash; Simmons, American feminist and author*  1974   &ndash; Marn, Costa Rican footballer*  1975   &ndash; Mansz, Turkish footballer*1976 &ndash; Depoli, American wrestler*1977 &ndash; Griffin, Northern Irish footballer*  1977   &ndash; Kamin, American guitarist and songwriter (Calling)*  1977   &ndash; Matt Morgan, British comedian*1978 &ndash; Allsopp, Australian footballer*  1978   &ndash; Fizer, American basketball player*  1978   &ndash; Read, English cricketer*  1978   &ndash; Yiu, Hong Kong actress*1979 &ndash; Schroeder, French racing driver*  1979   &ndash; Garca, American actress*  1979   &ndash; Geoghegan, American filmmaker and author*  1979   &ndash; Fernando, Sri Lankan cricketer*  1979   &ndash; Lyon, American baseball player*1980 &ndash; Bennett, English wrestler*1981 &ndash; Abe, Japanese singer*  1981   &ndash; Hidayat, Indonesian badminton player*  1981   &ndash; Mouath,Saudi Arabian footballer*1982 &ndash; Josh Anderson, American baseball player*  1982   &ndash; Aoki, American model and actress*1983 &ndash; Perezhogin, Russian ice hockey player*  1983   &ndash; Roy, Canadian ice hockey player*1984 &ndash; Eggold, American actor*1985 &ndash; Cortese, Italian footballer*  1985   &ndash; ODonovan, Irish footballer*1986 &ndash; Torain, American football player*1988 &ndash; Nicco, Italian footballer*1989 &ndash; Gagner, Canadian ice hockey player*  1989   &ndash; Sahar, Israeli footballer*1990 &ndash; Till, American actor*1992 &ndash; Ah-seong, South Korean actress*1993 &ndash; Nakajima, Japanese actor and singerDeaths* 258 &ndash; of Rome (Saint Lawrence), Spanish-born deacon of Rome (martyred) (b. 225)*1535 &ndash; de Medici, ruler of Florence (b. 1509)*1637 &ndash; Gerhard, German Lutheran leader (b. 1582)*1653 &ndash; Tromp, Dutch admiral (b. 1598)*1655 &ndash; de la Cueva, marqus de Bedmar, Spanish cardinal and diplomat (b. 1572)*1723 &ndash; Dubois, French cardinal and statesman (b. 1656)*1759 &ndash; King VI of Spain (b. 1713)*1784 &ndash; Allan Ramsay, Scottish painter (b. 1713)*1802 &ndash; Aepinus, German natural philosopher (b. 1724)*1806 &ndash; Haydn, Austrian composer (b. 1737)*1839 &ndash; John St Aubyn, British fossil collector (b. 1758)*1862 &ndash; Shusaku, Japanese Go player (b. 1829)*1875 &ndash; Andree, German geographer (b. 1808)*1896 &ndash; Lilienthal, German aviation pioneer (b. 1848)*1904 &ndash; Waldeck-Rousseau, French statesman (b. 1846)*1915 &ndash; Moseley, English physicist (b. 1887)*1918 &ndash; Loewenhardt, German flying ace (b. 1897)*1920 &ndash; Politzer, Hungarian-Austrian physician (b. 1835)*1928 &ndash; Cherryman, American actor (b. 1897)*1929 &ndash; Fatou, French mathematician (b. 1878) *1932 &ndash; Tin Tin, American canine film actor (b. 1918)*1945 &ndash; H. Goddard, American rocket scientist (b. 1882)*1948 &ndash; Asakawa, Japanese historian (b. 1873)*  1948   &ndash; Andrew Brown, Scottish football coach (b. 1870)*  1948   &ndash; Summers, English writer (b. 1880)*1958 &ndash; Demaree, American baseball player (b. 1910)*1963 &ndash; Kefauver, American politician (b. 1903)*  1963   &ndash; Wetter, Swiss jurist (b. 1877)*1969 &ndash; Leno LaBianca, American businessman (b. 1925)*  1969   &ndash; Rosemary LaBianca, American housewife (b. 1930)*  1969   &ndash; Kodolnyi, Hungarian writer (b. 1899)*1976 &ndash; Oldfield, Australian cricketer (b. 1894)*1979 &ndash; Gerlach, German physicist (b. 1889)*  1979   &ndash; Foran, American actor (b. 1910)*1980 &ndash; Khan, Pakistani politician (b. 1917)*1982 &ndash; Bigode Herzer, Brazilian writer and poet (b. 1962)*1985 &ndash; Barragar, American football player (b. 1906)*1986 &ndash; Rouse, British mountaineer (b. 1951)*1987 &ndash; Athanasiadis-Novas, Greek lawyer and politician (b. 1893)*1993 &ndash; Euronymous (ystein Aarseth), Norwegian guitarist (Mayhem) (b. 1968)*1997 &ndash; Nancarrow, American composer (b. 1912)*  1997   &ndash; Lauzon, Quebec film director (b. 1953)*1999 &ndash; Pait Upadhyaya, Indian Sanskrit scholar (b. 1899)*2000 &ndash; Parkhouse, English cricketer (b. 1925)*2001 &ndash; Boudreau, American baseball player and manager (b. 1917)*2002 &ndash; Houser, American guitarist (Panic) (b. 1962)*  2002   &ndash; Nygaard, Norwegian computer scientist (b. 1926)*2003 &ndash; Jimnez, Puerto Rican singer (b. c. 1944)*2007 &ndash; Cabot Lodge Bohler, American military pilot and civil rights figure (b. 1925)*  2007   &ndash; E. Faust, American religious figure (b. 1920)*  2007   &ndash; Wilson, British music personality and broadcaster (b. 1950)*  2007   &ndash; Reyka, American law enforcement official (b. 1956)*2008 &ndash; Hayes, American singer-songwriter, keyboardist and actor (b. 1942)*2010 &ndash; Stansfield, English footballer (b. 1978)Holidays and observances*Christian Day:  **Bessus**Blane (Catholic Church)**Geraint of Dumnonia**of Rome**Our Lady of Good Success of Paraaque, Patroness of Paraaque, Philippines**10 (Eastern Orthodox liturgics)*Declaration of Independence of Quito, proclaimed independence from Spain on August 10, 1809, but failed with the execution of all the conspirators of the movement on August 2, 1810. Independence finally occurred on May 24, 1822 at the of Pichincha. (Ecuador)External links* BBC: On This Day* * On This Day in Canada----Augustusdagostootdagostuavqustgoeh 10 jit10augustEostdagost1010srpendaostuAwstaugustAugust10august10 de agostode agusto10Augustaugustaotaugustusdi AvostLnasaLuanistynan Lnasdalde agostogan:810 101010kolovozadi agosto10Agustusde augustoaugustgstagostoAgustus1010zlnika10AgostioutgelawjAugustiaugustsAugust10augustus0810.Aogositra10Ogos 1010augustusaugustusja:810e astoaugustaugustAotde augustedagostuz:10-avgust10Augustsierpniade agostoaugustiqin chakra yapuy killapi 1010.AugustGushtdi austu10augustavgust8.Agustuselokuutaaugusti1010uct10Austosawgustde agostothng 810pimukuu pivd awousseogustus10Augustzh-yue:810Tebaxe10zh:810
2321
Area_51
footnotes    Area 51 is a base, and a remote detachment of Air Force Base. It is located in the southern portion of Nevada in the western States, 83 miles (133 km) north-northwest of downtown Las Vegas. Situated at its center, on the southern shore of Lake, is a large military airfield. The bases primary purpose is to support development and testing of experimental aircraft and weapons systems.(DREAMLAND: Fifty Years of Secret Flight Testing in Nevada By Peter W. Merlin)(Rich, p. 57. Rich describes Groom in 1977 as being ...a sprawling facility, bigger than some municipal airports, a test range for sensitive aviation projects)The base lies within the States Air Forces vast Test and Training Range (NTTR), formerly called the Nellis Air Force Range (NAFR). Although the facilities at the range are managed by the Air Base Wing at Air Force Base, the Groom facility appears to be run as an adjunct of the Force Flight Test Center (AFFTC) at Air Force Base in the Desert, around  southwest of Groom, and as such the base is known as Air Force Flight Test Center (Detachment 3).(Area 51 researcher Glenn Campbell claims that AFFTC Detachment 3 is located at Groom, citing the title of a leaked security manual, the mailbox in Henderson, Nevada he believes formerly served Groom, and the NASA biography of astronaut E. Walz who was formerly a manager at AFFTC-DET3: Campbell, Glenn. Area 51 is Edwards DET 3, Groom Lake Desert Rat, 17 June 1996; Biography of Carl E. Walz (Colonel, USAF, Ret.), NASA B. Johnson Space Center.)(Merlin, Peter W.Black Projects at Groom Lake: Into the 21st Century.)Though the name Area 51 is used in official CIA documentation,( other names used for the facility include Dreamland, Paradise Ranch,(Rich, p. 56. Rich writes Kelly the U2s designer had jokingly nicknamed this Godforsaken place Paradise Ranch, hoping to lure young and innocent flight crews)( Home Base, Watertown Strip, Groom Lake,(Patton, p. 3, lists Paradise Ranch, Watertown, Groom Lake, and Home Base as nicknames) and most recently Homey Airport.(Researcher offers clues on new Area 51 name, Force Times, 23 January 2008.) The area is part of the Nellis Operations Area, and the airspace around the field is referred to as (R-4808N),(FAA aviation chart for the Groom area) known by the military pilots in the area as The Box or the Container.(R-4808N Fixes and Janet Routes Dreamland Resort)The facility is not a conventional airbase, as frontline operational units are not normally deployed there. It instead appears to be used for highly classified military/defense Access Programs (SAP), which are unacknowledged publicly by the government, military personnel, and defense contractors.   Its mission may be to support the development, testing, and training phases for new aircraft weapons systems or research projects.  Once these projects have been approved by the States Air Force or other agencies such as the CIA, and are ready to be announced to the public, operations of the aircraft are then moved to a normal air force base.The intense secrecy surrounding the base, the very existence of which the U.S. government did not even acknowledge until July 14, 2003,() has made it the frequent subject of conspiracy theories and a central component to flying object (UFO) folklore.((U.S. governments positions on Area 51The federal government explicitly concedes (in various court filings and government directives) that the USAF has an operating location near Groom Lake, but does not provide any further information.Unlike much of the Nellis range, the area surrounding the lake is permanently off-limits both to civilian and normal military air traffic. Radar stations protect the area, and unauthorized personnel are quickly expelled. Even military pilots training in the NAFR risk disciplinary action if they stray into the exclusionary box surrounding Grooms airspace.(Lacitis, Erik. Area 51 vets break silence: Sorry, but no space aliens or UFOs The Seattle Times, 27 March 2010.)(Hall, George. Skinner, Michael. Red Flag, Motorbooks International, 1993, ISBN 978-0-87938-759-4, p.49: It is an understatement to say that overflying Dreamland is forbidden...)File:Wfm x51 area51 warningsign.jpg|thumb|Area 51 border and warning sign stating that photography is prohibited and that use of deadly force is authorized under the terms of the 1950 Internal Security Act. A government vehicle is parked on the hilltop; from there, security agents observe the approach to Groom Lake.Perimeter security is provided by uniformed private security guards working for EG&Gs security subcontractor Wackenhut,(Patton, p. 10.) who patrol in Humvees, SUVs, and trucks. The guards are armed with M16s, but no violent encounters with Area 51 observers have been reported; instead, the guards generally follow visitors near the perimeter and radio for the Lincoln County Sheriff. Deadly force is authorized if violators who attempt to breach the secured area fail to heed warnings to halt. Fines of around $600 seem to be the normal course of action, although some visitors and journalists report receiving follow-up visits from FBI agents. Some observers have been detained on public land for pointing camera equipment at the base. Surveillance is supplemented using buried motion sensors.(Poulsen, Kevin. Area 51 hackers dig up trouble, Security Focus, 25 May 2004.)The base does not appear on public U.S. government maps;(USGS 1:24K/25K Topo map for location UTM 11 605181E 4124095N (NAD27) (map via TopoQuest.com)) the USGS topographic map for the area only shows the long-disused Groom Mine.(USGS 1:24K/25K Topo map for geopoint GROOM MINE, NV (map via TopoQuest.com)) A civil aviation chart published by the Department of Transportation shows a large restricted area,(Airports and Landing strips, 2002, Department of Transportation, cf section R-4808N) but defines it as part of the Nellis restricted airspace. The official aeronautical navigation charts for the area show Groom Lake but omit the airport facilities.(Las Vegas Sectional Aeronautical Chart, National Aeronautical Chart Office, Federal Aviation Administration (last checked 26 September 2008)) Similarly the National Atlas page showing federal lands in Nevada(Federal lands and Indian reservations, The National atlas of the United States of America, States Department of the Interior, document ID: pagefed_nv7.pdf INTERIOR-GEOLOGICAL SURVEY, RESTON, VIRGINIA-2003) does not distinguish between the Groom block and other parts of the Nellis range. Although officially declassified, the original film taken by U.S. Corona spy satellite in the 1960s has been altered prior to declassification; in answer to freedom of information queries, the government responds that these exposures (which map to Groom and the entire NAFR) appear to have been destroyed.() Terra satellite images (which were publicly available) were removed from web servers (including Microsofts Terraserver) in 2004,(Terraserver image ) and from the monochrome 1 m resolution USGS data dump made publicly available. NASA 7 images are still available (these are used in the World Wind). Higher resolution (and more recent) images from other satellite imagery providers (including Russian providers and the IKONOS) are commercially available. These show, in considerable detail, the runway marking, base facilities, aircraft, and vehicles.Although federal property within the base is exempt from state and local taxes, facilities owned by private contractors are not. Area 51 researcher Glenn Campbell claimed in 1994 that the base only declares a taxable value of $2 million to the Lincoln County tax assessor, who is unable to enter the area to perform an assessment.() When documents that mention the NTS and operations at Groom are declassified, mentions of Area 51 and Groom Lake are routinely redacted. One notable exception is a 1967 memo from CIA director Helms regarding the deployment of three OXCART aircraft from Groom to Air Base to perform reconnaissance over Vietnam. Although most mentions of OXCARTs home base are redacted in this document, as is a map showing the aircrafts route from there to Okinawa, the redactor appears to have missed one mention: p15 section #2 ends Three OXCART aircraft and the necessary task force personnel will be deployed from Area 51 to Kadena.(OXCART reconnaissance of North Vietnam, Memo to the Deputy Secretary of Defence from the office of CIA Director Richard Helms, 15th May 1967, p15 (the full declassified document is mirrored at Commons))FacilitiesSoviet spy satellites obtained photographs of the Groom Lake area during the height of the War, and later civilian satellites have produced detailed images of the base and its surroundings. Aerial imagery shows the airfield of Area 51 having seven runways including one that now appears to be closed. The closed runway, 14R/32L, is also by far the longest with a total length of approximately , not including stopway. The other runways are two asphalt runways, the 14L/32R with a length of  and 12/30 with a length of , and four runways located on the salt lake. These four runways are 09L/27R and 09R/27L, which are both approximately , and 03L/21R and 03R/21L, which are both approximately . The base also has a helipad.(Measurements, runway state and alignment information based upon Google Earth / Digital Globe images as retrieved on 21 December 2007.)()In December 2007, airline pilots noticed that the base had appeared in their aircraft navigation systems latest Jeppesen database revision with the ICAO airport identifier code of KXTA and listed as Homey Airport.(Marsh, Alton K. (10 January 2008).Dont ask, dont tell: Area 51 gets airport identifier, AOPA On Line.) The probably inadvertent release of the airport data led to advice by the Owners and Pilots Association (AOPA) that student pilots should be explicitly warned about KXTA, not to consider it as a waypoint or destination for any flight even though it now appears in public navigation databases.(Road access to the facility is with State Route 375 at  where an access road connects to the public highway system.   The security gate and a parking facility is at   about 10 miles west-southwest of the road turnoff.   The gate is approximately 25 miles from the main support base along a winding road.The support base has a series of what appears to be supply warehouses, dormitories, a fire station, some water towers and a number of support buildings that are common on military air bases. A very tall tower, perhaps used as the aircraft control tower is also visible.   Open storage warehouses, and what appears to be a reclamation yard is also visible.  Recreation facilities include baseball diamonds and tennis courts.  Several large satellite dishes, presumably for communications are also visible.  A large number of white-painted, presumably government  vehicles are visible in parking lots, mostly being pickup trucks, SUVs and vans.   Several Boeing 737 aircraft are parked on an open ramp, presumably for transportation of workers to the base.   One military aircraft, appearing to be a black-painted F-16 is parked on another ramp; the black paint commonly used by the Air Force for aircraft engaged in night operations.  Several black-painted helicopters are also parked on an open ramp.   The base also has a large number of hangars, more than what is commonly found on a normal air base, presumably to insure operational aircraft are kept out of view by orbiting reconnaissance satellites as well as out of the intense desert heat.Approximately 15.5 miles north-northeast of the base, on a peak known as Baldy Mountain, are a series of radar radomes ,  at approximately 9,400 elevation.   The types of radar at these sites is unknown, although they may be the ARSR-4 Route Surveillance Radar which is used by the Air Force and FAA Surveillance System throughout the United States.  Another series of radars of a different type are located on a ridge at 4,300 just to the north of Groom Lake at .  All of the radar sites appear to be automated and unattended.Background informationWorld War IIThe first known use of the area was the construction in 1941 of an auxiliary airfield for the Coast Air Corps Training Center at Vegas Air Field.  Known as Indian Springs Airfield Auxiliary #1, it consisted of two dirt 5000 runways aligned NE/SW, NW/SE.  The airfield was also used for bombing and artillery practice, as bomb craters are still visible in the vicinity of the runways.   It was abandoned after the gunnery school at Las Vegas closed in June 1946.(Military Airfields in WW2)(Mueller, Robert (1989). Active Air Force Bases Within the United States of America on 17 September 1982. USAF Reference Series, Maxwell AFB, Alabama: Office of Air Force History. ISBN 0-912799-53-6)U-2 programThe Groom Lake test facility was established by the Intelligence Agency (CIA) for Project Aquatone, the development of the U-2 strategic reconnaissance aircraft in April 1955.   As part of the project the director,  Richard M. Bissell Jr., understood that the extreme secrecy enveloping the project, the flight test and pilottraining programs could not be conducted at Air Force Base or Lockheeds Palmdale facility.  A search for a suitable testing site for the U-2 was conducted under the same extreme security as the rest of the project.(Peebles, Curtis, (1999), Dark Eagles, Presidio Press; Revised edition, ISBN 089141696X)   Bissell recalled a little X-shaped field in southern Nevada that he had flown over many times during his involvement with the nuclear  weapons test program.  The airfield was the abandoned Indian Springs Airfield Auxiliary #1 field, which by 1955 had reverted to sand and was unusable, but the adjacent Groom Dry Lake to the northwest met the requirements for a site that was remote, but not too remote.(He notified Lockheed who sent a inspection team out to Groom Lake.  According to Kelly Johnson, ... We flew over it and within thirty seconds, you knew that was the place ... it was right by a dry lake. Man alive, we looked at that lake, andwe all looked at each other. It was another Edwards, so we wheeled around, landed on that lake, taxied up to one end of it.   It was a perfect natural landing field ... as smooth as a billiard table without anything being done to it.  Johnson used a compass to lay out the direction of the first runway. The place was called Groom Lake.((  The lakebed made an ideal strip from which they could operate the troublesome test aircraft, and the Emigrant Valleys mountain ranges and the NTS perimeter protected the test site from prying eyes and outside interference about 100 miles north of Las Vegas.(Peebles, Curtis (2000). Shadow Flights: Americas Secret Air War Against the Soviet Union. Novato, CA: Presidio Press. ISBN 978-0-89141-700-2)(Rich, pp. 141144, details U2 test pilot LeVier scouting the remote area near Death Valley for locations, saying of Groom I gave it a ten plus score... a dry lake bed around three and a half miles around, and describes LeVier showing the lake to U-2 designer Kelly Johnson and CIA official Richard Bissell, and Johnson deciding to locate the runway at south end of lake)On 4 May 1955 a survey team arrived at Groom Lake and laid out a , north-south runway on thesouthwest corner of the lakebed and designated a site for a base support facility.  The new airfield, then known as Site II or The Ranch, initially consisted of little more than a few shelters, workshops and trailer homes in which to house its small team.(   In a little over three months, the base consisted of a single, paved runway, three hangars, a control  tower, and rudimentary accommodations for test personnel. The bases few amenities  included a movie theatre and volleyball court. Additionally, there was a mess hall, several  water wells, and fuel storage tanks. By July 1955.  CIA, Air Force, and Lockheed personnel began arriving.(  The Ranch received its first U-2 delivery on 24 July 1955 from Burbank on a Globemaster II cargo plane, accompanied by Lockheed technicians on a DC-3.( The first U-2 lifted off from Groom on 4 August 1955. A U-2 fleet under the control of the CIA began overflights of Soviet territory by mid-1956.The Groom Lake airfield soon acquired a name: Watertown.  According to some accounts, the site was named after CIA director Dulles birthplace: New York.  Upon its activation, the testing facility was used with increasing frequency for U-2 testing, however that changed in 1957 when the Atomic Energy Commission began testing nuclear weapons at the nearby Flat facility.( Once the AEC Plumbbob series of tests began with the Boltzmann blast in  May 1957, the Watertown airfield personnel were required to evacuate the base prior to each detonation. The AEC, in turn, tried to ensure that expected fallout from any given shot would be limited so as to permit re-entry of personnel within three to four weeks.  All personnel at the base were required to wear radiation badges to measure their exposure to fallout.  Once the atomic testing began, the CIA U-2 testing operations were interrrupted constantly due to the explosions at Yucca Flat, which were scheduled and re-scheduled frequently.( The CIA facilities at Groom Lake were always considered by the Agency as a temporary facility, to accmodate the U-2 testing.   As the project began to wind down, and CIA pilot classes finished their training, Watertown became a virtual ghost town.   By June 1957,  most U-2 testing has moved to AFB and the first operational USAF unit to receive the U-2, the Strategic Reconnaissance Wing, was active at AFB, Texas. For two years following the departure of the U-2s from Groom Lake, the base was fairly quiet, although it remained under CIA jurisdiction.(X-15 programIn July 1959 USAF personnel from Edwards AFB embarked on a two-day survey trip to investigate potential emergency landing sites for the American X-15 rocket plane.  The survey crew received permission to land on the then unused CIA facility at Groom Lake.   The crew tested the hardness of the lakebed surface by dropping a 10-pound  steel ball from a height of six feet and measuring  the diameter of the resulting imprint.  The result was that the Groom Lake surface was considered excellent for emergency use.(In September 1960, NASA and Air Force Flight Test Center personnel at Edwards reviewed the results of the survey trip to Groom Lake, as well as other sites visited by the survey crew.   The use of Groom Lake meant a reduction in support requirements as there was an airfield with emergency equipment and personnel at the site.  Ultimately, they agreed to remove Groom from consideration as an emergency landing site due to difficulty obtaining clearance into the area.(The OXCART programEven before U-2 development was complete, Lockheed began work on its successor as part of the CIAs OXCART project, involving the A-12, a Mach-3 high-altitude reconnaissance aircraft  a later variant of which became the famed USAF Blackbird. As with the previous U-2 program, security requirements of the Oxcart project necessitated an obscure, secret location for A-12 testing. Despite the success of the U-2 flight tests and the OXCART mock-up radar tests, Groom Lake was not initially considered. It was a Wild West outpost, with primitive facilities for only 150 people. The A-l2 test program would require more than ten times that number. Groom Lakes five-thousand foot asphalt runway was both too short and unable to support theweight of the Oxcart. The fuel supply, hangar space, and shop space were all inadequate.(Ten Air Force bases programmed for closure were considered, but all were rejected. The site had to be away from any cities and military or civilian airways to prevent sightings. It also had to have good weather, the necessary housing and fuel supplies, and an eighty-five-hundred-foot runway. None of the air force bases met the security requirements, although, for a time, Edwards Air Force Base was considered. In the end, Groom Lake was the only possibility, however its short runway, austere facilities and other shortcomings meant a major overhaul was necessry prior for Oxcart A-12 testing could commence.( Groom Lake had also, by this time, received a new official name. The Nevada nuclear test site was divided into several numbered areas. To blend in, Groom Lake became Area 51.(This aircraft flight characteristics and maintenance requirements forced a massive expansion of facilities and runways at Groom Lake. On 1 October 1960, Reynolds Electrical and Engineering Company (REECo) began work on the site, referred to as Project 51. Workers engaged in double-shift construction schedules for the next four years to overhaul and upgrade base facilities, and also expand the existing runway to  as well as harden the existing runway to support the heavier A-12. In addition, a new 10,000-foot runway was constructed  (14/32) diagonally across the southwest corner of the lakebed.  An Archimedes curve approximately  two miles across was marked on the dry lake so that an A-12 pilot approaching the end of the overrun could abort to the playa instead of plunging the aircraft into the sagebrush. Area 51  pilots called it The Hook. For crosswind landings two unpaved airstrips (runways 9/27 and  03/21) were marked on the dry lakebed.((The OXCART Story, Thomas P. McIninch, CIA Studies Archive, Vol 15, No. 1, 1994, declassified)  By August 1961 construction of the essential facilities were completed. The States Navy supplied three surplus hangars which were erected on the bases north side. They were designated as Hangar 4, 5, and 6. A fourth, Hangar 7, was new construction. The original U-2 hangars were converted to maintenance and machine shops. Facilities in the main cantonment area included workshops and buildings for storage and administration, a commissary, control tower, fire station, and housing. The Navy also contributed more than 130 surplus Babbitt duplex housing units for long-term occupancy facilities. Older buildings were repaired, and additional facilities were constructed as necessary. A reservoir pond, surrounded by trees, served as a recreational area one mile north of the base. Other recreational facilities included a gymnasium, movie theatre, and a baseball diamond.((  A permanent aircraft fuel tank farm was constructed by early 1962 for the special JP-7 fuel required by the A-12.  Seven tanks were constructed, with a total capacity of 1,320,000-gallons.(   Preparations began for the arrival of OXCART; security was greatly enhanced, and the small civilian mine in the Groom basin was closed. In January 1962, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) expanded the restricted airspace in the vicinity of Groom Lake. The lakebed became the center of a 600-square-mile addition to restricted area R-4808N. Restricted continuously at all altitudes, the airspace occupies the center of the Nellis Air Force Range.((Althugh remaining under the jurisdiction of the CIA, the facility received eight USAF Voodoos for training, two Shooting Star trainers for proficiency flying, a Hercules for cargo transport, a U-3A for administrative purposes, a helicopter for search and rescue, and a 180 for liaison use; and Lockheed provided an Starfighter for use as a plane.( The first OXCART was covertly trucked to the base in February 1962, assembled, and it made its first flight 26 April 1962. At the time, the base boasted a complement of over 1,000 personnel. It had fueling tanks, a control tower, and a baseball diamond. The A-12 was a large, loud, and distinctive-looking aircraft. During the early test flights, the CIA tried to limit the number of people who saw the aircraft. All those at Groom Lake not connected with the Oxcart program were herded into the mess hall before each takeoff. This was soon dropped as it disrupted activities and was impractical with the large number of flights.(Although the airspace above Groom Lake was closed, it was near busy Air Force Base. Inevitably, there were sightings. Some Nellis pilots saw the A-12 several times. At least one NASA test pilot from AFB saw an A-12. He radioed the Edwards tower and asked what it was. He was curtly told to halt transmissions. After landing, he was told what he had seen was vital to U.S. security. He also signed a secrecy agreement. The major source of A-12 sightings was airline pilots. It is believed that twenty to thirty airline sightings were made. One American Airlines pilot saw an A-12 twice. During one sighting, a pilot saw an A-12 and two chase planes; he radioed, I see a goose and two goslings.(Groom saw the first flight of most major Blackbird variants: A-12, the abortive YF-12A interceptor variant designed to intercept Soviet manned bombers, and the D-21 Blackbird-based drone project. By the end of 1963, nine A-12s were at Area 51.  A mock-up of the Reconnaissance Strike-71 (RS-71) was inspected by the Air Force on 4 June 1962. The concept of a strike A-12 with strategic bombing capabilities ran into political problems from both the Air Force, which was involved with the Valkyrie program at the time and a lack of enthusiasm from Defense Secretary S. McNamara. McNamara and his whiz kids saw no need for additional manned bombers in the age of ICBMs.  In addition  McNamara was phasing down Defense Command and saw no use for the YF-12A Interceptor.  Accordingly, only the reconnaissance version of the RS-71 remained (it kept the strike part of the name, however). Where the A-12 was deiigned for clandestine overflights of Soviet territory, the RS-71 carried additional side-looking cameras and other sensors which gave it a much greater capabiity. On December 2728, 1962, a contract was issued to Lockheed to build six test RS-71s.(According to legend, President B. Johnson asked an aide soon upon taking office after the Kennedy Assassination what the RS-71 was for. The aide responded, strategic reconnaissance. Thus, when Johnson announced the existence of a new reconnaissance aircraft, on 24 July 1964, President Johnson called it the SR-71. President Johnsons announcements created an unusual security situation. Whle the USAF SR-71 project was a White or open project, the CIAs A-12 was not. Its existence would remain a secret until 1981. To maintain the secret, all those involved were told of the coming SR-71 announcement and warned to keep the A-12 separate.(The SR-71 first flew at the Lockheed facilities at Palmdale, California in December 1964, and Palmdale and AFB served as the primary operation sites for that model. The 4200th Strategic Reconnaissance Wing activated at Beale AFB on 1 January 1965, however the first SR-71 did not arrive until 7 January 1966.   Starting in November 1965, even as the A-12 was declared operational for use by the CIA and planning was made for its use, doubts were expressed about the cost of operating the two separate groups of A-12s and SR-71s. After a year or more of debate, it was decided on 10 January 1967, to phase out the CIA A-12 program. Although the Oxcart was gone, its USAF descendant, the SR-71, would continue to fly intelligence missions for the next twenty-two years. Finally, in 1990, the SR-71 was retired.(The A-12s would remain at Groom Lake until 1968 and occasionally were deployed to other United States bases overseas.() The CIAs nine remaining A-12s were placed in storage at Palmdale in June 1968. All surviving aircraft remained there for nearly 20 years before being sent to museums around the United States.D-21 TagboardFollowing the loss of Powerss U-2 over the Soviet Union, there were several discussions about using the A-12 OXCART as an unpiloted drone aircraft. Although Kelly Johnson had come to support the idea of drone reconnaissance, he opposed the development of an A-12 drone, contending that the aircraft was too large and complex for such a conversion.  However, the Air Force agreed to fund the study of a high-speed, high-altitude drone aircraft in October 1962. The air force interest seems to have moved the CIA to take action, the project designated Q-12.  By October 1963, the drones design had been finalized.At the same time, the Q-12 underwent a name change. To separate it from the other A-12-based projects, it was renamed the D-21. (The 12 was reversed to 21).  Tagboard was the projects code name.(The first D-21 was completed in the spring of 1964 by Lockheed. After four more months of checkouts and static tests, the aircraft was shipped to Groom Lake and reassembled.  It was to be carried by a two-seat derivative of the A-12, designated the M-21.  When the D-21/M-21 reached the launch point, The first step would be to blow off the D-21s inlet and exhaust covers.   With the D-21/M-21 at the correct speed and altitude, the LCO would start the ramjet and the other systems of the D-21.  With the D-21s systems activated and running, and the launch aircraft at the correct point, the M-21 would begin a slight pushover, the LCO would push a final button, and the D-21 would come off the pylon.(Difficulties were addressed throughout 1964 and 1965 at Groom Lake with various technical issues.  Captive flights showed unforeseen aerodynamic difficulties.  By late January 1966, more than a year after the first captive flight, everything seemed ready.  The first D-21 launch was made on 5 March 1966 with a successful flight, with the D-21 flying 120 miles with limited fuel.  A second D-12 flight was successful in April 1966 with the drone flying 1,200 miles, reaching Mach 3.3 and 90,000 feet.  An accident on 30 July 1966 with a fully fueled D-21, on a planned checkout flight suffered from a non-start of the drone after its separation, causing it to collide with the M-21 launch aircraft.  The two crewmen ejected and landed in the ocean 150 miles offshore. One crew member was picked up by a helicopter, but the other, having survived the aircraft breakup and ejection, drowned when sea water entered his pressure suit.   Kelly Johnson personally cancelled the entire program, having had serious doubts from the start of the feasibility.  A number of D-21s had already been produced, and rather than scrapping the whole effort, Johnson again proposed to the Air Force that they be launched from a B-52H bomber.(By late summer of 1967, the modification work to both the D-21 (now designated D-21B) and the B-52Hs were complete. The test program could now resume.  The test missions were flown out of Groom Lake, with the actual launches over the Pacific. The first D-21B to be flown was Article 501, the prototype. The first attempt was made on September 28, 1967, and ended in complete failure.   As the B-52 was flying toward the launch point, the D-21B fell off the pylon. The B-52H gave a sharp lurch as the drone fell free. The booster fired and was quite a sight from the ground. The failure was traced to a stripped nut on the forward right attachment point on the pylon.  Several more tests were made, none of which met with success.  However, the fact is that the resumptions of D-21 tests took place against a changing reconnaissance background. The A-12 had finally been allowed to deploy, and the SR-71 was soon to replace it.  At the same time, new developments in reconnaissance satellite technology were nearing operation. Up to this point, the limited number of satellites available restricted coverage to the Soviet Union. A new generation of reconnaissance satellites could soon cover targets anywhere in the world. The satellites resolution would be comparable to that of aircraft, but without the slightest political risk.  Time was running out for the Tagboard.(Several more test flights, made from AFB, California, including two over China were made in 1969 and 1970 to varying degrees of success.  On July 15, 1971, Kelly Johnson received a wire canceling the D-21B program. The remaining drones were transferred by a C-5A and placed in dead storage. The tooling used to build the D-21Bs was ordered destroyed.  Like the A-12 Oxcart, the D-21B Tagboard drones remained a Black airplane, even in retirement. Their existence was not suspected until August 1976, when the first group was placed in storage at the AFB Storage and Disposition Center. A second group arrived in 1977.  They were labeled GTD-21Bs (GT stood for ground training).(Davis-Monthan is an open base, with public tours of the storage area at the time, so the odd-looking drones were soon spotted and photos began appearing in magazines.  Speculation about the D-21Bs circulated within aviation circles for years, and it was not until 1982 that details of the Tagboard program were released.  However, it was not until 1993 that the B-52/D-21B program was made public.  That same year, the surviving D-21Bs were released to museums.(Foreign Technology EvaluationFile:Mig-17-usaf.jpg|thumb|HAVE FERRY, the second of two MiG-17F Frescos loaned to the United States by Israel in 1969.File:Mig21-usaf.jpg|thumb|HAVE DOUGHNUT, (MiG-21F-13) flown by States Navy and Force Systems Command during its 1968 exploitation.During the War, one of the missions carried out by the United States was the test and evaluation of captured Soviet fighter aircraft.(   Beginning in the late 1960s, and for several decades, Area 51 played host to an assortment of Soviet-built aircraft. Under the HAVE DOUGHNUT, HAVE DRILL and HAVE FERRY programs, the first MiGs flown in the States, were used to evaluate the aircraft in performance and technical capabilities, as well as in operational capability, pitting the types against U.S. fighters.(Steve Davies: Red Eagles. Americas Secret MiGs, Osprey Publishing, 2008)This was not a new mission, as testing of foreign technology by the USAF began during War II.  After the war, testing of acquired foreign technology was performed by the Air Technical Intelligence Center (ATIC, which became very influential during the Korean War), under the direct command of the Air Materiel Control Department.   In 1961 ATIC became the Foreign Technology Division (FTD), and was reassigned to Force Systems Command. ATIC personnel were sent anywhere where foreign aircraft could be found. The focus of Force Systems Command limited the use of the fighter as a tool with which to train the line tactical fighter pilots.( Air Force Systems Command recruited its pilots from the Force Flight Test Center at Air Force Base, California, who were usually graduates from various test pilot schools. Air Command selected its pilots primarily from the ranks of the Weapons School graduates.(In August 1966, Air Force fighter pilot Captain Redfa defected, flying his MiG-21 to Israel after being ordered to attack Iraqi Kurd villages with napalm. His aircraft was transferred to Nevada within a month.  In 1968 the US Air Force and Navy jointly formed a project known as Have Donut in which Air Force Systems Command, Tactical Air Command, and the U.S. Navys Air Test and Evaluation Squadron Four (VX-4) flew this acquired Soviet made aircraft in simulated air combat training.((  Because U.S. possession of the MiG-21 was, itself, secret, it was tested at Groom Lake. A joint air force-navy team was assembled for a series of dogfight tests.(Comparisons between the F-4 and the MiG-21 indicated that, on the surface, they were evenly matched.  But air combat was not just about technology. In the final analysis, it was the skill of the man in the cockpit. The Have Doughnut tests showed this most strongly.  When the Navy or Air Force pilots flew the MiG-21, the results were a draw; the F-4 would win some fights, the MiG-21 would win others. There were no clear advantages. The problem was not with the planes, but with the pilots flying them. The pilots would not fly either plane to its limits.  One of the Navy pilots was Marland W. Doc Townsend, then commander of VF-121, the F-4 training squadron at NAS Miramar. He was an engineer and a Korean War veteran and had flown almost every navy aircraft. When he flew against the MiG-21, he would outmaneuver it everytime. The Air Force pilots would not go vertical in the MiG-21. The Have Doughnut project officer was Tom Cassidy, a pilot with VX-4, the Navys Air Development Squadron at Point Mugu.   He had been watching as Townsend waxed the air force MiG 21 pilots. Cassidyclimbed into the MiG 21 and went up against Townsends F-4. This time the result was far different. Cassidy was willing to fight in the vertical, flying the plane to the point where it was buffeting, just above the stall. Cassidy was able to get on the F-4s tail. After the flight, they realized the MiG-21 turned better than the F-4 at lower speeds. The key was for the F-4 to keep its speed up.  What had happened in the sky above Groom Lake was remarkable. An F-4 had defeated the MiG 21; the weakness of the Soviet plane had been found. Further test flights confirmed what was learned.  It was also clear that the MiG-21 was a formidable enemy. United States pilots would have to fly much better than they had been to beat it. This would require aspecial school to teach advanced air combat techniques.(On August 12, 1968, two Syrian air force lieutenants, Walid Adham and Radfan Rifai, took off in a pair of MiG-17Fs on a training mission. They lost their way and, believing they were over Lebanon, landed at the Beset Landing Field in northern Israel. (One version has it that they were led astray by an Arabic-speaking Israeli).(  In 1968 these ex-Iraqi MiG-17s were transferred from Israeli stocks were added to the operation. These aircraft were given USAF designations and fake serial numbers so that they may be identified in DOD standard flight logs. As in the earlier program, a small group of Air Force and Navy pilots conducted mock dogfights with the MiG-17s. Selected instructors from the Navys Top Gun school at Miramar, California, were chosen to fly against the MiGs for familiarization purposes.(  Very soon, the MiG-17s shortcomings became clear. It had an extremely simple, even crude, control system which lacked the power-boosted controls of American aircraft.  The F-4s twin engines were so powerful it could accelerate out of range of the MiG-17s guns in thirty seconds. It was important for the F-4 to keep its distance from the MiG 17. As long as the F-4 was one and a half miles fromthe MiG-17, it was outside the reach of the Soviet fighters guns, but the MiG was within reach of the F-4s missiles.(The data from the Have Doughnut and Have Drill tests were provided to the newly formed Top Gun school at NASA Miramar.  By 1970, the Have Drill program was expanded; a few selected fleet F-4crews were given the chance to fight the MiGs.  The most important result of Project Have Drill is that no Navy pilot who flew in the project defeated the 17 Fresco in the first engagement  The Have Drill dogfights were by invitation only. The other pilots based at Nellis Air Force Base were not to know about the U.S.-operated MiGs.  To prevent any sightings, the airspace above the Groom Lake range was closed. On aeronautical maps, the exercise area was marked in red ink. The forbidden zone became known as Red Square.(During the remainder of the Vietnam War, the Navy kill ratio climbed to 8.33 to 1. In contrast, the Air Force rate improved only slightly to 2.83 to 1. The reason for this difference was Top Gun. The navy had revitalized its air combat training, while the Air Force had stayed stagnant. Most of the Navy MiG kills were by Top Gun graduates,In May 1973, Project Have Idea was formed which took over from the older Have Donut, Have Ferry and Have Drill projects and the project was transferred to the Test Range Airport. At Tonopah testing of foreign technology aircraft continued and expanded throughout the 1970s and 1980s.(Area 51 also hosted another foreign materiel evaluation program called HAVE GLIB. This involved testing Soviet tracking and missile control radar systems. A complex of actual and replica Soviet-type threat systems began to grow around Slater Lake, a mile northwest of the main base, along with an acquired Soviet Barlock search radar placed at Air Force Station. They were arranged to simulate a Soviet-style air defense complex.( The Air Force began funding improvements to Area 51 in 1977 under project SCORE EVENT.  In 1979, the CIA transferred jurisdiction of the Area 51 site to the Air Force Flight Test Center at Edwards AFB, California.  Mr. Sam Mitchell, the last CIA commander of Area 51, relinquished command to USAF Lt. Col. Larry D. McClain.(Have Blue/F-117 programThe Have Blue prototype stealth fighter (a smaller proof-of-concept model of the Nighthawk) first flew at Groom in December 1977.(Rich, pp. 5660) In 1978, the Air Force awarded a full-scale development contract for the F-117 to Lockheed Corporations Advanced Development Projects.  On 17 January 1981 the Lockheed test team at Area 51 accepted delivery of the first full Scale Development (FSD) prototype #79-780, designated YF-117A.(   At 6:05 AM on June 18, 1981 Lockheed Skunk Works test pilot Hal Farley lifted the nose of YF-117A #79-780 off the runway of Area 51.(37th TFW History and Lineage of the F-117 Stealth Fighter Organizations)  Meanwhile, Air Command (TAC) decided to set up a group-level organization to guide the F-117A to an initial operating capability. That organization became the 4450th Tactical Group (Initially designated A Unit), which officially activated on 15 October 1979 at AFB, Nevada, although the group was physically located at Area 51.   The 4450th TG also operated the A-7D Corsair II as a surrogate trainer for the F-l17A, and these operations continued until 15 October 1982 under the guise of an avionics test mission.(Flying squadrons of the 4450th TG were the 4450th Tactical Squadron (Initially designated I Unit) activated on 11 June 1981, and 4451st Tactical Squadron (Initially designated P Unit) on 15 January 1983.  The 4450th TS, stationed at Area 51, was the first F-111A squadron, while the 4451st TS was stationed at Nellis AFB and was equipped with  Corsair IIs painted in a dark motif, tail coded LV.  Lockheed test pilots put the YF-117 through its early paces.   A-7Ds was used for pilot training before any F-117As had been delivered by Lockheed to Area 51, later the A-7Ds were used for F-117A chase testing and other weapon tests at the Nellis Range.15 October 1982 is important to the program because on that date Major Alton C. Whitley, Jr. became the first USAF 4450th TG pilot to fly the F-117A.(Although ideal for testing, Area 51 was not a suitable location for an operational group, so a new covert base had to be established for F-117 operations.(Area 51)Test Range Airport was selected for operations of the first USAF F-117 unit, the Tactical Group (TG).(4450th Tactical Group)   From October 1979, the Tonopah Airport base was reconstructed and expanded. The 6,000 ft runway was lengthened to 10,000 ft. Taxiways, a concrete apron, a large maintenance hanger, and a propane storage tank were added.(Tonopah Test Range Airport) By early 1982, four more YF-117A airplanes were operating out of the southern end of the base, known as the Southend or Baja Groom Lake. After finding a large scorpion in their offices, the testing team (Designated R Unit) adopted it as their mascot and dubbed themselves the Baja Scorpions. (  Testing of a series of ultra-secret prototypes continued at Area 51 until mid-1981, when testing transitioned to the initial production of F-117 stealth fighters.  The F-117s were moved to and from Area 51 by C-5 under the cloak of darkness, in order to maintain program security. This meant that the aircraft had to be defueled, disassembled, cradled, and then loaded aboard the C-5 at night, flown to Lockheed, and unloaded at night before the real work could begin. Of course, this meant that the reverse actions had to occur at the end of the depot work before the aircraft could be reassembled, flight-tested, and redelivered, again under the cover of darkness. In addition to flight-testing, Groom performed radar profiling, F-117 weapons testing, and was the location for training of the first group of frontline USAF F-117 pilots.Production FSD airframes from Lockheed were shipped to Area 51 for acceptance testing. As the Baja Scorpions tested the aircraft with functional check flights and L.O. verification, the operational airplanes were then transferred to the 4450th TG.((Baja Scorpions)On 17 May 1982, the move of the 4450th TG from Groom Lake to Tonoaph was initiated, with the final components of the move completed in early 1983. Production FSD airframes from Lockheed were shipped to Area 51 for acceptance testing. As the Baja Scorpions tested the aircraft with functional check flights and L.O. verification, the operational airplanes were then transferred to the 4450th TG at Tonopah.((The R-Unit was inactivated on 30 May 1989.  Upon deactivated the unit was reformed as reformed as Detachment 1, Fighter Weapons Wing (FWW).  In 1990 the last F-117A (#843) was delivered from Lockheed.  After completion of acceptance flights at Area 51 of this last new F-117A aircraft, the flight test squadron continued flight test duties of refurbished aircraft after modifications by Lockheed.  In February/March 1992 the test unit moved from Area 51 to the USAF Palmdale 42 and was integrated with the Force Systems Command 6510th Test Squadron.  Some testing, especially RCS verification and other classified activity was still conducted at Area  51 throughout the operational lifetime of the F-117.  The recently inactivated (2008) Flight Test Squadron traces its roots, if not its formal lineage to the 4450th TG R-unit.(Later operationsSince the F-117 became operational in 1983, operations at Groom Lake have continued. The base and its associated runway system were expanded.(Pike, John. Area 51 Facility Overview, of American Scientists.)(Motta, Mary (23 April 2000). Images of Top-Secret U.S. Air Base Show Growth, space.com: the photos ... show that the area has significantly expanded since the first images were snapped of the infamous site over 30 years ago.) In 1995, the federal government expanded the exclusionary area around the base to include nearby mountains that had hitherto afforded the only decent overlook of the base, prohibiting access to  of land formerly administered by the of Land Management.(United States military aircraft likely have been flown against Soviet-type radar systems and the Dynamic Coherent Measurement System (DYCOMS). The airborne RCS range likely has been used to measure the L.O. characteristics of all known  stealth aircraft from the F-117A to the Spirit and Raptor.(  Ongoing projects at Area 51 may include stealth aircraft development, weapons development, unmanned aerial vehicles, and avionics testing.  Workers toil in relative isolation and inhospitable conditions at the site to prove revolutionary technologies and enhance the readiness of todays warfighter and support national requirements.(  Commuter service is provided along Groom Lake Road by a bus, catering to a small number of employees living in several small communities beyond the NTS boundary (although it is not clear whether these workers are employed at Groom or at other facilities in the NTS). The bus travels Groom Lake Road and stops at Crystal Springs, Ash Springs, and Alamo, and parks at the Alamo courthouse overnight.Geographyarea51 map en.png|thumb|left|Map showing Area 51, NAFR, and the NTS  Area 51 shares a border with the Flat region of the Test Site (NTS), the location of 739 of the 928 nuclear tests conducted by the States Department of Energy at NTS.()(NTS map showing the different areas overlaid on topographic map. State of Nevada  Division of environmental protection)(Annotated NTS map at the of American Scientists website) The Mountain nuclear waste repository is   southwest of Groom Lake.The original rectangular base of  is now part of the so-called Groom box, a rectangular area measuring , of restricted airspace. The area is connected to the internal NTS road network, with paved roads leading south to Mercury and west to Yucca Flat. Leading northeast from the lake, the wide and well-maintained Groom Lake Road runs through a pass in the Jumbled Hills. The road formerly led to mines in the Groom basin, but has been improved since their closure. Its winding course runs past a security checkpoint, but the restricted area around the base extends further east. After leaving the restricted area, Groom Lake Road descends eastward to the floor of the Tikaboo Valley, passing the dirt-road entrances to several small ranches, before converging with State Route 375, the Extraterrestrial Highway,() south of Rachel.Environmental lawsuitFile:Area51 Tikaboo Peak 07.2008.jpg|thumb|Area 51 viewed from distant PeakIn 1994, five unnamed civilian contractors and the widows of contractors Walter Kasza and Robert Frost sued the USAF and the States Environmental Protection Agency. Their suit, in which they were represented by Washington University law professor Turley, alleged they had been present when large quantities of unknown chemicals had been burned in open pits and trenches at Groom. Biopsies taken from the complainants were analyzed by University biochemists, who found high levels of dioxin, dibenzofuran, and trichloroethylene in their body fat. The complainants alleged they had sustained skin, liver, and respiratory injuries due to their work at Groom, and that this had contributed to the deaths of Frost and Kasza. The suit sought compensation for the injuries they had sustained, claiming the USAF had illegally handled toxic materials, and that the EPA had failed in its duty to enforce the Conservation and Recovery Act (which governs handling of dangerous materials.) They also sought detailed information about the chemicals to which they were allegedly exposed, hoping this would facilitate the medical treatment of survivors. Congressman H. Hamilton, former chairman of the HouseIntelligence Committee, told Minutes reporter Stahl, The Air Force is classifying all information about Area 51 in order to protect themselves from a lawsuit.(Area 51 / Catch 22 segment, 60 Minutes broadcast 17 March 1996.)Citing the Secrets Privilege, the government petitioned trial judge U.S. District Judge Philip Pro (of the States District Court for the District of Nevada in Las Vegas) to disallow disclosure of classified documents or examination of secret witnesses, alleging this would expose classified information and threaten national security.(Rogers, Keith (4 June 2002). Federal judges to hear case involving Area 51, Las Vegas Review-Journal.) When Judge Pro rejected the governments argument, President Bill Clinton issued a Determination, exempting what it called, The Air Forces Operating Location Near Groom Lake, Nevada from environmental disclosure laws. Consequently, Pro dismissed the suit due to lack of evidence. Turley appealed to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, on the grounds that the government was abusing its power to classify material. Secretary of the Air Force E. Widnall filed a brief that stated that disclosures of the materials present in the air and water near Groom can reveal military operational capabilities or the nature and scope of classified operations. The Ninth Circuit rejected Turleys appeal,(US 9th Circuit ruling on Kasza V Browner and related case Frost V Perry, Lake, Widnall) and the U.S. Supreme Court refused to hear it, putting an end to the complainants case.The President continues to annually issue a determination continuing the Groom exception.()()() This, and similarly tacit wording used in other government communications, is the only formal recognition the U.S. Government has ever given that Groom Lake is more than simply another part of the Nellis complex.An unclassified memo on the safe handling of Nighthawk material was posted on an Air Force website in 2005. This discussed the same materials for which the complainants had requested information (information the government had claimed was classified). The memo was removed shortly after journalists became aware of it.(Rogers, Keith (21 May 2006). Warnings for emergency responders kept from Area 51 workers, Las Vegas Review-Journal.)1974 Skylab photographyFile:Groom Lake and Papoose Lake.jpg|thumb|Lake and Lake (lower right)In January 2006, space historian A. Day published an article in online aerospace magazine Space Review titled Astronauts and Area 51: the Skylab Incident. The article was based on a memo written in 1974 to CIA director Colby by an unknown CIA official. The memo reported that astronauts on board 4 had, as part of a larger program, inadvertently photographed a location of which the memo said:Although the name of the location was obscured, the context led Day to believe that the subject was Groom Lake. As Day noted:In other words, the CIA considered no other spot on Earth to be as sensitive as Groom Lake.()()The memo details debate between federal agencies regarding whether the images should be classified, with Department of Defense agencies arguing that it should, and NASA and the State Department arguing against classification. The memo itself questions the legality of unclassified images to be retroactively classified.Remarks on the memo,() handwritten apparently by DCI (of Central Intelligence) Colby himself, read:The declassified documents do not disclose the outcome of discussions regarding the Skylab imagery. The behind-the-scenes debate proved moot as the photograph appeared in the federal governments archive of satellite imagery along with the remaining Skylab 4 photographs, with no record of anyone noticing until Day identified it in 2007.()UFO and other conspiracy theories concerning Area 51Its secretive nature and undoubted connection to classified aircraft research, together with reports of unusual phenomena, have led Area 51 to become a focus of modern UFO and conspiracy theories. Some of the activities mentioned in such theories at Area 51 include:* The storage, examination, and engineering of crashed alien spacecraft (including material supposedly recovered at Roswell), the study of their occupants (living and dead), and the manufacture of aircraft based on alien technology.* Meetings or joint undertakings with extraterrestrials.* The development of exotic weapons for the Defense Initiative (SDI) or other weapons programs.* The development of means of control.* The development of travel and teleportation technology.* The development of unusual and exotic propulsion systems related to the Aurora Program.* Activities related to a supposed shadowy one world government or the 12 organization.Many of the hypotheses concern underground facilities at Groom or at Lake,  south, and include claims of a transcontinental underground railroad system, a disappearing airstrip (nicknamed the Cheshire Airstrip, after Carrolls cat) which briefly appears when water is sprayed onto its camouflaged asphalt,() and engineering based on alien technology. Publicly available satellite imagery, however, reveals clearly visible landing strips at Groom Dry Lake, but not at Papoose Lake.Veterans of experimental projects such as OXCART and NERVA at Area 51 agree that their work (including 2,850 OXCART test flights alone) inadvertently prompted many of the UFO sightings and other rumors:(They believe that the rumors helped maintain secrecy over Area 51s actual operations.( While the veterans deny the existence of a vast underground railroad system, many of Area 51s operations did (and presumably still do) occur underground.(Several people have claimed knowledge of events supporting Area 51 conspiracy theories. These have included Lazar, who claimed in 1989 that he had worked at Area 51s S-4 (a facility at Papoose Lake), where he was contracted to work with alien spacecraft that the U.S. government had in its possession.() Similarly, the 1996 documentary Dreamland directed by Burgess included an interview with a 71 year old mechanical engineer who claimed to be a former employee at Area 51 during the 1950s. His claims included that he had worked on a flying disc simulator which had been based on a disc originating from a crashed extraterrestrial craft and was used to train US Pilots. He also claimed to have worked with an extraterrestrial being named J-Rod and described as a telepathic translator.(Dreamland, Transmedia and Dandelion Production for Sky Television (1996).) In 2004, Dan Burisch (pseudonym of Dan Crain) claimed to have worked on cloning alien viruses at Area 51, also alongside the alien named J-Rod. Burischs scholarly credentials are the subject of much debate, as he was apparently working as a Las Vegas parole officer in 1989 while also earning a PhD at SUNY.()Portrayal in media and popular cultureNovels, films, television programs, and other fictional portrayals of Area 51 describe itor a fictional counterpartas a haven for extraterrestrials, time travel, and sinister conspiracies, often linking it with the UFO incident. In the 1996 action film Independence Day, the United States military uses alien technology captured at Roswell to attack the invading alien fleet from Area 51. The Hangar 51() government warehouse of the Indiana Jones films stores, among other exotic items, the of the Covenant and an alien corpse from Roswell. The television series Seven Days takes place inside Area 51, with the base containing a covert NSA travel operation using alien technology recovered from Roswell. The 2005 video game Area 51 is set in the base, and mentions the Roswell and moon landing hoax conspiracy theories. See also* Proving Ground, a restricted facility in the Utah desert.* Range, a mountain range north of the lakebed.* Yar, a Russian rocket launch and development site.* Prohibited Area, a defense and aerospace testing area in Australia.References;General* Rich, Ben R.; Janos, Leo (1994). Skunk Works: A personal memoir of my years at Lockheed. Boston: Little, Brown. ISBN 978-0-316-74300-6* Darlington, David (1998). Area 51: The Dreamland Chronicles. New York: Henry Holt. ISBN 978-0-8050-6040-9* Patton, Phil (1998). Dreamland: Travels Inside the Secret World of Roswell and Area 51. New York: Villard / Random House ISBN 978-0-375-75385-5* Area 51 resources at the of American Scientists.* Stahl Area 51 / Catch 22 Minutes Television 17 March 1996, a US TV news magazines segment about the environmental lawsuit.(Transcript)* Area 51 related article archive from the pages of the Vegas Review-Journal* Jacobsen, Annie (2011). Area 51. New York, Little, Brown and Company.  ISBN 978-0-316-13294-7 (hc) ;SpecificExternal links;General* Dreamland Resort  Detailed history of Area 51* Roadrunners Internationale, a project covering the history of the U2 and Blackbird projects* How Area 51 Works, on HowStuffWorks;Maps and photographs* Dreamland Resorts map of Area 51 buildings* Topographic Map of the Emigrant Valley / Groom area* Aerial photos from different decades, overlaid with Google Maps interface* Photographs of McCarran EG&G terminal and JANET aircraft* Official FAA aeronautical chart of Groom Lake* Historical pictures of Groom Lake, Groom Lake Mining District, Department of Special Collections, Digital Image Collections, of Nevada, Reno,  accessed 30 January 2009515151515151515151eremua51ko:51515151515151kk:51-zonakrzet5151ja:51515151515151515151515151515151Blge51zh:51
2377
Andhra_Pradesh
 footnotes               Andhra Pradesh ( ), is one of the 28 states of India, situated on the southeastern coast of India. It is Indias fourth largest state by area and fifth largest by population. Its capital and largest city by population is Hyderabad.The total GDP of Andhra Pradesh is $100 billion and is ranked third among all states in India() .The State has the second-longest coastline of  among all the States in India.()  The primary official language of Andhra Pradesh is Telugu and Urdu is the secondary official language in some places,() while other languages spoken in Andhra Pradesh are Hindi, Marathi, Tamil, Kannada, Oriya. 10281 persons declare English as their first language in Andhra Pradesh according to the 2001 census.(English Demography)Andhra Pradesh lies between 1241 and 22N latitude and 77 and 8440E longitude, and is bordered by Maharashtra, Chhattisgarh and Orissa in the north, the of Bengal in the East, Nadu to the south and Karnataka to the west.  Andhra Pradesh is historically called the Rice Bowl of India.  More than 77% of its crop is rice; Andhra Pradesh produced 17,796,000 tonnes of rice in 2006.( )  Two major rivers, the Godavari and the Krishna, run across the state.  The small enclave () of Yanam, a district of Puducherry, lies in the Godavari Delta in the northeast of the state.On 1 November 1956, the Reorganization Act formed Andhra Pradesh by merging Telugu-speaking areas of State(Telangana) and the already existing Andhra State .()Early HistoryFile:Ramappa temple stone carved Lord Ganapathi Relief near palampet of Warangal dist Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Ramappa temple stone carved Lord Ganapathi Relief near palampet of Warangal dist Andhra PradeshImage:Kondavid6.jpg|thumb|left|120px|KondaveeduFile:Kakateeya Sculpture.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Kakatiya sculpture at WarangalFile:A pillar at Ahobilam temple in Kurnool District of Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|100px|right|A pillar at Ahobilam temple in District of Andhra PradeshFile:Rock-cut Lord --Buddha-- Statue at Bojjanakonda near Anakapalle of Visakhapatnam dist in AP.jpg|thumb|120px|Rock-cut Lord --Buddha-- Statue at Bojjanakonda near Anakapalle, VisakhapatnamHistorical evidences reveal that Non-Aryans like Kirata (Andhra Charitamu, part 1, Author: Chilukuri Veerabhadra Rao, Ananda Print house, Chennai, 1910) tribes lived in dense forests of South India before Aryans can enter India through Sindhu river coast, about 4000 B.C. Rigveda reveals that these Non Aryans have built their towns and dynasties and fought against Aryans. Aryans hated Non Aryans for their strange traditions. The black color complexion, ugly look, rude behavior of Non Aryans, and their un-understandable language made Aryans to mention them as Asuras  who are not having a language and deity in their scriptures. Non Aryans could not digest Aryans who grabbed their lands and exercising authority. As a result, battles happened between them; nevertheless Non Aryans could not win against invincible and witty Aryans. Unable to face the fierceness of Aryans, Non Aryans used to hide in caves during the day and used to grab food grains, destroy routes and fire rituals, and abduct Aryan women at night times. To protect their Women, Males of Aryans insisted their women not to move out of habitations. Centuries passed by Aryans got mixed with Non Aryans and it resulted in formation of new cultured social groups.  These evidences say that the people of Andhra are a breed of Aryans and Non-Aryans. An Andhra tribe was mentioned in the epics such as Brahmana (800 BCE) and Mahabharata (400 BCE).() The Shastra written by Bharatha (1st century BCE) also mentions the Andhra people.() The roots of the language have been seen on inscriptions found near the Guntur district() and from others dating to the rule of Renati Cholas in the 5th century CE.(Indian Epigraphy, R. Saloman, University Press, 1998,ISBN 0-19-509984-2, p. 106)Megasthenes, a Greek traveller and geographer who visited the Court of Maurya (322297 BCE), mentioned that the region had three fortified towns and an army of 100,000 infantry, 200 cavalry, and 1,000 elephants. Buddhist books reveal that Andhras established their huts or tents near the River at that time.(Pliny the Elder, The Natural History)Inscriptional evidence shows that there was an early kingdom in Andhra (Guntur District) ruled first by Kuberaka and then by his son Varun, with Pratipalapura (Bhattiprolu) as the capital. Around the same time, Dhanyakatakam/Dharanikota (present day Amaravati) appears to have been an important place, which was visited by Buddha. According to the ancient Tibetan scholar Taranatha: On the full moon of the month Chaitra in the year following his enlightenment, at the great stupa of Dhanyakataka, the Buddha emanated the mandala of The Glorious Lunar Mansions (Kalachakra).(Helmutt Hoffmann, Buddhas Preaching of the Kalachakra Tantra at the Stupa of Dhanyakataka, German Scholars on India, Vol. I. PP. 136140. (Varanasi, 1973))()Literary evidence shows that long before Satavahanas, a legendary king named Vi?h?u ruled in and around the Diviseema region of Andhra Pradesh. After his reign, people came to believe that he had an amsa of the divine savior Lord Maha Vishnu himself. Perhaps in his honor, people dedicated a new temple now located at Srikaku?am, District. The lord of the temple is known as Andhra Vi?h?u or Srikaku?andhra Vi?h?u. The Mauryans extended their rule over Andhra in the 4th century BC. With the fall of the Maurya Empire in the 3rd century BC, the Satavahanas became independent. After the decline of the Satavahanas in 220 CE, the dynasty, Pallavas, Gotrikas, Rashtrakutas, Vishnukundinas, Chalukyas, and Cholas ruled the land.(G. Durga Prasad, History of the Andhras up to 1565 A. D., P.G. Publishers, Guntur, p. 116)During this period, Telugu emerged as a popular language, supplanting Prakrit and Sanskrit.(Epigraphica Indica, 27: 220228) Telugu was made the official language by the Vishnukundina kings (5th and 6th centuries), who ruled from their capital city of Vengi. Eastern Chalukyas ruled for a long period after the decline of Vishnukundinas; their capital was also Vengi. As early as the 1st century CE, Chalukyas were mentioned as being vassals and chieftains under the Satavahanas and later under the Ikshvakus. The Chalukya ruler Narendra ruled Rajahmundry around 1022 CE.()The battle of Palnadu (1182) resulted in the weakening of the Eastern Chalukya dynasty and led to the emergence of the dynasty in the 12th and 13th centuries CE. The Kakatiyas were at first vassals of the Rashtrakutas, and ruled over a small territory near Warangal. Eventually all the Telugu lands were united by the Kakatiyas. In 1323 CE, Delhi Sultan al-Din Tughluq sent a large army under Ulugh Khan to conquer the Telugu country and captured Warangal. King Prataparudra was taken prisoner. Nayaks recaptured Warangal from the Delhi Sultanate in 1326 CE and ruled for fifty years. Inspired by their success, the Empire, one of the greatest empires in the history of Andhra Pradesh and India, was founded by Harihara and Bukka, who served as treasury officers of the Kakatiyas of Warangal.(Robert Sewell, A Forgotten Empire (Vijayanagar): A contribution to the history of India, Chapter 2 Gutenberg.org) In 1347 CE, an independent Muslim state, the Sultanate, was established in India by Bahman Shah in a revolt against the Delhi Sultanate. The Shahi dynasty held sway over the Andhra country for about two hundred years from the early part of the 16th century to the end of the 17th century.() Although Hyderabad was founded less than 500 years ago, archaeologists have unearthed Iron Age sites near the city that could date back to 500 BC. Approximately over 1000 years ago this region was ruled by Kakatiyas until 1310 AD, and fell under Delhi sultanate from (13101345), when the central sultanate became weak the Bahmani Sultan revolted against the Sultan of Delhi Muhammad bin Tughluq and established an independent state in Deccan within the Delhi Sultanates southern provinces and ruled until 1518 AD. Quli Qutb-ul-Mulk, governor of golconda, declared Independence from Bahmani Dynasty, and announced himself a sultan of golconda in the year 1518 AD, and founded the Qutb Shahi dynasty.()Muhammad Quli Qutb Shah, a fifth Sultan of the Qutb Shahi dynasty (the ruling family of the Golconda Sultanate, previously a feudatory of Bahmani sultanate that declared independence in 1512) founded the city of Hyderabad on the banks of the Musi River in 159120 to relieve a water shortage the dynasty had experienced at its old headquarters at Golconda city(11 kilometers west of Hyderabad city on the other side of Musi). He also ordered the construction of the Charminar. The Mughal emperor Aurangzeb captured kingdom of Golconda including the city of Hyderabad in 1687 and, during this short Mughal rule, Mughal-appointed governors of the city soon gained autonomy.(http://www.ourmch.com/hyd/hydhistory.asp)In 1724, Asaf Jah I, who was granted the title Nizam-ul-Mulk (Governor of the country) by the Mughal emperor, defeated a rival official to establish control over kingdom of Golconda renamed it as Hyderabad state. Thus began the Asaf Jahi dynasty that ruled Hyderabad State until a year after Indias independence from Britain. Asaf Jahs successors ruled as the Nizams of Hyderabad. The rule of the seven Nizams saw the growth of Hyderabad city both culturally and economically. Hyderabad city became the formal capital of the kingdom (Hyderabad state) and Golkonda city was almost abandoned. Huge reservoirs, like the Nizam Sagar, Tungabhadra, Osman Sagar, and Himayat Sagar, were built. Survey work on Nagarjuna Sagar had also begun during this time; the actual work was completed by the Government of India in 1969. The wealth and grandeur of the Nizams is demonstrated by the fabled Jewels of The Nizams, which is a tourist attraction. The state was the richest and the largest among the princely states of India. The land area of the state was 90,543 mi; its population in 1901 was 50,073,759. It enjoyed an estimated revenue of 90,029,000.(nameGolcondathroughtime)(nameTheNocturnalCourt)File:Charminar in hyderabad AP.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Charminar at HyderabadEarly modern   APImage:vizagcity.jpg|thumbnail|right|Vizag skylineIn India, Circars became part of the British Presidency. Eventually this region emerged as the Andhra region. Later the Nizam rulers of Hyderabad ceded five territories to the British which eventually emerged as Rayalaseema region. The Nizams retained control of the interior provinces as the state of Hyderabad, acknowledging British rule in return for local autonomy. However, Bheem, a tribal leader, started his fight against the erstwhile Jahi Dynasty for the liberation of State.() Meanwhile, the French occupied Yanam, in the Godavari delta, and (save for periods of British control) would hold it until 1954.India became independent from the United Kingdom in 1947. The Nizam wanted to retain the independence of the Princely Hyderabad State from India, but the people of the region launched a movement to join the Indian Union. The state of Hyderabad was forcibly joined to the Republic of India with Polo in 1948.()In an effort to gain an independent state  based on the linguistic and protect the interests of the Andhra (Telugu-speaking) people of State, Sreeramulu fasted until death in 1952. After his death, Andhra attained statehood on 1 November 1953, with Kurnool as its capital.()On 1 November 1956, the Reorganization Act merged the Telugu-speaking areas of the former Hyderabad state with the Telugu-speaking areas of the former Madras state to form the state of Vishalandhra, which is named as Andhra Pradesh. The city of Hyderabad, the former capital of the Hyderabad State, was made the capital of the new state. There were several movements to disintegrate Andhra Pradesh into two states viz. Andhra and Telengana in the late 1960 which are continuing till date.On 9 December 2009, it was announced that a separation proposal for Telangana would be introduced to the state assembly.() Controversy arose as to the future status of Hyderabad City, part of one of the ten districts of Telangana region.() This move was opposed by protesters from Kosta and Rayalaseema regions. On 23 December 2009, the government decided to put the decision of bifurcating the state on hold until a consensus is achieved among the different political parties.This agitated supporters of a separate Telangana state.() On 5 January 2010, the Central Government represented by Home Minister P Chidambaram conducted a meeting by inviting all the recognised political parties of AP and recorded their stand on the issue. The Government of India appointed a committee, headed by N. Srikrishna, to guide the central government to settle the issue of Telangana amicably.() The committee submitted its report on 30 December 2010, a day before its term was to expire.()Geography and climateImage:Godavari satellite view.jpg|left|x150px|thumb|The Mouth of the River (East) emptying into the Bay of BengalFile:Greater Flamingoes (Phoenicopterus roseus) taking off W2 IMG 9855.jpg|thumb|200px|Flamingoes (Phoenicopterus roseus) taking off Pocharam lakeFile:Vizag Seaport aerial view.jpg|150px|thumbnail|right|Aerial view of Visakhapatnam portGeographically, Andhra Pradesh is composed of most of the eastern half of the plateau and the plains to the east of the Ghats. Andhra Pradesh is divided into three regions. The northern part of the plateau is the Telangana region and the southern part is known as Rayalaseema. These two regions are separated by the Krishna. The third region is Andhra.()  The plains to the east of Eastern Ghats form the coastal plains. The Eastern Ghats are discontinuous and individual sections have local names. The Kadapa Basin() formed by two arching branches of the Eastern Ghats is a mineral rich area. The coastal plains are for the most part delta regions formed by the Godavari, Krishna, and Penner rivers. The Eastern Ghats are a major dividing line in the states geography. The Ghats become more pronounced towards the south and extreme north of the coast. The Eastern Ghat region is home to dense tropical forests, while the vegetation becomes sparse as the Ghats give way to the Deccan Plateau, where shrub vegetation is more common. Most of the coastal plains are put to intense agricultural use. The west and southwest parts of Andhra Pradesh have semi-arid conditions.Space Research Organisations Dhawan Space Centre is located at the Island of Sriharikota, in Nellore district of Andhra Pradesh.File:Ethipothala Water Falls2.jpg|thumb|left|200px|FallsThe climate of Andhra Pradesh varies considerably, depending on the geographical region. Monsoons play a major role in determining the climate of the state. Summers last from March to June. In the coastal plain, the summer temperatures are generally higher than the rest of the state, with temperature ranging between 20 C and 41 C.()July to September is the seasons for tropical rains in Andhra Pradesh. The state receives heavy rainfall from Southwest Monsoon during these months. About one third of the total rainfall in Andhra Pradesh is brought by the Northeast Monsoon. October and November see low-pressure systems and tropical cyclones form in the Bay of Bengal which, along with the Northeast Monsoon, bring rains to the southern and coastal regions of the state. November, December, January, and February are the winter months in Andhra Pradesh. Since the state has a long coastal belt the winters are not very cold. The range of winter temperature is generally 12 C to 30 C.(Hyderabad is the capital and, along with the adjoining twin city Secunderabad, is the largest city in the state.Visakhapatnam, Andhra Pradeshs main seaport, is the second largest city and is home to the Navys Eastern Naval Command.  Due to its location and proximity to major rail and road routes, Vijayawada is a major trading center and is the third largest city of the state, followed by Tirupati, Warangal, Rajahmundry, Kakinada and Guntur. Other important places of the state are Nellore, Srikakulam, Kurnool, and Kadapa.Demographicsstate color4  BrownTelugu is the official language of the state, spoken by 83% of the population. Major linguistic minority groups include Urdu (8.63%), Hindi (3.23%),  and Tamil (1.01%).Other languages spoken in Andhra Pradesh by less than 1% each are Marathi (0.8%), Kannada(0.74%), and Oriya (0.44%). Languages spoken by less than 0.2% of the population include Malayalam (0.08%), Gujarati (0.06%), Bengali (0.05%), Gorkhali/Nepali (0.03%), Punjabi (0.01%) and Sindhi(0.01%).()The main ethnic group of Andhra Pradesh is the people, who are primarily Dravidians.Andhra Pradesh ranks tenth compared to all Indian States in the Human Development Index scores() with a score of 0.416.The National Council of Applied Economic Research district analysis in 2001 reveals that Khammam, Krishna, Godavari, Chittoor, and Medak are the five districts with the highest Development Indexscores in ascending order in rural AP. The data show that the poor make up 16.3 per cent of the total population in rural AP and expenditure on consumption is around 13.5 per cent of the total consumption expenditure. The female literacy rate is 0.66 compared to male literacy rate in rural AP. The district-wise variations for poverty ratio are high and low for the ratio of female/male literacy rate.()EconomyAndhra Pradeshs GSDP for 2010 was estimated at $100.35 billion in current prices. The state ranks third in terms of overall Gross State Product among all the states of the Indian Union.() In terms of per capita GSDP the state compares very favorably with other large states. In the 2010 list by Magazine, there are Seven from Andhra Pradesh among the top 100 richest Indians.Image:EastGodavari 1.JPG|left|thumb|180px|Coconut fields in GodavariFile:Srisailam-dam-with-gates-open-2.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Dam - Hydro Electric Power SourceAgriculture has been the chief source of income for the states economy. Andhra Pradesh is an exporter of many agricultural products. Four important rivers of India, the Godavari, Krishna, Penna, and Thungabhadra flow through the state, providing irrigation. Rice, sugarcane, cotton, pepper, mango, and tobacco are the local crops. Recently, crops used for vegetable oil production such as sunflower and peanuts have gained favour. There are many multi-state irrigation projects in development, including River Basin Irrigation Projects and Sagar Dam.()()The service sector of the state accounts for 43% of the gross state domestic product (GSDP) and employs 20% of the work force.( Andhra Pradesh economy has registered over 5.5% annual economic growth rate during the last two decades. The state is one of the most industrially developed states of India.Andhra Pradesh ranks second in India in terms of mineral wealth. The state has about one third of Indias limestone reserves, estimated at about 30 billion tonnes. The Tumalappalli Uranium mine in Andhra has confirmed 49,000 tonnes of ore and there are indications that it could hold reserves totalling three times its current size, The Times of India quoted Srikumar Banerjee as saying. The mines proven reserve is enough to support a 8,000 mega watts nuclear power plant for 40 years, the report added. The Godavari Basin has huge reserves of natural gas and petroleum. The state has a large amount of coal reserves.( The state ranks first nationwide in hydro electricity generation, with a national market share of over 11%. Andhra Pradesh has the second largest power generating utility in the country, with an installed capacity of around 10,650 MW. The two cheapest sources of thermal power generation  coal and natural gas  are in abundance.Information technology and other key sectorscity.jpg|thumb|180px|left|Cyber Towers at HyderabadIn 20042005, Andhra Pradesh was at the second position in the list of top technology exporting states of India. The IT sector is expanding at a rate of 52.3% every year. The IT exports reached  19,000 crores ($4.5 billion) in 20062007, contributed to 14 per cent of total IT exports of the nation and ranked fourth in India.(http://www.pppinindia.com/business-opportunities-andhra-pradesh.asp) Other key sectors include, Biopharmaceuticals, Power, Automobile, Tourism, Textiles, Leather, Mining and Religious tourism.Administrationpx|left|The Andhra Pradesh State Legislative Assembly at the centre of Hyderabad City.Andhra Pradesh has a Sabha (legislative assembly, lower house) of 294 seats, and a Parishad (legislative council, upper house) of 90 members. 31 members are elected from local bodies, 31 members are elected from the assembly, eight members are elected from teachers, eight members are elected from graduates, and 12 members are nominated by the Governor. In the of India Andhra Pradesh has 18 in the Sabha, the Upper House, and 42 in the Sabha, the Lower House.()()Andhra Pradesh had a series of governments headed by Indian National Congress (INC) Party until 1982. N. Chandrababu Naidu held the record for the longest serving chief minister (1995 to 2004). V. Narasimha Rao served as the chief minister of the state from 1971 to 1973, and went on to become the Prime Minister of India in 1991. The first Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh was Sanjiva Reddy, who later served as President of India. The Congress Chief Ministers of the state are Sanjivayya, Brahmananda Reddy, V. Narasimha Rao, Vengala Rao, Chenna Reddy, Anjaiah, Venkatarami Reddy, Vijaya Bhaskara Reddy, Bhaskara Rao, Janardhana Reddy, S. Rajasekhara Reddy, Rosaiah and Kiran Kumar Reddy.File:Highcourt11.jpg|thumb|280px|Pradesh High Court at Hyderabad, the main judicial body for the StateUntil 1962, the CPI, along with socialist parties, played an important role as opposition parties. Parties namely Praja Socialist Party and Krishi Lok Party played important role in 1950s. In the 1967 state assembly elections all socialist parties were eliminated and CPI lost opposition party status. N.G. Rangas Swatantra Party became the Opposition Party. They also failed to hold control later and became defunct. In 1978  Jalagam Vengal Rao and Kasu Brahmananda Reddy formed the Reddy Congress and contested against Congress (I) but lost.In 1983 the Desam Party (TDP) won the State elections and Rama Rao (NTR) became the chief minister of the state for the first time. This broke the long time single party monopoly enjoyed by the INC from 1956 until 1982. A few months after the election, Bhaskara Rao usurped power when NTR was away in the United States for medical treatment. After coming back, NTR campaigned for a comeback by demonstrating the support of the majority of the elected MLAs. The  governor Ram Lal was ousted by Gandhi and in his place she appointed Dayal Sharma. NTR was reinstated as Chief Minister. Within a month NTR recommended the dissolution of the assembly and called for fresh elections. Gandhi was assassinated on 31 October 1984 by her Sikh bodyguard and Gandhi was made Prime Minister by President Giani Singh. In the ensuing elections for Lok Sabha and the AP Assembly, the Telugu Desam Party won in Andhra Pradesh and NTR came back to power.The 1989 elections ended the rule of NTR, with the INC party returning to power with Chenna Reddy at the helm. He was replaced by Janardhan Reddy in 1990, who was replaced by Vijaya Bhaskara Reddy in 1992. In 1994, Andhra Pradesh gave a mandate to the Telugu Desam Party again, and NTR became the chief minister again. Chandrababu Naidu, the son-in-law of NTR, usurped power with the backing of a majority of the MLAs. The Telugu Desam Party won both the assembly and Lok Sabha election in 1999 under the leadership of Chandrababu Naidu. There was an assassination attempt on Naidu in 2003 in Tirupathi; he survived the attack. In the ensuing elections the party lost power to a resurgent Congress Party and its allies. S. Rajasekhar Reddy became the Chief Minister.S. Rajasekhar Reddy became the CM again by fending off the Rajyam Party and a major alliance of TDP, TRS, CPI and CPM. He died on 2 September 2009 in a helicopter crash. Rosaiah, a senior statesman and former State Finance Minister, became the Chief Minister of AP on 3 September 2009. On 24 November 2010, Rosaiah submitted his resignation on the grounds of increased work pressure. Kiran Kumar Reddy Reddy was sworn in as the new CM on the following day.(thehindu.com)Religious TourismFile:Tirumalatemple.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Venkateswara Temple, an important pilgrimage site in TirupatiMandir Hindu templeFile:Diguva mangalagiri temple guntur dist AP.jpg|thumb|200px|right|Diguva Mangalagiri TempleFile:Kanaka Durga Temple.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Durga Temple in VijayawadaFile:Ramappa1.jpg|thumb|200px|right|TempleFile:Malluru Ugra Narasimha Swamy Temple at Mangapet of Warangal District Andhra Pradesh, India.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Malluru Ugra Narasimha Swamy Temple at Mangapet of District Andhra Pradesh, IndiaVenkateswara Temple in the town of Tirumala in Chittoor district is a very important pilgrimage site for Hindus throughout India. It is the richest piligrimage city of any religious faith in the world.() Its main temple is dedicated to the god Venkateswara, it was also a perfect example of dravidian architecture under Tamil kings.The five ancient temples of Shiva, known as Kshetras, are located at - Amararama, Draksharama, Somarama, Ksheerarama and Kumararama. The Sivalingas at these temples are made from a single Sivalinga. Simhachalam is another popular pilgrimage site of national importance located on a hill  north of the Visakhapatnam city centre. Simhachalam is said to be the abode of the savior-god Narasimha, who rescued Prahlada from his abusive father Hiranyakashipu. One of the most exquisitely sculpted shrines of Andhra Pradesh, it has a  beautifully carved 16-pillared Natya mantapa and a 96-pillared Kalyana mantapa. The temple was built in 11th century by Kullotunga chola. Engaged couples go to this temple as a ritual just before marriage. It is one of the most crowded temples of Andhra Pradesh.File:India food.jpg|thumb|right|150px|biryani served with other Indian dishesSrisailam temple in district is a very famous Shiva temple, and is one of the twelve Jyotirlinga shrines. Lord Ramahimself installed the Sahasralinga, while the Pandavas lodged the Panchapandava lingas in the temple courtyard. The Purana, an ancient religious text, has a chapter called Srisaila Kandam dedicated to this temple, which points to its ancient origin. It is said that Shankara (c. 788821 CE) visited this temple at the time that he composed his Sivananda Lahiri.   Srisailam is located in Kurnool district.Temple is a temple to Lord Rama in the town of Bhadrachalam in district. It is situated on the banks of the river Godavari. This is the place where Gopanna (16201680) wrote his devotional songs dedicated to lord Rama. It was believed that lord Rama spent some years on the banks of river Godavari here in Yuga. Gopanna raised the funds and constructed the temple during the reign of Tanisha in the 17th century. Rama Navami, a celebration of the Marriage of Lord Rama and sita, is celebrated here every year. Government of Andhra Pradesh sends pearls for the event.File:Uggani bajji .jpg|thumb|right|150px|Uggani bajji - typical snack of RayalaseemaDurga Temple is a temple to the goddess Durga situated on the Indrakeeladri Hill in the city of Vijayawada on the banks of River.  Special pujas are performed during Dasara, also called Navratri. The most significant are Saraswati puja and Theppotsavam. The festival of Dasara for the Goddess Durga is celebrated there every year. A large number of pilgrims attend the colourful celebrations and take a holy dip in the Krishna River.Other temples and piligrimage sites in Andhra Pradesh*Saraswati Temple, Basar is a temple to the goddess Saraswati, goddess of education. Basar is located in district 50 kilometers from Nirmal.*Yaganti Caves and Mahanandi are pilgrimage centres in Kurnool District.*Kailasagiri Temple Hill, in Visakhapatnam.*Mandir, in Hyderabad.*Temple, at Hayathnagar, in Hyderabad.*Balaji Temple, on the banks of Sagar Lake.*Temple, constructed in 1213, is located 77 km from Warangal.*Masjid in Hyderabad.*There is a statue of Buddha that was erected in 1992 on the Hussain Sagar Lake in Hyderabad.*Temple is an ancient Shiva temple located on the banks of river Swarnamukhi in Chittoor district.*Satyanarayana Swamy temple in Annavaram in Godavari district.*Vemulavada in Karimnagar district is another popular place of pilgrimage. It is best known for the Raja Rajeshwara temple.*Venkateswara Temple in Chinna Tirupathi(Dwaraka Tirumala) near to Tadepalligudem and Eluru.*Veerabhadra temple at Lepakshi in Ananthapur district.*Viswa Viznana Vidya Adhyatmika Peetham is a theosophical congregation based on the principles of oneness of God, and discovering divinity in the self. The ashram is situated in Pithapuram, Godavari district.CultureBapus paintings, Venkata Subba Raos Yenki Paatalu (Songs about a washerwoman called Yenki), mischievous Budugu (a character by Mullapudi), Annamayyas songs, Aavakaaya (a variant of mango pickle in which the kernel of mango is retained), Gongura (a chutney from Roselle plant), Atla Taddi (a seasonal festival predominantly for teenage girls), the banks of river Godavari, and the Dudu basavanna (the ceremonial ox decorated for door-to-door exhibition during the harvest festival Sankranthi) have long defined Telugu culture. The village of Durgi is known for stone craft, producing carvings of idols in soft stone that must be exhibited in the shade because they are prone to weathering. Kalamkari is an ancient textile art form dating back to the Valley Civilization. Andhra Pradesh is famous for doll making. Dolls are made from wood, mud, dry grass, and lightweight metal alloys. Tirupathi is famous for redwood carvings. Kondapalli is famous for mud toys with rich colors. The village of Etikoppaka, located in district, produces lacquered toys. Nirmal paintings are expressive and are usually painted over a black background. Story telling in Andhra Pradesh is an art form in itself. Folk dances unique to Andhra Pradesh include Yaksha ganam, Burra katha (usually done by three people, telling stories using three different musical instruments), Jangama kathalu, Hari kathalu, Chekka bajana, Urumula natyam (usually done at festivals, where a group of people dance in circles with loud music), and Ghata natyam (performances done with earthen pots over ones head).Andhra Pradesh has many museums,  the Jung Museum in Hyderabad, which features a varied collection of sculptures, paintings, and religious artifacts, including the Archaeological Museum() at Amaravati near Guntur City that features relics of nearby ancient sites, and the Museum, in Visakhapatnam, which displays the history of the pre-Independence and thotla konda which depicts the age old budhist stupas and cultural style, Presidency in a rehabilitated Dutch bungalow.() Victoria Jubilee Museum in Vijayawada has a good collection of ancient sculptures, paintings, idols, weapons, cutlery and inscriptions. Other ancient sites include dozens of ancient Buddhist stupas in Nagarjunakonda which is now an island in Sagar, an artificial lake that formed after the construction of Sagar Dam. The Island has a large museum that houses many Buddhist relics.(IndiaTourism.com, Victoria Jubilee Museum.)Just like in other parts of the country, many festivals are celebrated in Andhra Pradesh, which inlcude -Ugadi, Sankranthi, Dasara, Vratham,  Vinayaka Chavithi,  Deepavali, Batukamma, Rakhi poornima, Christmas, Rama Navami, Bonalu, Shivaratri, Chaviti, Holi, ul-Fitr, al-Adha, Muharram, Milad-un-Nabi etc.CuisineThe cuisine of Andhra Pradesh is one of the spiciest of all cuisines. There are many variations to the cuisine (all involving rice) depending on geographical regions, caste, and traditions. Pickles and chutneys, called thoku  also called as pachadi in Telugu, are particularly popular in Andhra Pradesh and many varieties of pickles and chutneys are unique to the State. Chutneys are made from practically every vegetable including tomatoes, brinjals (eggplant), and roselle (Gongura).Avaakaya (mango) is probably the best known of the Andhra Pradesh pickles. Rice is the food and is used in a wide variety of ways. Typically, rice is either boiled and eaten with curry, or made into a batter for use in a crepe-like dish called attu (pesarattu is made of a mixture of this batter and mung beans) or dosas, a crepe filled with black beans or lentils.Meat, vegetables and greens are prepared with different spices (masala) into a variety of strongly flavored dishes such as Hyderabadi Biryani, fish curry, brinjal curry,  and Gongura pachadi the most popular dish of andhra pradesh.An Andhra dish is recognized with the dish being listed in the menu. The coastal region is even more well versed with the varieties in sea food specially known for Chapala Pulusu, Bommidala pulusu, Koramenu kura. Especially Hyderabadi cuisine is influenced by the Muslims who arrived in Telangana in the 14th century. Much of the cuisine revolves around meat. It is rich and aromatic, with a liberal use of exotic spices and ghee (clarified butter). Lamb, chicken, and fish are the most widely used meats in the non-vegetarian dishes. Biriyani is perhaps the most distinctive and popular dish of Hyderabadi cuisine.DanceFile:Yamini Reddy kuchipudi.jpg||thumb|right|150px|Kuchipudi, dance by Yamini ReddyClassical dance in Andhra can be performed by both men and women; women tend to learn it more often. Kuchipudi is the states best-known classical dance form. The various dance forms that existed through the states history are Bonalu, Dappu,  Chenchu Bhagotham, Kuchipudi, Bhamakalapam, Burrakatha, Veeranatyam, Butta bommalu,  Tappeta Gullu, Lambadi,  Dhimsa, Kolattam, and Chindu. Jaanapadam theenmar is a popular folk dance.File:A Kuchipudi Dancer from Andhra Pradesh.JPG|thumb|left|150px|Kuchipudi DancerJayapa Senani was the first person to write about the dances prevalent in Andhra Pradesh.(TeluguPeople.com, Ntitya Ratnavali.) Both Desi and Margi forms of dances are included in his Sanskrit treatise Nrutya Ratnavali.LiteratureImage:Sets in Ramoji Film City.jpg|thumb|120px|left|A western street replica at Film CityFile:Balamuralikrishna in Kuwait.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Balamuralikrishna during a concert in Kuwait on 29 March 2006, accompanied by Mavelikkara Sathees Chandran (violin), Perunna G. Harikumar (mridangom), Manjoor Unnikrishnan (ghatam)File:Medakcathedralsideview.png|thumb|150px|right|The of South India Cathedral at MedakNannayya, Tikkana, and Yerrapragada form the trinity who translated the great Sanskrit epic Mahabharata into Telugu. Pothana is the poet who composed the classic SriMad Maha Bhagavatamu, a Telugu translation of Sri Bhagavatham, authored by Veda Vyasa in Sanskrit. Nannayya (c. 11th century AD), the earliest known Telugu author, was patronized by the king Narendra who ruled from Rajamahendravaram (now Rajahmundry). The Vijayanagara emperor Krishnadevaraya wrote Amuktamalyada. The Telugu poet Vemana, a native of Kadapa, is notable for his philosophical poems. Telugu literature after Veeresalingam (18481919) is termed modern literature. Known as Gadya Tikkana, Satyavathi Charitam was the author Telugu-language social novel, Satyavathi Charitam.  Award winners include Sri Viswanatha Satya Narayana and Dr. C. Narayana Reddy. The Andhra Pradesh native and revolutionary poet Sri Sri brought new forms of expressionism into Telugu literature.Other modern writers include Seshendra Sarma, the only person nominated from India for a Nobel prize in literature since Tagore. The West Bengal Government conferred on him the title Rashtrendu (Moon of the Nation). Telugu University awarded him an honorary Doctorate in Literature in 1994. He received the Kalidas Samman award from the Madhya Pradhesh government, and he won the Central Sahitya Akademi fellowship in 1999. Narayanacharyulu is one of the scholarly poets of Telugu literature. He wrote the books Sivatandavam and Panduranga Mahatyam. Other notable writers from Andhra Pradesh include Sreenivasarao, Jashuva, Suri, Satyanarayana.CinemaIn the early 90s the Telugu film industry, had completely shifted its base to Hyderabad from Madras. Hyderabad, houses  IMAX theatre which was the biggest 3D IMAX screen in the world when it was built in 2007.() Tollywood is among the, highest number of film producing industries in India.()thumb|right|200px|Mecca Masjid in HyderabadIt is also home to Film City which is the worlds largest integrated film studio complex at over 2,000 acres (8.1 km2) of land.() Prolific film producer from the state, Ramanaidu holds a Record for the most number of films produced by a person.(http://www.asiantribune.com/news/2010/09/11/prestigious-phalke-award-conferred-veteran-film-producer-d-rama-naidu)  Andhra Pradesh has around 3,300 cinema halls. The state produces about 200 films a year. It has around 40% (330 out of 930) of the Digital theatres in India.MusicMany composers of music like Annamacharya, Tyagaraja, Kshetrayya, Sastri and Bhadrachala Ramadasu were of Telugu descent. Modern Carnatic music composers like Ghantasala, M.S Subbalakshmi and Sri Balamuralikrishna are also of Telugu descent. The Telugu film industry hosts many music composers and playback singers such as P. Balasubrahmanyam. Folk songs are popular in the many rural areas of the state. Forms such as the katha and Poli are still performed today.()ReligionThe state is home to Hindu saints of all castes. An important figure is Saint Yogi Potuluri Virabrahmendra Swami. He was born in the Vishwabrahmin (goldsmith) caste and had Brahmin and Dalit disciples.() Fisherman Raghu was a Shudra saint.() Saint Kakkayya was a chura (sweeper) Harijan saint.barsSeveral important Hindu modern-day saints are from Andhra Pradesh. These include Nimbarka, who founded Dvaitadvaita; Meera, who runs an ashram in Madanapalle; Sathya Sai Baba, Sri Sivabala Yogi Maharaj who advocates religious unity in worship; Swami Sundara Chaitanyanandaji of the Aurobindo Mission; and Subhash Patri,  founder of the pyramid spiritual societies movement.Islam in Hyderabad, with historical patronizing by the rulers, has a strong Sufi influence, with various moments active in the last two decades. Hyderabad has also produced many renowned religious scholars of representing different Islamic sects and trends, including Abul Ala Maududi, Turab-ul-Haq Qadri, and Allamah Rasheed Turabi.(Muslims)Most Christians are Protestant belonging to major Indian Protestant denominations such as the Church of South India, the Andhra Evangelical Lutheran Church, the Samavesam of Telugu Baptist Churches and several others.SportsThe Sports Authority of Andhra Pradesh, is the governing body which looks after the infrastructure development in Cricket, hockey, Football, weightlifting, Chess, Sports, Tennis, Badminton, Tennis, Cycling etc. Sports like kho, kabaddi, chinni daandu and goli (marbles) are played mostly in coastal Andhra & Telangana areas.One of the most popular sports in Andhra  pradesh is cricket. The Cricket Association nurtures potential international players. The Hyderabad cricket team has won the Trophy twice. The Gandhi International Cricket Stadium in Hyderabad, regularly hosts international matches. The Chargers, an Indian Premier League franchise, is based in Hyderabad. Notable cricketers from Andhra Pradesh, include K. Nayudu, of Vizianagram, V. Narasimha Rao, Azharuddin, S. K. Prasad, Laxman, Suman, Ayub, Rayudu, Valthaty, Raju, Naidu, Venugopal Rao etc.Other accomplished sports-persons include, Ramana Rao, Malleswari, Gopichand,  Mirza, Nehwal, Kamal, Chetan Anand (Badminton), Mukesh Kumar (Hockey), Najeeb Qureshi, Gutta, Raman Subbarao, Kamineni Eswara Rao, etc. Grandmasters in Chess like, Humpy, Harikrishna, Harika and Gogineni Rohit hail from the state.Education and ResearchFile:Ind school of business.jpg|thumb|250px|School of BusinessAndhra Pradesh is served by more than 20 institutes of higher education. All major arts, humanities, science, engineering, law, medicine, business, and veterinary science are offered, with first degrees and postgraduate awards available. Advanced research is conducted in all major areas.Andhra Pradesh has 1,330 arts, science and commerce colleges; 1,000 MBA and MCA colleges; 847 engineering colleges; 53 medical colleges, and one Institute of Technology (in Hyderabad). The student to teacher ratio in higher education is 19:1. According to the 2001 census, Andhra Pradesh has an overall literacy rate of 61.11% (as per Andhra pradesh Govts official website). The male literacy rate is 70.3% and the female literacy rate is 67.4%.Andhra Pradesh is the home to Osmania University, it is one of the oldest modern universities in India. It is one of the largest university systems in the subcontinent with over 300,000 students on its various campuses and affiliated colleges.(University) The Government of Andhra Pradesh has established Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies (RGUKT)(http://www.rgukt.inwww.rgukt.in) in 2008 to cater to the educational needs of the gifted rural youth of Andhra Pradesh. The Institute specializes in teaching and research in Information Technology and other emerging disciplines under the control of a common university Governing Council and following a common syllabus.The state has recently made strides in setting up several institutes. Andhra Pradesh is home to the Institute of Technology Hyderabad,() Institute of Fundamental Research Hyderabad,(http://www.univ.tifr.res.in) International Institute of Information Technology, Hyderabad (IIIT-H),() National Institute of Technology NIT Warangal,() the University of Law, for Cellular and Molecular Biology(CCMB)Hyderabad, Institute of Chemical Technology (IICT), Hyderabad, Institute of Technology and Science (Hyderabad Campus), of Hyderabad, of Planning and Architecture, Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies(Rajiv Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies IIIT, Nuzvid) and the School of Business (ISB). The National Institute of Fashion Technology (NIFT) and The Institute of Hotel Management, Catering Technology and Applied Nutrition are also located in Hyderabad. Also Institute of Technology,(http://www.gatech.edu/,) is in the process of setting up their campus in Hyderabad.Apart from this Andhra Pradesh was home to many more top class universitys like and Foreign Languages University, Nehru Technological University,() University,() University,() University,() University,() Venkateswara University,() Krishnadevaraya University,() Sreeramulu Telugu University,(http://www.teluguuniversity.ac.in/) N. G. Ranga Agricultural University,() and private engineering colleges like College of Engineering, Bharathi Institute of Technology, MVSR Engineering College to serve their people across Andhra Pradesh.The Government of Andhra Pradesh has established the first University of Health Sciences, fulfilling the recommendations of several committees. The Andhra Pradesh University of Health Sciences was established by Act.No. 6 of the Andhra Pradesh legislature and was inaugurated in 1986 by the late Sri N.T. Rama Rao, then Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh. After the death of its founder Sri N.T. Rama Rao the University was named after him as University of Health Sciences, Andhra Pradesh.TourismFile:Cave entrance.jpg|thumb|left|150px|CavesFile:Yaganti cave temple in kurnool District of Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|right|150px|Yaganti cave temple in District of Andhra PradeshFile:RishikondaBeachmain.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Rishikonda beachFile:vb125.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Caves (stalagmites and stalactites)Andhra Pradesh is promoted by its tourism department as the Koh-i-Noor of India.Andhra Pradesh is the home of many religious pilgrim centres. Venkateswara Temple in Tirupati, the abode of Hindu god Venkateswara, is most visited religious center of any faith in the world. Srisailam, nestled in the Hills is the abode of Mallikarjuna and is one of twelve Jyothirlingas in India. Amaravatis Shiva temple is one of the Pancharamams, as is Yadagirigutta, the abode of an avatara of Vishnu, Lakshmi Narasimha. The Ramappa temple and Thousand Pillars temple in Warangal are famous for their temple carvings. The state has numerous Buddhist centres at Amaravati, Konda, Bhattiprolu, Ghantasala, Nelakondapalli, Dhulikatta, Bavikonda, Thotlakonda, Shalihundam, Pavuralakonda, Bojjannakonda(Sankaram), Phanigiri and Kolanpaka.() The Empire built number of monuments, including the Srisailam temple and Lepakshi temples.File:Araku-valley.gif|thumb|150px|right|ValleyFile:North View of Bhimili beach.jpg|thumb|right|150px|North View of Bhimili beachThe golden beaches at Visakhapatnam, the one-million-year-old limestone caves at Borra, picturesque Valley, hill resorts of Horsley Hills, river Godavari racing through a narrow gorge at Papi Kondalu, waterfalls at Ettipotala, Kuntala and rich bio-diversity at Talakona are some of the natural attractions of the state. Kailashagiri is a park near the sea in Visakhapatnam. Visakhapatnam is home to other tourist attactions such as the Kursura S20 Submarine museum (the only one of its kind in India), the longest beach road in India, Yarada Beach, Araku Valley, and Indira Gandhi Zoological Gardens.The Caves are located in the Anatagiri Hills of the Eastern Ghats, near Vishakapatnam. They are at an altitude of about 800 to 1300 metres and are famous for million-year-old stalactite and stalagmite formations. They were discovered by British geologist William King George in 1807. The caves get their name from a formation inside the caves that looks like the human brain, which in the local language, Telugu, is known as burra. The Belum caves were formed due to erosion in limestone deposits in the area by the weakly acidic water of the Chitravati River millions of years ago.The Hills are located in Khammam district, near Bhadrachalam. Boat cruises are available on the river Godavari.The Caves in Kurnool District have a length of , making them the second largest natural caves on the Indian subcontinent. The Belum Caves derive their name from Bilum, the Sanskrit word for caves. In Telugu, the caves are known as Belum Guhalu. The caves have long passages, spacious chambers, freshwater galleries, and siphons. The caves deepest point is  from the entrance and is known asPatalganaga.Hills, elevation , is a summer hill resort in Andhra Pradesh, about  from Bangalore and from Tirupati. The town of Madanapalle lies nearby. Major tourist attractions include the Mallamma temple and the Valley School. Horsely Hills is the departure point for the Wildlife Sanctuary at a distance of .Nirmal is famous for its handicrafts and paintings. Kuntala waterfall, at , is the biggest in the state. Charminar, Golconda Fort, Chandragiri Fort, Palace, and Palace are some of the monuments in the state.Durga Temple in Vijayawada in district, Venkateswara Temple in Tirumala, Godavari District, and Surya temple in Arasavelli in District are also places to see in Andhra Pradesh.The Annavaram Satayannarayana Swami temple is in Godavari, near Kakinada.Konaseema is another place in Godavari for nature lovers with scenic greenery of lush paddy fields and coconut groves. All along the banks of river Godavari and its canals.RoadImage:Godavari Bridge.JPG|thumb|150px|left|The railroad bridge between Rajahmundry and KovvurA total of  of roads are maintained by the State, of which State Highways comprise , National Highways , and District Roads . The growth rate for vehicle ownership in Andhra Pradesh is the highest in the country at 16%.()Pradesh State Road Transport Corporation (APSRTC) is the major public transport corporation owned by the government of Andhra Pradesh that connects all the cities and villages. APSRTC is in the Guinness Book of World Records for having the largest fleet of vehicles (approximately 21,000), and the longest distance covered daily. Vijayawada is the 2nd largest Bus-Standing in Asia.() Thousands of private operators also run buses connecting major cities and towns. Private vehicles like cars, motorised scooters, and bicycles occupy a major share of the local transport in the cities and adjoining villages.RailFile:Secbad rly stn.jpg|thumb|120px||The Railway Station, headquarters of the Central RailwayFile:Vizag seaport.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Visakhapatnam seaportRailways are a major means of transport connecting all major cities and towns. The history of railways in Andhra Pradesh dates back to the time of of Hyderabad. This Railway Station is located in the heart of Telangana Region. Most of Andhra Pradesh falls under the auspices of the Central Railway, founded in 1966 with its headquarters at Secunderabad. The Coast Railway serves Srikakulam, Vizianagaram District, and part of Visakhapatnam district including Visakhapatnam City. Vijayawada Railway Station is one of the  busiest railway junctions in India.5th largest Railway station  in South.AirInternational Airport, also known as Rajiv Gandhi International Airport, is the international airport for the city of Hyderabad. It is the largest airport in the state and one of the busiest airports nationwide. Other airports in the state are Airport, Airport, Airport, and Airport. The government also has plans to start airports in eight other cities: Guntur, Ongole, Nellore, Warangal, Kadapa, Tadepalligudem, Kurnool, Karimnagar, Ramagundam and Kothagudem.SeaAndhra Pradesh has two of the major ports of India at Visakhapatnam and Kakinada and three minor ports at Krishnapatnam (Nellore), Machilipatnam, and Nizampatnam (Guntur). A private port is being developed at Gangavaram, near Visakhapatnam. This deep seaport can accommodate ocean liners up to 200,000250,000 DWT.Newspapers and journals* Chronicle* Bhoomi* Sakshi* Suryaa* Vaartha* Jyothy* Prabha* Eenadu* Prajasakti* Islamic Voice - TeluguUrdu language newspapers* Awam* Munsif Daily* Siasat DailyNewspapers from Other States* The Business Line* Economic Times* Hindu* New Indian Express* Times of IndiaSee also* State* Dravidian* of India* of people from Andhra Pradesh* kingdoms of India* Rayalaseema* Telangana* Uttarandhra* games of Andhra PradeshReferencesExternal links* Map of Andhra Pradesh* Official website of the Government of Andhra Pradesh* Andhra Pradesh Government Tourism Department* * Andhra Pradesh Portal at NIC website* AP Directorate of Economics & Statistics* Official website of State Police of Andhra Pradesh* Citizen Reports and Latest News from Andhra Pradesh*http://www.islamicvoice.co.inPradeshPradeshPradebn:Pradeshbe:-be-x-old:-bo:PradeshPradeshcs:ndhrapradPradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshPradesheo:Andra-PradeoPradeshPradeshPradeshPradexPradePradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshka:-PradeshPradeshPradaPradeasPradesml:PradeshPradeshnew:ja:PradeshPradeshpnb:PradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshru:-sa:Pradeshsk:ndhrapradPradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshth:Pradeuk:-PradeshPradeshPradeshzh:
2382
Aalen
Counts of Oettingen who pawned them in to the of Wrttemberg in 1358 or 1359.Aalen () is a city in the German state of Baden-Wrttemberg, about  east of Stuttgart and  (Aalen, Britannica; retrieved May 5, 2011, from Encyclopdia Britannica Online) north of Ulm. It is the seat of the Ostalbkreis district, and its largest city, as well as the largest city within the Ostwrttemberg region. In planning, Aalen is designated a Mittelzentrum (medium-level centre). Since 1 April 1956, Aalen has the status of Kreisstadt (major district town).With an area of 146.63 km2, Aalen is ranking position 7 in Baden-Wrttemberg and position 2 within the Government Region of Stuttgart, after Stuttgart. With a population of about 66,000, Aalen is on position 15 within Baden-Wrttemberg. Geography  Situation Aalen is situated on the upper reaches of the river Kocher, at the foot of the Jura to the south and south-east and close to the hilly landscape of the Berge to the north.In terms of regions, the west of Aalens territory is on the foreland of the eastern Swabian Jura, and the north and north-west is on the Swabian-Franconian Uplands, both being part of the Keuper-Lias Plains. The south-west is part of the Albuch, the east is part of the Hrtsfeld, these two both being parts of the Swabian Jura.(Naturrume Baden-Wrttembergs. Landesanstalt fr Umwelt, Messungen und Naturschutz Baden-Wrttemberg, Stuttgart 2009.)The Kocher enters the citys territory from Oberkochen on the south, crosses the city district of Unterkochen, then the city centre, where the Aal flows into it. The Aal is a small river stretching only on the towns territory. Next, the Kocher crosses the city district of Wasseralfingen, then leaves the city for Httlingen.(Geographical information system of the town of Aalen) Rivers originating near Aalen are the Rems (near Essingen, west of Aalen) and the Jagst (near Unterschneidheim, east of Aalen), both being subsidiaries of the Neckar, just like the Kocher.The elevation in the centre at market square is 430 meters relative to Normalhhennull. The territorys lowest point is at the Lein river near Rodamsdrfle, the highest point is the Grnbergs peak near Unterkochen at 733 m.( Geology Aalens territory ranges over all lithostratigraphic groups of the south-German Jurassic: Aalens south and the Flexner massif are on top of the Weier Jura (White Jurassic), the city center is on the Brauner Jura (Brown Jurassic), and a part of Wasseralfingen is on the Schwarzer Jura (Black Jurassic). Therefore, the city advertises itself as a Geologists Mecca.(Cf. Ulrich Sauerborn: Das Aalenium on urweltmuseum-aalen.de, retrieved 24 April 2010.)(Erlebnis Erdgeschichte in Baden-Wrttemberg, Mekka der Geologen on erdgeschichte.de, retrieved 24 April 2010.)Most part of the territory is on the Opalinuston-Formation (Opalinum Clay Formation) of the Aalenian subdivision, which is named after Aalen. On the Sandberg, the Schnaitberg and the Schradenberg hills, all in the west of Aalen, the Eisensandstein (Iron Sandstone) Formation emerges to surface. On the other hills of the city, sands (Goldshfer Sande), gravel and residual rubble prevail.The historic centre of Aalen and the other areas in the Kocher valley are founded completely on holocenic floodplain loam (Auelehm) and riverbed gravel that have filled in the valley.Most parts of Dewangen and Fachsenfeld are founded on formations of Jurensismergel (Jurensis Marl), Posidonienschiefer (cf. Shale), Amaltheenton (Amalthean Clay), Numismalismergel (Numismalis Marl) and Obtususton (Obtusus Clay, named after Asteroceras obtusum) succeeding from south to north, all belonging to the Jurassic. They are at last succeeded by the Trossingen Formation already belonging to the Triassic.On the Braunenberg hill, until 1939 ore was mined (see Tiefer Stollen section). Extent of the citys territory The maximum extent of the citys territory amounts to  in north-south dimension and  in east-west dimension. The area is 14,662.8 hectares, which includes 42.2 % (6,186.2 hectares) agriculturally used area and 37.7 % (5,534.9 hectares) of forest. 11.5 % (1,692.3 hectares) are built up or vacant, 6.4 % (932.8 hectares) is used by traffic infrastructure. Sporting and recreation grounds and parks comprise 1 % (152.7 hectares), other areas 1.1 % (163.9 hectares).(Statistisches Jahrbuch der Stadt Aalen 2007/2008.) Adjacent towns The following municipalities border on Aalen. They are listed clockwise, beginning south, with their respective linear distances to Aalen city centre given in brackets:Oberkochen (), Essingen (), Heuchlingen (), Abtsgmnd (), Neuler (), Httlingen (), Rainau (), Westhausen (), Lauchheim (), Bopfingen () and Neresheim (), all in the Ostalbkreis district, furthermore an der Brenz () and Knigsbronn (), both in Heidenheim district. Boroughs Aalens territory consists of the city centre (Kernstadt) and the municipalitiesmerged to between 1938 (Unterrombach) and 1975 (Wasseralfingen, see mergings section).The municipalities merged in the course of the latest municipal reform of the 1970s are also called Stadtbezirke (city districts), and are Ortschaften (settlements) in terms of Baden-Wrttembergs Gemeindeordnung (municipal code), which means, each of them has its own council elected by its respective residents (Ortschaftsrat) and is presided by a spokesperson (Ortsvorsteher).The city centre itself and the merged former municipalities consist of numerous villages (Teilorte), mostly separated by open ground from each other and having their own independent and long-standing history. Some however have been created as planned communities, which were given proper names, but no well-defined borders.List of villages:(Teilorte von Aalen, on aalen.de, retrieved 9 July 2010.) Spatial planning Aalen forms a Mittelzentrum (medium-level centre) within the Ostwrttemberg region. Its designated catchment area includes the following municipalities of the central and eastern Ostalbkreis district: Abtsgmnd, Bopfingen, Essingen, Httlingen, am Ries, Lauchheim, Neresheim, Oberkochen, Riesbrg and Westhausen, and is interwoven with the catchment area of Nrdlingen, situated in Bavaria,  east of Aalen. Climate As Aalens territory sprawls on escarpments of the Swabian Jura, on the Albuch and the Hrtsfeld landscapes, and transcends a difference in elevation of 355 metres, the climate varies from district to district.The station the following data originate from is located between the city centre and Wasseralfingen at about  and is operative since 1991.The sunshine duration is about 1800 hours per year, which averages to 4.93 hours per day. So Aalen is above the German average of 1550 hours per year. However, with 167 days of precipitation, Aalens region also ranks above the German average of 138. The annual rainfall is 807 millimetres, which puts Aalen into the moderate middle within Baden-Wrttemberg.(cf. Precipitation map of Baden-Wrttemberg, by Landesamt fr Umwelt, Messungen und Naturschutz.)Mean fluctuations in temperature of up to -11.6 C in January and 32.7 C in July result in an annual mean temperature of 9.9 C. Here Aalen as well ranks above the German average of 8.2 C and the Baden-Wrttemberg average of 8.1 C. History  Civic history  First settlements Tools made of flint and traces of human settlement of the Mesolithic dated between the 8th and 5th millennium BC were found on several sites on the margins of the Kocher and Jagst valleys. On the Schlobaufeld plateau (appr. 650 by 350 metres), situated behind Kocherburg castle near Unterkochen, a hill-top settlement was found, with the core being attributed to the Age. In the Appenwang forest near Wasseralfingen, in Goldshfe and in Ebnat, tumuli of the culture were found. In Aalen and Wasseralfingen, Golden and silver coins left by the Celts were found, who also fortified the Schlobaufeld settlement with sectional embankments and a stone wall. Near Heisenberg (Wasseralfingen), a celtic nemeton is situated.( Roman era Around 150 AD, Aalens territory became part of the Empire, in direct vicinity of the Limes. The Romans erected a castrum to house the cavalry unit Ala II Flavia milliaria; its remains are known today as Kastell Aalen (Aalen roman fort). The site is west of todays city centre at the bottom of the Schillerhhe hill. With about 1,000 horsemen and nearly as many grooms, it was the greatest fort of auxiliaries along the Rhaetian Limes. Civilian settlements were adjacent on the south and the east. Around 260, the Romans gave up the fort as they withdrew their frontier to unoccupied Germania back to the Rhine and Danube rivers, and the Alamanni took over the region.()(Das Aalener Stadtgebiet in der Antike, Stadt Aalen.) Inferred from coins found related to the late 3rd and the 4th century, the civilian settlement continued to exist for the time being. However, a continuous inhabitation between the Roman era and the ages is not detectable.( Foundation of the city Archeologists regard findings of alamannic graves originating from the 7th century as the root of the village of Aalen. In the northern and western walls of St. Johns church, which is located directly adjacent to the eastern gate of the Roman fort, Roman stones were incorporated. The building existing today probably dates to the 9th century.In the Ages, the first time a place today being part of Aalen was mentioned was 839, when emperor the Pious permitted the monastery to exchange estate in the Hammerstadt village, then known as Hamarstat.()Aalen itself was first mentioned in an inventory list of Abbey, dated ca. 1136, as the village Alon, along with a lower nobleman named Conrad of Aalen. This gender probably had its ancestral castle at a site south of todays city centre and were probably first subject to Ellwangen abbey, later to the of Hohenstaufen, and at last to the of Oettingen. 1426 was the last time a member of that house was attested in connection with Aalen.Middle-aged documents indicate that the city of Aalen was founded by the Hohenstaufen between 1241 and 1246, but at a different site than the like-named village, which is supposed destroyed in 1388 in the course of the war between the Alliance of Swabian Cities and the Dukes of Bavaria.Later, the counts of Oettingen were rulers of the city, which is attested for the first time for 1340.They pawned the city to Count Eberhard II and thus to the of Wrttemberg in 1358 or 1359 in exchange for an amount of money.( Imperial city  Designation as Imperial City In the war of the Holy Roman Empire against Wrttemberg, Emperor Charles IV took the city after a siege without a fight. On 3 December 1360, he declared Aalen an Imperial City, a city responsible only to the emperor (often misreferred to as Free City), a title it kept until 1803. In 1377, Aalen joined the Alliance of Swabian Cities. 1385, for the first time the term civitas appeared in the citys seal. 1398, it was granted the right to hold markets, in 1401 a proper jurisdiction. However, Aalen could not acquire a large territory, it consisted only of the city itself and a few villages.The oldest preserved city view was made in 1528. It was made as the basis of a lawsuit of the city versus the Counts of Oettingen at the Reichskammergericht in Speyer. It shows Aalen surrounded by walls, towers and double moats. The situation of the moats, which had an embankment belt between them, is recognizable by todays street names of Nrdlicher, stlicher, Sdlicher and Westlicher Stadtgraben (Northern, Eastern, Southern and Western Moat respectively). The wall was about 6 metres tall, 1518 single paces (990 metres) long and enclosed an area of 5.3 hectares. On its foundation, the city had two gates: The Upper or Ellwangen Gate in the east, and St. Martins gate in the south. Due to frequent floods, St. Martins gate was bricked up in the 14th century and replaced by the Lower or Gmnd Gate built in the west before 1400. Later, several minor side gates were build. The central street market took place on the Wettegasse (today called Marktplatz, market square) and the Reichsstdter Strae. So the market course was, as usual by then, from one gate to the other, however in Aalen it was bent L-like between southern (St. Martins) gate and eastern (Ellwangen) gate.Around 1500, the civic graveyard was relocated from the city church to St. Johns Church.( In 1514, the Vierundzwanziger (Group of 24) was the first assembly constituted by the citizens. Reformation Delegated by Wrttembergs Duke Louis III, on 28 June 1575, nealy 30 years after Luthers death, Andreae, professor and chancellor of the of Tbingen, arrived in Aalen. The sermon he held the following day convinced the mayor, the council and the citizens to adopt the reformation in the city. Andreae stayed in Aalen for four weeks to help with adaptation.( This brought along enormous changes, so the council forbade the Roman Catholic priest to celebrate masses and sermons. However, after victories of the imperial armies at the beginning of the Years War, the Prince-Provostry of Ellwangen, which still held the right of patronage in Aalen, were able to temporarily restitute Catholicism in Aalen.After military successes of the Union, protestant church practices were instituted again. City fire of 1634 In the night of 5 September 1634,(Im Rckspiegel, Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen, retrieved 15 April 2010.) two ensigns of the army of of Saxe-Weimar fighting in the alliance of the Swedes and retreating after the Battle of Nrdlingen set afire two powder carriages, lest ceding the war material to Croatian soldiers already entering the city and to prevent their advance. The result was a city fire. About its extent, differing evaluations exist. According to 17th century accounts, the church and all the citys buildings, except of the Schwrturm tower, were casualties of the fire, and only nine families survived. 19th century research by Hermann Bauer, Lutheran pastor and local historian, evaluated this as not coherent and exaggerated, but it is beyond question that the city church and buildings in a rather large circumcircle around it were destroyed. The fire also destroyed the city archive accommodated in an addition to the church, with all of its documents.( After the fire, soldiers of both armies went through the city looting.(Aalen im dreiigjhrigen Krieg, retrieved 19 April 2010.) It took nearly 100 years for the city to re-approach its population of 2,000.French troops traversed Aalen in 1688 in the course of the Years War, however, unlike at other places, without leaving severe damages. The French pulled through again in 1702 during the of the Spanish Succession and in 1741 during the of the Austrian Succession,( the latter also caused imperial troops to traverse in 1743.(Beschreibung des Oberamts Aalen, Chapter A 7 on Wikisource.)The City Churchs tower collapsed in 1765, presumably because statics was not taken into account well enough at the reconstruction after the city fire of 1634. The collapsing tower struck two children of the tower watchman who died of their injuries, and destroyed the nave, leaving only the altar cross intact. The remaining walls had to be knocked down due to the great damage. Reconstruction began the same year, creating the building still existing today.(On 22 November 1749, in Aalen, being an imperial and thus neutral city, the Aalen protocol was signed by the Duchy of Wrttemberg and the Prince-Provostry of Ellwangen, regulating cohabitation of Lutherans and Roman Catholics in the jointly ruled place of Oberkochen. Napoleonic era In the of the First Coalition, Aalen was severely looted in 1796.( The War of the Second Coalition concluded in 1801 to the of Lunville, which led to the Mediatisation of 1803 that assigned most Imperial Cities to the neighbouring principalities. Aalen was assigned to the electorate of Wrttemberg (later to become the Kingdom of Wrttemberg) and became seat of the District (Oberamt) of Aalen. During the of the Third Coalition, on 6 October 1805, Bonaparte arrived in Aalen, carrying along an army of 40,000. This event, along with Bavarian and Austrian troops moving in some days later, caused miseries that according to the city clerk no feather could describe.(In 1811, the municipality of Unterrombach was formed out of some villages previously belonging to Aalen, some to the Barons of Wllwarth, and the eastern villages were assigned to the municipality of Unterkochen.In the age of the Napoleonic wars, the walls were no longer of use. In the 18th century, the maintenance of walls, gates and towers was neglected more and more, so ever more components of the wall went into a state of disrepair. For thorough repairs, funds were lacking, not at least in the face of the enormous war expenditures. Starting in 1800, most towers were demolished, the other buildings followed soon, so the fortifications today are nearly completely vanished.( Industrial revolution Before the revolution, Aalens economy was shaped by its rural setting. Many citizens were pursuing farming besides their craft. An often pursued craft was tanning; in the mid of the 19th century, there were twelve tanneries in Aalen, an important sales market for them being Ulm. Other focusses of craft were weaving mills, which produced linen and woolen goods, and baking of sweet pastry and gingerbread.(()In Aalen, industrialisation became noticeable only slowly. A first peak were the 1840s, when three factories for nails and some other factories emerged.( It was the link with the railway network, by the opening of the Railway from Cannstatt to Wasseralfingen in 1861, that brought along an industrial rise in Aalen, along with the royal mill (later Schwbische Httenwerke) in Wasseralfingen. The Rems Railways extension to Nrdlingen in 1863, the opening of the Railway in 1864 and of the Jagst Railway in 1866 turned Aalens station into a hub. Furthermore, between 1901 and its shutdown in 1972, the Railway connected Aalen with an der Donau via Neresheim. A maintenance facility, a roundhouse, an administrative office, two track maintenance shops and a freight station with an industrial line shaped the city scape, so that Aalen in that historical context is labelled by todays historians as a railwaymans city.(Eugen Hafner: Aalen. Der Stadtfhrer. P. 5 ff.) In 1866, the Aalen gasworks was opened and lighting was introduced. In 1870, a modern supply system was started and in 1912 the electricity. In 1935 at last, the first electrically powered lights were installed.(To fight housing shortage during and after War I, the city set up the barracks settlement areas at the Schlauch and Alter Turnplatz grounds. In spite of the industry being crippled by the Depression of 1929, the public baths at the Hirschbach creek where modernized, extended and re-opened in 1931.( Nazi era In the federal election of 1932, the Party performed below average in Aalen with 25.8 % of votes compared to 33.1 % on the national level, thus being second to the Centre Party which resulted in 26.6 % (11.9 % nation-wide) and ahead of the Democratic Party of Germany with 19.8 % (20.4 %). However, until the March 1933 federal elections, this setting had changed: The Nazi Party resulted still below German average with 34.1 % (43.9 % nation-wide), but became the by far strongest party in Aalen, followed by the Centre party unaltered at 26.6 % (11.3 %) and the Social Democrats (18.6 %/18.3 %).(During Nazi rule in Germany, in 1936 a military district riding and driving school was deployed in Aalen, as well as an army replenishment office (Heeresverpflegungsamt), a branch arsenal office (Heeresnebenzeugamt) and a branch army ammunitions institute (Heeresnebenmunitionsanstalt).In 1935, mergers of neighbouring towns began. In 1938, the Oberamt was transformed into the Landkreis of Aalen and the municipality of Unterrombach was disbanded. Its territory was mostly added to Aalen, with the exception of Hammerstadt, which was added to the municipality of Dewangen. Forst, Rauental and Vogelsang were added to Essingen (in 1952 the entire former municipality of Unterrombach was merged into Aalen, with the exception of Forst, which is part of Essingen until present).In September 1944, the Wiesendorf concentration camp, a subcamp of Natzweiler-Struthof, was put up. It was designated for between 200 and 300 prisoners who were held to forced labor in industrial businesses nearby. Until the camps dissolution in February 1945, 60 prisoners died.( Between 1946 and 1957, the camp buildings were torn down, its foundations are still in place in house Moltkestrae 44/46. Besides, several labour camps existed where prisoners of war and women and men from countries occupied by Germany were pooled, who had to work for the arms industry in major businesses like Schwbische Httenwerke and the Alfing Keler machine factory.(Aalen was mostly spared of combat activity in War II. It was only in the last weeks of the war that Aalen became target of air warfare, which led to destruction and severe damage of parts of the city, the train station and other railway installations. A series of air attacks lasting for more than three weeks had its peak on 17 April 1945, when States Army Air Forces planes bombed the branch arsenal office and the train station. 59 people were killed, more than half of them buried by debris, and more than 500 lost their homes.( 33 residential buildings, 12 other buildings and 2 bridges were destroyed; 163 buildings, including 2 churches, were damaged.( Five days later, the Nazi rulers of Aalen were unseated by the US forces. Post-war era Upon foundation of the State of Baden-Wrttemberg in 1952, Aalen became part of that state. With the Baden-Wrttemberg territorial reform of 1973, the District of Aalen was merged into the Ostalbkreis district. Aalen became seat of that district. In 1975, the city territory attained its present dimension (see below).The population of Aalen exceeded the limit of 20,000, the requirement for the status of Kreisstadt (major district town) in 1946. On 1 August 1947, Aalen was declared Unmittelbare Kreisstadt (immediate district town), and with the coming into effect of the Gemeindeordnung (municipal code) of Baden-Wrttemberg on 1 April 1956, it was declared Groe Kreisstadt. Religions On 31 December 2008, 51.1 percent of the entire citys inhabitants were members of the Church, 23.9 percent were members of the Evangelical-Lutheran Church. About 25 percent belong to other or no religious community or gave no information.(Religion aalen.de, retrieved 29 June 2010.) The city district of Waldhausen was the district with the highest percentage of Roman Catholic inhabitants 75.6 percent, the central district was the one with the highest percentage of Evangelical-Lutheran inhabitants (25.6 percent) as well as those adhering to other or no religious communities (32.5 percent).( Protestantism Aalens population originally was subject to the patronatus of Ellwangen Abbey, and thus subject to the Catholic Diocese of Augsburg.By the help of the Duke of Wrttemberg, in 1575 the reformation was implemented in Aalen. Subsequently, Aalen had been a predominantly Protestant city for centuries, with the exception of the years from 1628 until 1632 (see reformation section). Being an Imperial City, Aalen could govern its clerical matters on its own. Clerics, organists and choir masters were direct subjects to the city council, which thus exerted bishop-like power; even a proper hymn book for Aalen did exist.( After the transition to Wrttemberg in 1803, Aalen became seat of a deanery, with the dean church being the City Church (with the building of constructed from 1765 to 1767, existing until present). Another utilized church is St. Johns Church, located on the cemetery, refurbished in 1561.As Aalens population grew in the 20th century, more parishes were founded: St. Marks parish with its church building of 1967 and St. Martins parish with its church of 1974. In the borough of Unterrombach, Aalen had implemented the reformation as well, but the community remained a chapel-of-ease of Aalen. A proper church, the Christ Church, was erected in 1912 and a proper parish was established in 1947. In Fachsenfeld, the ruling family of Woellwarth resp. of Leinroden implemented the reformation. A parish church was built in 1591, however an influx of Catholics in the 18th century established a Catholic majority. The other districts of present Aalen remained mostly catholic after the reformation, however Wasseralfingen established a Lutheran parish in 1891 and a church in 1893, St. Magdalenes Church. In Unterkochen, after World War II a parish was established as well and a church was built in 1960. All four parishes belong to the deanery of Aalen within the Church in Wrttemberg. Furthermore, in Aalen there are Old Pietistic communities. Catholicism The few Catholics of todays central district were covered by the parish of Unterkochen until the 19th century, a situation which continued for some years even after completion of St. Marys Church in 1868 constructed by Morlok.( However, in 1872 Aalen got its proper parish again, and in 1913, a second Catholic church was completed, Salvators Church, and in 1969 the Holy Cross Church. In 1963, a second parish had already been set up, which in 1972 got a new Church, the new St. Marys Church, which has been erected in place of the old St. Marys church, which had been torn down in 1968. Another church of the second parish was St. Augustines Church, completed in 1970. In 1976 and 1988 at last, St. Elizabeths Church resp. St. Thomas Church were completed. Furthermore, in 1963 the St. Michael pastoral care office is existing since 1963.Hofherrnweiler is also having its own Catholic church, St. Bonifaces, since 1904. The villages of Dewangen, Ebnat, Hofen, Waldhausen and Wasseralfingen had remained Catholic after reformation, so old parishes and churches persist there. The Assumption of Mary Church in Dewangen has an early Gothic tower and a new-build nave of 1875. Todays building of the Marys Immaculate Conception Church in Ebnat was constructed in 1723, but the church was first mentioned in 1298.Hofens Georges Church is a church, whose present nave was built from 1762 to 1775.(Die Geschichte der St. Georgskirche mit Bildern..., Kirchengemeinde Hofen, retrieved 11 April 2011)Beside the church, the Late Gothic St. Odiles Chapel is standing, whose entrance has the year 1462 engraved. Foundations of predecessor buildings were dated to the 11th and 13th century.(Ottilienkapelle, Kirchengemeinde Hofen, retrieved 11 April 2011)St. Marys Church of Unterkochen was first mentioned in 1248, and for long time served the Catholics of Aalen. Waldhausens parish church of St. Nicholas was built from 1699 until 1716. Wasseralfingen at first was a chapel-of-ease of Hofen, but had a chapel, St. Stephen, which was built presumably in 1353 and extended in 1832. In 1834, a proper parish was established, which built a new St. Stephens Church in Revival architecture between 1881 and 1883, which has remained the parishs landmark until present. Fachsenfeld got its own church as well, Heart of 1895. All Catholic parishes within Aalen are today incorporated into four pastoral care units within the Ostalb Deanery of the Diocese of Rottenburg-Stuttgart, but these some of these units also comprise some parishes outside of Aalen. Pastoral Care Unit two comprises the parishes of Essingen, Dewangen and Fachsenfeld, unit four comprises Hofen and Wasseralfingen, unit five comprises both parishes of Aalens centre and Hofherrnweiler, unit five comprises Waldhausen, Ebnat, Oberkochen and Unterkochen. Other christian communities Besides the two major christian denominations, in Aalen there are also churches and other communities, including the Methodist Church, the Baptists, the Adventist Church and the Apostolic Church. Other religions Until the late 19th century, no Jews are testified in Aalen. It was not before 1886 that four Jews were living in Aalen, a number that rose to ten in 1900, fell to seven in 1905, and remained so until 1925. Upon the Nazis rise to power in 1933, seven Jews, including two children, lived in Aalen.( During the Kristallnacht in 1938, the vitrines of the three Jewish shops in the city were smashed and their proprietors imprisoned for several weeks. After their release, most Aalen Jews emigrated. The last Jew of Aalen, Fanny Kahn, was forcibly resettled to am Ipf, which had a large Jewish community. Today, a street of Aalen is named after her. The Jew Max Pfeffer returned from Brussels to Aalen in 1948 to continue his shop, but emigrated to Italy in 1967.(In Aalen, there is an Islamic Ditib community, which maintains the D.I.T.I.B. Mosque of Aalen (Central Mosque) located at Ulmer Strae.( The mosques construction started on 30 August 2008. The Gr organisation maintains the Fatih Mosque, as well at Ulmer Strae.( Mergings Todays city of Aalen was formed on 21 June 1975 by unification of the cities of Aalen and Wasseralfingen, with the initial name of Aalen-Wasseralfingen, with a territory one third larger than Aalens prior territory.( Already on 1 July 1975, it was renamed to Aalen. Before, the former city of Aalen had already merged the following municipalities:* 1938: Unterrombach* 1 January 1970: Waldhausen* 1 July 1972: Ebnat* 1 January 1973: Dewangen, Fachsenfeld (including the village of Hangendenbach, which was transferred from Abtsgmnd in 1954) and Unterkochen. The merging of Dewangen nearly doubled the territory of Aalen. Populations progression and structure During the Ages and the modern period, Aalen was just a small city with a few hundred inhabitants. The population grew slowly and doubled back over and again due to numerous wars, famines and epidemics. It was the beginning of the industrialisationin the 19th century that accelerated growth. While in 1803, only 1,932 inhabited the city, in 1905 it were already 10,442. The number continued to rise and amounted to 15.890 in 1939.The influx of refugees and ethnic Germans from Germanys former eastern territories after War II pushed up the citys population to 31,814 in 1961. The merger with Wasseralfingen on 21 June 1975 added 14.597 persons and resulted in 65.165 inhabitants. On 30 June 2005, the population figure determined officially by the Statistical Office of Baden-Wrttembergby updating and by matching with other statistical offices amounted to an unprecedented 67,125 (accounting only main domiciles).The following overview shows the population figures of the city territory of the respective year. Until 1823, the figures are mostly estimates, thereafter census results or official updates by the state statistical office. Until 1871, the figures were determined by non-uniform elicitation methods, since 1871 they refer to the population present at the place, since 1925 to the resident population and since 1987 to the population at the place of main domicile.{|| valigntop || valigntop || valigntop ||} Census resultOn 31 December 2008, Aalen had precisely 66,058 inhabitants, of them 33,579 female and 32,479 male. The average age of Aalens inhabitants rose from 40.5 years on 31 December 2000 by 1.9 years to 42.4 on 31 December 2008.( Within city limits, 6,312 persons of a nationality other than German were living, which is a share of 9.56 percent. Of them, the largest fraction comprises Turkish citizens (38 percent of all foreigners), the second largest fraction comprises Italians (13 percent), followed by Croatians (6 percent) and Serbs (5 percent). The remaining 35 percent have another nationality.(The number of married inhabitants fell from 32,948 on 31 December 1996 to 31.357 on 31 December 2007, while the number of divorced rose in the same period from 2,625 to 3.859. The number of unwed inhabitants slightly increased between 1996 and 2004 from 25,902 to 26,268 an, and until 2007 fell again to 26,147. The number of widowed fell from  5.036 on 31 December 1996 to 4,783 on 31 December 2007.(File:Durchschnittsalter Aalen.png|Average age of Aalens inhabitantsFile:Familienstand Aalen.png|Ratio of married inhabitants contrasted to unmarried Politics Aalen has arranged a association with Essingenand Httlingen. City council Since the election of 7 June 2009, the city council consists of 54 representatives having a five years term of office. The seats are distributed as follows on parties and groups (changes refer to the second last election of 2004): Mayors Since 1374, the mayor and the council form the head of the city. In the 16th century, the city had two, later three mayors. In 1552, the council had 13 members. Later, the head of administration was reorganised several times. In the Wrttemberg era, initially the mayors title was called Brgermeister, from 1819 it was Schulthei, and since 1947 it is Oberbrgermeister. The mayor is elected for a term of eight years. He is chairman and member of the city council and has the right to vote there. He has one deputy with the official title of Erster Brgermeister (first mayor) and one with the official title of Brgermeister (mayor).Heads of city in Aalen since 1802* 1802: Theodor Betzler* 18121819: Ludwig Hlder* 18191829: Theodor Betzler* 1829: Palm* 18291848: Philipp Ehmann* 18481873: Gustav Oesterlein* 18731900: Julius Bausch* 19001902: Paul Maier* 19031934: Friedrich Schwarz* 19351945: Schbel* 19451950: Balluff* 19501975: Karl Schbel* 19762005: Pfeifle (SPD)* 2005: Gerlach (independent) Coat of arms and flag Aalens of arms depicts a black eagle with a red tongue on golden background, having a red shield on his breast with a silver bent eel on it. Eagle and eel were first testified as Aalens heraldic aminals in the city seal of 1385, with the eagle representing the citys immediacy.( After the territorial reform, it was newly bestowed by the Administrative District of Stuttgart on 16 November 1976.The coat of arms blazon reads: In gold, the black imperial eagle, with a red breast shield applied to it, therein a bent silver eel (In Gold der schwarze Reichsadler, belegt mit einem roten Brustschild, darin ein gekrmmter silberner Aal).Aalens flag is striped in red and white and contains the coat of arms.The origin of the citys name is uncertain. Merian (15931650) assumed the name to stem from the citys situation at the Kocher river, where frequently eels are caught, while Aal is German for eel. Other explanations point to Aalen as the garrison of an ala during the Roman empire, respectively to an abridgement of the Roman name  Aquileia as a potential name of the Roman fort, a name that nearby an der Brenz bore as well. Another interpretation points to a Celtic word including the meaning water.( Twinned cities The Twin Cities Society of Aalen (Stdtepartnerschaftsverein Aalen e. V.) promotes friendly relations between Aalen and its twin cities,(Stdtepartnerschaftsverein Aalen e. V. on aalen.de, retrieved 9 July 2010) which comprises mutual exchanges of sports and cultural clubs, schools and other civic institutions. On the occasion of the Reichsstdter Tage, from 11 until 13 September 2009 the first conference of twinned cities was held.Aalen has five twin cities:* Saint-L (France), since 1978* Christchurch (United Kingdom), since 1981* Tatabnya (Hungary), since 1987* Antakya (Turkey), since 1995. This twinning arrangement was initiated by Ismail Demirtas, who emigrated in 1962 from Turkey to Aalen and was social adviser for foreign employees.(Wir sind einfach in den Zug gestiegen, Federal Government, retrieved 6 May 2011)* Cervia (Italy), since 2011 Godparenthood On the occasion of the 1980 Reichsstdter Tage, Aalen took over godparenthood for the more than 3000 ethnic Germans displaced from the Wischau lingustic enclave, 972 of them settled to Aalen in 1946. The Wischau Linguistic Enclave Society (Gemeinschaft Wischauer Sprachinsel) regularly organises commemorative meetings in Aalen. Their traditional costumes are stored in the Old Town Hall. Municipal finances According to the 2007 municipal poll by the Baden-Wrttemberg chapter of the Taxpayers Federation, municipal tax revenues totalling to 54.755 million Euros (2006) resp. 62.148 million Euros (2007) face the following debts:(Der Steuerzahler, September 2007.)* 2006 total: 109.9 million Euros debts (64.639 millions of the finance department and 48.508 millions of the city-operated enterprises and fund assets)* 2007 total: 114.5 million Euros debts (69.448 millions of the finance department and 45.052 millions of the city-operated enterprises and fund assets) Culture and sights  Theatre The city operates the Theatre of the City of Aalen (Theater der Stadt Aalen). Having been founded in 1991 and featuring six salaried actors, it is the newest as well as the smallest civic theatre in Germany.(Theater der Stadt Aalen on aalen.de, retrieved 29 June 2010.) Besides regular plays, it also offers four theatre clubs for all age levels. During the season of 2008/2009, 400 performances of ten productions attracted more than 21,000 visitors. The theatres director is Katharina Kreuzhage. Schubart Literary Award Tributing to Friedrich Daniel Schubart, who spent his childhood and youth in Aalen, the city endowed the Schubart Literary Award (Schubart-Literaturpreis) in 1955, which is one of the earliest literary awards in Baden-Wrttemberg. It is awarded biennially to German-language writers, whose work accord with Schubarts liberal and enlightening reasoning(Schubart-Literaturpreis der Stadt Aalen.) and is remunerated with 12,000 Euros. Music Since 1958, the School of the City of Aalen exists, where today about 1,500 students are taught by 27 music instructors in 30 subjects. Since 2009, the school is being directed by Ralf Eisler.(Musikschule der Stadt Aalen on aalen.de, retrieved 20 June 2010.)In 1977, a orchestra was founded in Aalen, which today is called Aalener Sinfonieorchester, and consists mostly of instructors and students of the music school. It performs three public concerts annually: The New Years Concert in January, the Symphony Concert in July and a Christmas Concert in December.(Aalener Sinfonieorchester e. V. on aalen.de, retrieved 20 June 2010.)Beyond that, music festivals regularly take place in Aalen, like the Aalen Jazz Festival (see below).The Aalen volunteer fire department since 1952 has a band whose roots date back to 1883. In 1959, the band received its first glockenspiel from TV host Frankenfeld on the occasion of a TV appearance.(Spielmannszug on feuerwehr-aalen.de, retrieved 3 December 2010) Museums and memorial sites  Museums In the central district of Aalen, there are two museums: The Aalen Limes Museum (Limesmuseum Aalen) is located at the place of the largest Roman cavalry fort north of the Alps until about 1.800 years ago. The museum exposes numerous objects from the time of Roman occupation. The ruin of the cavalry fort located beside the museum is open to the museum visitors. Every other year, a Roman festival is held on the museum area (see below).In the Geological-Paleontological Museum located in the historic town hall, more than 1500 fossils from the Swabian Jura, including ammonites, ichthyosaurs and corals, are displayed.In the Waldhausen district the Heimatstble museum of local history has an exhibition on agriculture and rural living.In the Wasseralfingen district, there are two more museums: The Museum Wasseralfingen comprises a local history exhibition and an art gallery including works of Plock, Schuster and Kder. Besides, the stoveplate collection of the Schwbische Httenwerke steel mill is exhibited, with artists, modellers and the production sequence of a cast plate from design to final product being presented.The House of Civic History (Haus der Stadtgeschichte) opened in March 2008 and closed in 2010 featured alternating exhibitions on Aalens history. It was accommodated in the Rennaissance-Revivalstyle former mortuary of St. Johns cemetery. Memorial sites A memorial stone at the Schillerlinde tree above Wasseralfingens ore pit reminds of four prisoners of the subcamp of Natzweiler-Struthof concentration camp killed there. Also in Wasseralfingen, on the cemetery a memorial with the Polish inscription To the victims of Hitlerism reminds of the deceased forced labourers buried in a Polish respective a Soviet section.(In 1954, on the Schillerhhe hill the city erected a bell tower as a memorial to Aalens victims of both world wars and to the displacement of ethnic Germans. The tower was planned by Leo, the bell was endowed by Carl Schneider. The tower is open on request. Every evening at 18:45 (before 2003: at 19:45), the memorials bell rings.(Announcement of the City of Aalen of 4 March 2004.) Buildings  Churches The city centre is dominated by the Evangelical-Lutheran St. Nicholas Church in the heart of the pedestrian area. The church, in its present shape being built between 1765 and 1767, is the only major Baroque building in Aalen and is the main church of the Evangelical-Lutheran parish of Aalen.St. Johns Church is located inside of St. Johns cemetery in the western centre. The building presumably is from the 9th century and thus is one of Wrttembergs oldest existing churches. The interior features frescos from the early 13th century.For other churches in Aalen, see the Religions section. Historic Town Hall with Spy The Historic Town Hall was originally built in the 14th century. After the city fire of 1634, it was re-erected in 1636 and after. For this building, the city bought a clock in Lauterburg,( and the Imperial City of Nuremberg donated a Carillon. It features a figurine of the Spy of Aalen and other figurines, however the latter ones were lost by a fire in 1884. Since then, the Spy resides inside the reconstructed tower and has become a symbol of the city. The building was used as the citys town hall until 1907. Since 1977, the Geological-Paleontological Museum resides in the Historic Town Hall.(According to legend, the citizens of Aalen owe the Spy of Aalen (Spion von Aalen)  their city having been spared from destruction by the emperors army:The Imperial City of Aalen once was were in quarrel with the emperor, and his army was shortly before the gates to take the city. The people of Aalen got scared and thus dispatched their most cunning one out into the enemys camp to spy out the strength of their troops. Without any digression, he went straight into the middle of the enemy camp, which inescapably led to him being seized and presented to the emperor. When the emperor asked him what he had lost here, he answered in German: Dont frighten, high lords, I just want to peek how many cannons and other war things youve got, since I am the spy of Aalen. The emperor laughed upon such a blatancy and acted navety, steered him all through the camp and then sent him back home. Soon the emperor withdrew with his army as he thought a city such wise guys reside in deserved being spared.(Oral tradition according to Ernst Heinrich Meier: Deutsche Sagen, Sitten und Gebruche aus Schwaben, Stuttgart 1852, p. 368, and Der Spion von Aalen in Wikisource) Old Town Hall The Old Town Hall was first documented in 1575. Its outside wall features the oldest known coat of arms, which is of 1664. Until 1851, the building also housed the Krone-Post hotel, which coincided with being a station of the Thurn und Taxis postal company. It has housed notable persons. Thus the so-called Napoleon Window reminds with its N painted on of the stay of French emperor Bonaparte in 1805. According to legend, he rammed his head to bleed on this window, when he was startled by the noise of his soldiers ridiculing the Spy of Aalen.( The building was used as Aalens town hall from 1907 until 1975. Today it houses a cabaret caf and the stage of the Theatre of the City of Aalen. The Wischau Linguistic Enclave Society the city has taken over godparenthood for stores their traditional constumes in the building. Brgerspital The Brgerspital (Civic Asylum) is a timber-frame house erected on Spritzenhausplatz (Fire Engine House Square) in 1702. Until 1873, it was used as civic hospital, later as a retirement home. After comprehensive renovation, since 1980 it is a senior citizens community centre.( Limes-Thermen On a slope of the Langert mountain south of the City, the Limes-Thermen (Limes Thermae) springs are located. They were built in ancient Roman style and opend in 1985. The accredited health spa is supplied with water about  warm stemming from about  underneath. Market square The market square is the historic hub of Aalen and runs along about  from the town hall in the south to the Historic Town Hall and the Old Town Hall in the north, where it disembogues into Radgasse alley. Since 1809, it is site of the weekly market on Wednesday and Saturday. About  in front of the Reichsstdter Brunnen fountain at the town hall, the coats of arms of Aalen, its twinned cities and of the Wischau linguistic enclave are paved into the street as mosaic. Market fountain Aalen.jpg|thumb|Statue depicting Joseph I at the market fountainIn 1705, for the water supply of Aalen a well casing was erected at the northern point of the market square, in front of the Historic Town Hall. It was a present of duke Eberhard Louis. The fountain bore a statue of emperor Joseph I., who was enthroned in 1705 and in 1707 renewed Aalens Imperial City privileges.( The fountain was supplied by a wooden pipe. Excessive water was dissipated through ditches branched from Kocher river. When in the early 1870s Aalens water network was constructed, the fountain was replaced by a smaller fountain about  off. In 1975, the old market fountain was re-erected in baroque style. It bears a replica of the emperors statue, with the original being exhibited in the new town halls lobby. The iron casing plates depict the 1718 coat of arms of the Duchy of Wrttemberg and the coats of arms of Aalen and of the merged municipalities. Reichsstdter Brunnen The Reichsstdter Brunnen fountain (Imperial Civic Fountain) is located in front of the town hall at the southern point of the market square. It was created by sculptor Nuss in 1977 to remind of the times of Aalen being an Imperial City (13601803). On its circulatory frieze, bronze figurines illustrate the citys history.( Radgasse The Radgasse (Wheel Alley) features Aalens oldest faade. Originally a small pond was on its side. The buildings were erected between 1659 and 1662 for peasants with citizenry privileges and renovated in the mid-1980s. The name giver for the alley was the Wheel tavern, which was to be found at the site of todays address Radgasse 15.( Tiefer Stollen The former iron ore pit Wilhelm at Braunenberg hill was converted into the Tiefer Stollen tourist mine in order to remind of the old-day miners efforts and to maintain it as a memorial of early industrialisation in the Aalen area. It has a mining museum open for visitors. A railway takes visitors deep into the mountain. The City of Aalen, a sponsorship association and many citizens volunteered several thousand hours of labour to put the mine into a state of being visited. As far as possible, things were left in the original state. In 1989, a sanitary gallery was established where respiratory diseases are treated within rest cures. Thus the Aalen village of Rthard, where the gallery is located, was awarded the title of Place with sanitary gallery service in 2004.(OB Pfeifle zum Jahreswechsel 2004/2005.) Observatory The Aalen Observatory was built in 1969 as school observatory for the Schubart Gymnasium. In 2001, it was converted to a public observatory. Since then, it is managed by the Astronomische Arbeitsgemeinschaft Aalen (Aalen Astronomical Society). It is located on Schillerhhe hill and features two telescopes. They were manufactured by Zeiss AG which has its headquarters in nearby Oberkochen and operates a manufacturing works in Aalen (see below). In the observatory, guided tours and lectures are held regularly. Windpark Waldhausen The Windpark Waldhausen farm began operating in early 2007. It consists of seven REpower MM92 wind turbines with a capacity of 2 MW each.() The hub height of each wind turbine is , with a rotor diameter of . Aalbumle observation tower On Langert mountain, the  tall Aalbumle observation tower is standing. This popular hiking destination was built in 1898 and given its present shape in 1992. It features a good view over Aalen and the Welland region, until the Rosenstein mountain and Ellwangen. Beneath the tower, an adventure playground and a cabin is located. A flag on the tower signals whether the cabins restaurant is open. Natural monuments The Baden-Wrttemberg State Institute for Environment, Measurements and Natural Conservation has demarcated six protected landscapes in Aalen (the Swabian Jura escarpment between Lautern and Aalen with adjacent territories, the Swabian Jura escarpment between Unterkochen and Baiershofen, the Hilllands around Hofen, the Kugeltal and Ebnater Tal valleys with parts of Heiligental valley and adjacent territories, Laubachtal valley and Lower Lein Valley with side valleys), two sanctuary forests (Glashtte and Kocher Origin), 65 extensive monuments, 30 individual natural monuments and the following two areas:(Directory of protected areas of  Baden-Wrttemberg State Institute for Environment, Measurements and Natural Conservation (LUBW).)The  large Dellenhule protected area between Aalens Waldhausen district and Neresheims Elchingen district, demarcated in 1969, is a sheep pasture with juniper and pasture of old willow oaks.(Protected areas profile at LUBW)The  large Goldshfer Sande protected area was demarcated in 2000 and is situated between Aalens Hofen district and Httlingen. The sands on a hill stemming from the Pleistocene are of geological importance, and the various grove structures offer habitat to severely endangered bird species.(Protected areas profile at LUBW) Sports The soccer team of 1921-founded Aalen is playing in the 3rd German League as of season 2010/2011. Its playing venue is the Scholz-Arena situated in the west of the city, which bore the name Stdtisches Waldstadion Aalen (Civic Forest Stadium of Aalen) until 2008. From 1939 until 1945, the VfR played in the Wrttemberg, then one of several parallel top-ranking soccer leagues of Germany.In the Wrestling Federal League, the Aalen is fighting. It was German champion in team wrestling in 2010, and its predecessor, the KSV Germania Aalen disbanded in 2005, was German champion for eight times and runner-up for five times since 1976. Another Aalen club, the Dewangen, was until 2009 as well wrestling in the Federal League.Two American sports, Football and Baseball, are pursued by the MTV Aalen. Volleyball as well is playing an important role in Aalen for years. The first mens team of DJK Aalen accomplished re-promotion for regional league in the season of 2008/09.South of the city centre, at the northern slope of the Swabian Jura, the Ostalb ski lifts are located. The skiing area comprises two lifts that have a vertical rise of  resp. , two runs of a length of  resp.  and a beginners run.(Ostalb-Skilifte Aalen, City of Aalen, retrieved 3 December 2010) Regular events  Reichsstdter Tage Since 1975, Reichsstdter Tage (Imperial City days) festival is held annually in the city centre on the second weekend in September. It is deemed the largest city festival of the Ostwrttemberg region,(Aalen feiert, Zeitung, Artikel vom 6. September 2007, abgerufen 11. Juli 2011) and is connected with a shopping Sunday in accordance with the Ladenschlussgesetz code. The festival is also attended by delegations from the twinned cities. On the town hall square, on Sunday an ecumenical serviceis held. Roman Festival The international Roman Festival (Rmertage) are held biannially on the site of the former roman fort and the modern Limes museum. The festivals ninth conduct in 2008 was attended by around 11,000 people.(Bilder der IX. Internationalen Rmertage 2008 on aalen.de, retrieved on 9 May 2010.) Aalen Jazz Festival Annually in the second week of November, the Jazz Festival brings known and unknown artists to Aalen. It already featured musicians like Davis, B. King, Charles, David Murray, Tyner, Jarreau, Svensson and Mangelsdorff. The festival is complemented by individual concerts in spring and summer, and, including the individual concerts, comprises around 25 concerts with a total of about 13,000 visitors. Economy and infrastructure In 2008, 30,008 employees liable to insurance were living in Aalen. With 13,946 (46.5 percent), most of them were employed in the manufacturing sector. In commerce, catering, hotels and transport, 4,715 persons (15,7 percent) were employed, in other services, 11,306 persons (37,7 percent).(Beschftigte, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010) Besides, in 2008 there were about 16,000 employees commuting into the city and about 9,000 commuting out.(Berufspendler, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010)Altogether, in Aalen there are about 4,700 business enterprises in Aalen, 1,1000 of them being registered in the trade register. The others comprise 2,865 small enterprises and 701 craft enterprises.(Unternehmen und Betriebe, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010.)In Aalen, metalworking is the predominant branch. Besides machine-building, the branches of optics, paper, technologyand textiles are relevant.Notable enterprises include SHW Automotive (originating from the former Schwbische Httenwerke steel mills and further from a mill of 1671 in Wasseralfingen), the Alfing Kessler engineering works, the precision tools manufacturer MAPAL Dr. Kress, the snow chain manufacturer RUD Ketten Rieger & Dietz and its subsidiary Erlau, the Gesenkschmiede Schneider forging die smithery, the SDZ Druck und Medien media company, the Papierfabrik Palm paper mill, the alarm system manufacturer Telenot, the laser show provider LOBO electronic and the textile finisher Lindenfarb, which all have their seat in Aalen. A branch in Aalen is maintained by optical systems manufacturer Carl Zeissheadquartered in nearby Oberkochen.(Transport Rail station is a regional railway hub on the Railway from Stuttgart, the Railway from Ulm, the Jagst Railway to Crailsheim and the Railway to Donauwrth. Until 1972, the Railway connected Aalen with an der Donau via Neresheim. More stations within city limits are Hofen (b Aalen), Unterkochen, Wasseralfingen and station. The Aalen-Erlau stop situated in the south is no longer operative.Aalen station is served in two-hour intervals trains of Intercity line 61 KarlsruheStuttgartAalenNuremberg. In regional traffic, Aalen is served by various lines of Interregio-Express, Regional-Express and Regionalbahn categories. The city also operates the Aalen Industrial Railway (Industriebahn Aalen), which carries about 250 carloads per year.(2002 Annual Report, Edited by the City of Aalen, Hauptamt.) Street The junctions of Aalen/Westhausen and Aalen/Oberkochen connect Aalen with the Autobahn A7 (WrzburgFssen). Federal roads (Bundesstraen) connecting with Aalen are B 19 (WrzburgUlm), B 29 (WaiblingenNrdlingen) and B 290 (TauberbischofsheimWesthausen). The Dichterstrae (Swabian Poets Route) tourist route established in 1977/78 leads through Aalen.Within city limits, several bus lines operate. The Omnibus-Verkehr Aalen company is one of the few in Germany that use buses, it does so since 1966.(Historie on the website of OVA-Omnibus-Verkehr Aalen.) A district-wide fare system, OstalbMobil, is in effect since 2007. Air transport Stuttgart Airport, offering international connections, is about  away, the travel time by train is about 100 Minutes. At Airport, located  south-east of Aalen, minor aircraft are admitted. Gliding airfields nearby are in Heubach and Bartholom. Bicycle Bicycle routes stretching through Aalen are the Deutscher Limes-Radweg (German Limes Bicycle Route) and the Kocher-Jagst Bicycle Route. Public facilities Aalen houses an Amtsgericht (local district court), chambers of the Stuttgart Labour Court, a notarys office, a tax office and an agency. It is seat of the Ostalbkreis district office, of the Aalen Deanery of the Evangelical-Lutheran Church and of the Ostalb deanery of the Catholic Diocese of Rottenburg-Stuttgart.The Stuttgart Administrative Court, the Stuttgart Labour Court and the Ulm Social Welfare Court are in charge for Aalen.Aalen had a civic hospital, which resided in the Brgerspital building until 1873, then in a building at Alte Heidenheimer Strae. In 1942, the hospital was taken over by the district. The district hospital at the present site of Klblesrain, today known as Ostalb-Klinikum, was opened in 1955.( Media The first local newspaper, Der Bote von Aalen (The Herald of Aalen), was published on Wednesdays and Saturdays since 1837.(Currently, local newspapers published in Aalen are the Schwbische Post, which obtain their supra-regional pages from the Ulm Sdwestpresse, and the Aalener Nachrichten (erstwhile Aalener Volkszeitung), a local edition of Zeitung in im Allgu.Two of Germanys biggest Lesezirkels (magazine rental services) are headquartered in Aalen: Brabandt LZ Plus Media and Lesezirkel Portal.Regional event magazines are Xaver, la, lakultur.The commercial broadcasters Radio Ton and Radio 7 have studios in Aalen. Education A school was first mentioned in Aalen in 1447; it was rearranged in 1616 and later in various buildings that were all situated near the city church, and persisted up into the 19th century. In the course of the reformation, a German school was established in parallel, being a predecessor of the latter Volksschule school type. In 1860, the Ritterschule was built as a Volksschule for girls; the building today houses the Pestalozzischule. In 1866, a new building was erected for the Latin school and for the Realschuleestablished in 1840. This building, later known as the Alte Gewerbeschule, was torn down in 1975 to free the area for the new town hall. In 1912, the Parkschule building was opened. It was designed by Bonatz and today houses the Schubart-GymnasiumThe biggest educational institution in the city is the Hochschule Aalen, which was founded in 1962 and focusses on engineering and economics. It is attended by 5000 students of five faculties and employs 129 professors and 130 other lecturers. The city provides three Gymnasiums, four Realschulen, two Frderschulen (schools), six combined Grundschulen and Hauptschulen and eight standalone Grundschulen. The Ostalbkreis district provides three vocational schools and three additional special schools. Finally, six non-state schools of various types exist.The German EsperantoLibrary (German: Deutsche Esperanto-Bibliothek, Esperanto: Germana Esperanto-Biblioteko) is located in the building of the city library since 1989. TV and radio transmission tower The Sdwestrundfunk broadcasting company operates the Aalen transmission toweron the Braunenberg hill. The tower was erected in 1956, it is  tall and made of concrete. Things named after Aalen The following vehicles are named Aalen:* The Lufthansa 737-500 D-ABJF* The Bahn 3 Tz309 (since 2 June 2008)(Presseamt der Stadt Aalen.)File:Lufthansa.b737-500.d-abjf.arp.jpg|Boeing 737-500 AalenFile:ICE Aalen.jpg|ICE Aalen at Aalen station Persons connected to Aalen  Honorary citizens * Ruland Aylinger, Composer* Rommel (18911944), Field Marshal of World War II, grew up in Aalen* Paul Edel(Treff der Eisenbarths, Ellwanger Zeitung, 15 May 2008 (online).)* Wilhelm Jakob Schweiker (18591927), founder of the Aalen Historical Society (Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen) and name giver of the Wilhelm Jakob Schweiker Award(Richtlinie zur Vergabe des Wilhelm-Jakob-Schweiker-Preises, Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen, retrieved 24 May 2010.)* Pfeifle, Mayor of Aalen from 1976 until 2005 Persons born in Aalen * Joseph von Hefele (18091893), Roman Catholic theologian, clerical historian and bishop* Wahl (18921981), Nazi Gauleiter of Swabia* Heck (19171989), Politician of the CDU, former minister of the federal government and CDU secretary general* Walter Adams (born 1945 in Wasseralfingen), middle distance runner* Sobek (born 1953), architect and structural engineer* Ilg (born 1957), steeplechaser and world champion (1983)* Gerlach (born 1965), independent politician, mayor of Aalen (since 2005)* Thomas Zander (born 1967), wrestler, winner of Olympic silver medal and world champion (1994)* Steeb (born 1967), tennis player* Fischer (born 1989), footballer* Funk (born 1990), footballer Other * Friedrich Daniel Schubart (17391791), poet, organ player, composer and journalist; lived in Aalen as a child and adolescent* Duala Manga Bell (18731914), Duala king and resistance leader in the German colony of Kamerun, lived in Aalen from 1891 until 1896.* Elser (19031945), opponent of Nazism, worked in 1923 as an apprentice carpenter in Aalen.* Bickelhaupt (* 1939), football coach, lives in Aalen since 2004.* Thiele (* 1953 in Heidenheim), physicist and former astronaut, attended school in Aalen.* Andreas Beck (* 1987 in Kemerovo/Soviet Union), German footballer, grew up in Aalen. Literature * *  External links * City of Aalens websiteReferencesrefs()()()()()(Statistisches Jahrbuch 2007/2008, Stadt Aalen (PDF, 2.1 MB).)()()()()()()()(Aalen  Citybummel, on: aalen.de, retrieved 12 July 2010.)als:Aalenroa-rup:Aalenbg:ca:Aalencs:Aalenda:Aalende:Aalenet:Aalenel:es:Aaleneo:Aalen()fr:Aalenga:Aalen( )hr:Aalenid:Aalenit:Aalenpam:Aalensw:Aalenla:Alalv:lene(BV)lmo:Aalenhu:Aalennl:Aalen()no:Aalennn:Aalenpnb:(Niemcy)pt:Aalenro:Aalen(-)simple:Aalensl:Aalen()sh:Aalenfi:Aalensv:Aalentr:Aalen()vo:Aalenwar:Aalen(-)
